The Project Gutenberg eBook, The Submarine Boys and the Spies, by Victor
G. Durham


This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net





Title: The Submarine Boys and the Spies
       Dodging the Sharks of the Deep


Author: Victor G. Durham



Release Date: November 13, 2005  [eBook #17057]

Language: English

Character set encoding: ISO-646-US (US-ASCII)


***START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE SUBMARINE BOYS AND THE SPIES***


E-text prepared by Jim Ludwig



Note: This is book four of eight of the Submarine Boys Series.




THE SUBMARINE BOYS AND THE SPIES

Dodging the Sharks of the Deep

by

VICTOR G. DURHAM

1910







CONTENTS

CHAPTERS
    I. "Guess Day" at Spruce Beach
   II. Trouble in the Making Stage
  III. On the Edge of the Spider's Web
   IV. Kamanako Appears on the Scene
    V. Eph Learns Something New
   VI. The Little Russian has His Way
  VII. A Pointer Jolts the Submarine Captain
 VIII. Even Up for Mr. Kamanako
   IX. "Dog, Who is Your Master?"
    X. M. Lemaire Proves His Training
   XI. Jack's Friends Do Some Fast Guessing
  XII. In the Power of the Spies
 XIII. The Fellow Who Showed the White Flag
  XIV. A Remembrance From Shore
   XV. Captain Jack Becomes Suspicious
  XVI. The Government Takes a Hand
 XVII. Drummond's Little Surprise--For Himself
XVIII. "Remember What Happened to the 'Maine'!"
  XIX. A Joke on the Secret Service!
   XX. A Bright Look and a Deadly Warning
  XXI. A French Rat in the Corner
 XXII. Gallant Even to the Foe
XXIII. "Good-Bye, My Captain!"
 XXIV. Conclusion




CHAPTER I

"GUESS DAY" AT SPRUCE BEACH


"Has anyone sighted them yet?"

"No."

"What can be the matter?"

"You know, their specialty is going to the bottom.  Possibly they've gone
there once too often."

"Don't!" shuddered a young woman.  "Try not to be gruesome always,
George."

The young man laughed as he turned aside.

Everyone and his friend at Spruce Beach was asking similar questions.
None of the answers were satisfactory, because nobody knew just what
reply to make.

Everyone in the North who has the money and leisure to get away from
home during a portion of the winter knows Spruce Beach.  It is one of
nature's most beautiful spots on the eastern coast of Florida, and man
has made it one of the most expensive places in the world.

In other words, Spruce Beach is a paradise to look at.  The climate, in
the winter months, is mild and balmy.  Health grows rapidly at this
favored spot, and so fashion has seized upon it as her own.  True, there
are yet a few cottages and boarding houses left where travelers of
moderate means may find board.

The whole air of Spruce Beach is one of holiday expectancy.  The winter
visitors go there to enjoy themselves; they expect it and demand it.
They are gratified.  From the first of December to the middle of March,
life at Spruce Beach makes you think of a great, jolly, unending picnic.
The greatest cause for regret is that more people of ordinary means
cannot go there and reap some of the plentiful harvest of fun and frolic.

The thousands of tourists, hotel guests and cottagers at Spruce Beach
had been promised that by the middle of December they would have a
treat the like of which few of them had ever enjoyed before.  The
Pollard Submarine Boat Company, so named after David Pollard the
inventor--the company of which Jacob Farnum, the shipbuilder, was
president--had promised that by that date their newest, fastest and most
formidable submarine torpedo boat, the "Benson," should arrive at Spruce
Beach, there to begin a series of demonstrations and trials.

Still more extraordinary, the captain of this marvelous new submarine
craft of war was known to be a boy of sixteen--Jack Benson, after whom
the new navy-destroyer had been named.

Newspaper readers were beginning to be familiar with the name of Captain
Jack Benson.  Though so young he had, after a stern apprenticeship,
actually succeeded in making himself a world-known expert in the handling
of submarine torpedo boats.

Those lighter readers of newspapers, who scoffed at the very idea of a
sixteen-year-old boy handling a costly submarine boat, were sometimes
reminded that the same thing happens at the United States Naval Academy
at Annapolis, where the young midshipmen are given instruction and often
are qualified as young experts along similar lines.

More remarkable still, as faithful readers of newspapers knew, Captain
Jack Benson had associated with him, on the new torpedo boat, two other
sixteen-year-old boys, by name Hal Hastings and Eph Somers.  It was also
rumored, and nearly as often believed, that these three sea-bred young
Americans knew as much as anyone in the United States on the special
subject of submarine boat handling.

Be that all as it might, it was known to every man, woman and child at
Spruce Beach that the "Benson" was due to arrive on this December day
and the whole picnicking population was out to watch the incoming from
the sea of the strange craft.

More than that, the United States gunboat, "Waverly," had been for two
days at anchor in the little, somewhat rockbound harbor just north of
the beach.  It was to be the pleasant duty of the naval officer
commanding the "Waverly" to extend official welcome to the "Benson" as
soon as that craft pointed its cigar-shaped nose into the harbor.

The first boat built by the submarine company had been named, after the
inventor, the "Pollard."  The second had been named the "Farnum," in
honor of the enterprising young shipbuilder who had financed this big
undertaking.  And now Spruce Beach was awaiting the arrival of the
company's third boat, the "Benson," so-called in recognition of the hard
and brilliant work done by the young skipper himself.

That this was to be something of a social and gala occasion, even on
board the gunboat, was evident from the fact that on the naval vessel's
decks there now promenaded some two score of ladies and their escorts
from shore, and on the hurricane deck lounged musicians from hotel
orchestras on shore, these men of music having been combined to form a
band, in order to make the occasion more joyous.

"Look at that shore, black with people!" cried a woman to one of the
naval officers on the deck of the "Waverly."

"There must be at least ten thousand people in that crowd," laughed
Lieutenant Featherstone.  "I wonder whether they're more interested in
the boat, or its boy officers?"

"Are Captain Benson and his comrades really as clever as some of the
newspapers have made them out to be?" asked the woman doubtfully.

"Judging by letters I've had from friends who are officers at the Naval
Academy," replied Lieutenant Featherstone, "the young men must be very
well versed, indeed, in all the arts of their peculiar profession."

A cheer went up from the principal throng over at the beach.  Smoke had
been sighted off on the eastern horizon, and this must come from the
long expected craft.

From boat to boat the news passed, and so it traveled to the deck of
the "Waverly," where the sailors received it with broad smiles.  The
leader of the impromptu band raised his baton, rapping for attention.
But Lieutenant Featherstone, below, caught the leader's eye in time and
held up his hand for a pause.

"If you play, leader," called the officer, in a low voice that carried,
nevertheless, "don't imagine that your music is to welcome the 'Benson.'
Submarine boats don't travel under steam power.  They can't."

So, too, on shore, the understanding was quickly reached that the smoke
did not indicate the whereabouts of the expected submarine.  Half and
hour later it was found that the smoke came from the tug of a fruit
transporting company.

Where, then, was the "Benson?"

It was not in the least like young Captain Jack Benson to be behind time
when he had an appointment to get anywhere.  Nor did that very youthful
companion expect to arrive late on this day of days.

Some miles away from Spruce Beach the submarine boat, as shown by her
submersion gauge, was running along at six miles an hour some fifty-two
feet under the surface of the ocean.

Young Eph Somers, auburn-haired and ofttimes impulsive, now looked as
sober as a judge as he sat perched up in the conning tower, beyond which,
at that depth, he could not see a thing.  However, a shaded incandescent
light dropped its rays over the surface of the compass by the aid of
which Eph was steering with mathematical exactness.

Out in the engine room stood Hal Hastings, closely watching every
movement of even as trusted and capable a man as Williamson, one of the
machinists from the Farnum shipyards.

At the cabin table sat Captain Jack Benson himself, his head bent low
as he scanned a chart.  His right hand held a pair of nickeled dividers.
Near his left lay a scale rule.  A paper pad, half covered with figures,
also lay within reach.

On the opposite side of the table sat Jacob Farnum, owner of the Farnum
shipyard and president of the Pollard Submarine Boat Company.  Beside
Mr. Farnum sat David Pollard, the inventor.

Readers of the preceding volumes in this series are familiar with all
these people, now decidedly famous in the submarine boat world.  In the
first volume, "_The Submarine Boys on Duty_," was related how all these
people came together; how the boys, by sheer force of character "broke
into" the submarine boating world.  In that volume the building of the
first of the company's boats, the "Pollard" was described, and all the
exciting adventures that were connected with the event were fully
narrated.

Our former readers will also remember all the wonderful adventures and
the rollicking fun set forth in the second volume, under the title of
"_The Submarine Boys' Trial Trip_."  In this book, bristling with
adventures, and made lighter, in spots, by accounts of humorous doings,
was told how the boys gained fame as submarine experts.  It was their
fine, loyal work that interested the United States government in buying
that first boat, the "Pollard."

The third volume in the series, entitled "_The Submarine Boys and the
Middies_" told how our young friends secured the prize detail at
Annapolis; where, for a brief time, the three submarine boys served as
instructors in submarine work to the young midshipmen at the Naval
Academy.  Nor was this accomplished without serious, and even sensational,
opposition from the representative of a rival submarine company.  Hence
the boys went through some rousing adventures.  Incidentally, they
fell against practical instruction in hazing at the Naval Academy.

Adventures enough had befallen the submarine boys to last any man for a
lifetime.  Yet, as fate decreed it, Captain Jack Benson and his staunch
young comrades were now destined to adventures greater and further
reaching than any of which they could have dreamed.  In advance, this
winter trip to Spruce Beach promised to be little more than a pleasant
relaxation for the youngsters.  What it really turned out to be will
soon be made clear in the pages of this volume.

"It seems a very risky plan that you're trying, Jack," remarked Jacob
Farnum, at last.

"Don't you want me to do it, sir?" asked the young skipper, looking up
instantly from his chart.

"Why, er--"

But here David Pollard, the inventor of these boats broke in, eagerly:

"Of course we ought to do it, Farnum.  Jack is wholly right.  If we enter
the harbor at Spruce Beach in this fashion, and carry through our entire
plan successfully, what on earth can there be left for opponents of our
class of boats to say?"

"Not _if_ we succeed, of course," smiled Farnum.  "It's only the pesky
little 'if' that's bothering me at all.  I don't want any of you to
think me a coward--"

"We know, very well, you're not, sir," Captain Jack interposed, very
quietly.

"But if we make any slip in our calculations," continued Jacob Farnum,
"the first bad thing about it is that we'll smash a fine boat which,
otherwise, the United States Government is likely to want at a price
around two hundred thousand dollars.  That, however, is not the greatest
risk that I have in mind.  On board this craft are five people without
whom it would be rather hopeless for anyone to go on building the
Pollard type of boat.  Therefore, besides risking a valuable craft and
our own rather inconsequential lives, we go further and put the United
States Navy in danger of having only a couple of our boats.  Now, the
fact is, we want the Navy to have three or four dozen of our submarine
craft, for we ourselves believe implicitly in the great worth of the
Pollard boats."

"That's just the point, sir," cried Captain Jack Benson.

"Eh?  What is?" inquired Mr. Farnum, looking at his young skipper in
some bewilderment.

"Why, sir," laughed Jack, "the point is that we believe our boats to be
infinitely ahead of anything owned in any other navy on earth.  We
believe it possible to do things, with boats like this one, that can be
accomplished with no other submarine craft in the world.  Now, it's a
fact that, in all the navies, lest an accident happen to a submarine,
that craft is obliged to travel about, always, in the company of a steam
craft of war, which is known as the parent ship.  Yet we've come,
straight from the shipyard at Dunhaven, many hundreds of miles, without
any such escort.  We've been running along under our own power, night
and day, without accident, stop or bother.  Thus we've shown that the
Pollard boat can do things that no other submarine craft are ever
trusted to try alone.  And now, all that remains to show is that, at the
end of a long voyage, we can approach a coast, unseen, even though
thousands of people are probably looking for us, and that we can get
into a harbor without being detected; that, in fact, we could do
anything we might have a mind to do to an enemy's ships that might be
in that harbor.  But now, sir, you propose that, lest we have accidents,
it will be best to rise to the surface and enter the harbor at Spruce
Beach as plainly and stupidly as though the 'Benson' were some mere
lumber schooner."

"I see the thing just the way Jack Benson does," murmured David Pollard,
thrusting his hands down deep in his trousers pockets.

"Oh, well, if I'm voted down, I'll give in," laughed Jacob Farnum.  "I
wonder, though, how Hal and Eph feel about this?"

"I don't have to ask them," nodded Captain Jack, confidently.

"Why not?"

"We settled it all, days ago, sir."

"And they both agreed with you?"

"Down to the last jot, Mr. Farnum.  They saw the beauty and the boldness
of the plan."

Oh, well, go ahead, then, responded Mr. Farnum, rising and standing by
the cabin table.  "Of course, the picturesque and romantic possibilities
of the scheme are plain enough to me.  We'll have the people at Spruce
Beach agape with curiosity, then wild with enthusiasm.  And, really, to
be sure, we have to arouse the enthusiasm of the American people over
this whole game.  That's the surest way of forcing Congress to spend
more money on our boats."

"Where are you going, Jake?" called the inventor, as his partner started
aft.

"To the stateroom, to get a little nap," replied the shipbuilder.  "We're
not by any means due at Spruce Beach yet."

"Jake Farnum is surely not a coward," chuckled Mr. Pollard, as the
stateroom door closed.  "Nor is he over anxious about any detail in our
little game, or he couldn't go to sleep at this important time.  I know
I couldn't get a wink of sleep if I turned in now.  I've simply got to
sit up, wide awake, until I see the finish of your bold stroke, Jack
Benson."

Captain Jack laughed easily, then glanced at his watch to note the lapse
of time since he had made his last calculation of their whereabouts.  It
is one thing to be in the open air, navigating a vessel, but it is quite
another affair to be fifty-odd feet below the surface, calculating all
by the distance covered and the course steered.

"Any deviation in the course, Eph?" Captain Jack called up into the
conning tower.

"Not by as much as a hair's breadth," retorted young Somers, almost
gruffly, for with him, to depart from a given course, was well nigh
equal to a capital crime.

Jack touched a button in the side of the table.  Obeying the summons,
quiet Hal Hastings thrust his head out into the cabin.

"Just the same speed, Hal?" the young captain asked.

"Hasn't changed a single revolution per minute," Hastings answered,
briefly.

With his watch on the table before him, and employing the scale rule and
dividers, the young submarine skipper placed a new dot on the chart.

"Something ought to be happening in three quarters of an hour," Benson
remarked, with a chuckle, to Mr. Pollard.

Less than half an hour later the young submarine skipper climbed up into
the conning tower beside Eph.

"Same old straight course, eh, lad?" asked Jack quietly.

"You know it," retorted Eph.

"Then we're where we ought to be," responded Jack Benson, bending
forward.  With his right hand on the speed control he shut off speed.

"Now, just sit where you are, Eph, until I come up again," advised the
young commander.

"Going to the surface?" demanded Somers, with interest.

"Pretty close," nodded Benson.

Calling Mr. Pollard to his aid, Jack began to operate the machinery that
admitted compressed air to the water tanks, expelling the water
gradually from those same tanks.  This was the means by which the
submarine boat rose to the surface.  All the time that he was doing this,
Jack Benson kept his keen glance on the submersion gauge.  At last he
stopped.

"How is it up there, Eph?" he called, pleasantly.

"Why, of course there's a lot of good daylight filtering down through the
water now," Somers admitted.

Captain Jack went nimbly up the spiral stairway.  Now, he had still
another piece of apparatus to call into play.  This affair is known to
naval men as the periscope.

In effect, the periscope is a device which in the main is like a pipe;
it can be pushed up through the top of the conning tower, through a
special, water-proof cylinder, until the top of the periscope is a foot,
or less, above the surface of the water.

The top of this instrument is fitted with lenses and mirrors.  Down
through the shaft of the periscope are other mirrors, which pass along
any image reflected on the uppermost mirror of all.  At the bottom of
the periscope is the last mirror of the series, and, opening in upon
this, there is an eyepiece fitted with a lens.

As Captain Jack Benson applied his right eye to the eyepiece he was able
to see anything above the surface of the water that lay in any direction
that the periscope was pointing.

"Right opposite Spruce Beach, as the chart showed!" chuckled the young
commander.  Under the magnifying effect of the eyepiece lens Benson
could see the beach, the flag-bedecked hotels, and the moving masses of
people on the shore.  Yet, all this time, he was out at sea, more than
a mile from the beach.  The periscope itself, if seen from a boat an
eighth of a mile away, would undoubtedly have been taken for a floating
bottle.

"Let me have a peep," demanded Somers.

Eph looked briefly, then chuckled:

"Must be thousands of people over yonder, wondering what on earth has
happened to us!"

"Do you make out the gunboat, at anchor to the north of the hotel
section?" inquired Captain Jack.

"Oh, yes.  Say, they'll have an awakening on that gray craft, won't
they?"

"If we don't make any slip in our calculations," answered Benson,
gravely.

"Well, we're not going to make any slip," asserted Eph Somers, stoutly.

"Now, keep quiet, please, old fellow.  I want to do a little calculating
before we take the last, desperate step."

All this time the conning tower of the submarine was just a bit below
the surface.  Nothing but the slender shaft and the small head of the
periscope was above the wash of the lazy waves.

Captain Jack soon had his calculation made.  Then, with a quiet smile,
he remarked:

"I guess you'd better get below, Eph, for your part.  I'll take the
wheel, now, and Mr. Pollard will attend to the submerging mechanisms."

Eph laughed joyously as he darted below.  He had a part assigned to him
that was bound to be enjoyable.

"Mr. Pollard!" called down the young skipper, a few moments later.

"Aye, Captain Jack!"

"Let her down slowly, please, until the gauge shows just fourteen feet.
That's the greatest depth I dare try for the course we're going to
follow."

"Aye, Captain Jack.  Fourteen feet it shall be."

For the benefit of some readers who may not understand, it is to be
stated that the charts of harbors bear markings that show the exact
depth of water at every point in the harbor at low tide.  Thus, the
chart of the harbor just north of Spruce Beach had already told the
young submarine skipper just how far below the surface he could travel
with safety to his craft.

Further, he knew the draft of the "Waverly" to be eleven feet.  So the
youthful commander could feel quite certain that he would be in no danger
of colliding, below the water-line, with Uncle Sam's gunboat.

On the deck of the "Waverly" itself there was the same spirit of
expectancy that there had been an hour earlier in the afternoon.

Lieutenant Featherstone, executive officer of the gunboat, was not,
however, impatient.  In fact, he stood at the rail, aft, a pretty girl
beside him, and both were looking down musingly at the rippling water
below.

"As I was saying," drawled the lieutenant, "when--"

Just then he stopped, though he did not appear startled.

Straight up out of the watery depths shot a Carroty-topped boy, his wet
skin glistening in the sun.

"Good gracious!" gasped the girl.  "Where did that boy come from?"

"Say, sir," called up Eph Somers, distinguishing the lieutenant in his
swift look, "where do you want the submarine boat to anchor?"

"What's that to you, young man?" called down Mr. Featherstone, bluntly.

"Oh, just this much, sir," retorted Eph, treading water, lazily; "I
belong aboard the 'Benson,' and I've been sent to inquire where you want
us to find our moorings."

"You from the 'Benson'?" snorted the lieutenant, incredulously.  "Then
where is your craft!"

"Coming, sir."

"Coming?" jeered the lieutenant "So is Christmas!"

"The 'Benson' will be here first, sir," retorted Eph, splashing, then
blowing a stream of water from his mouth.  "The 'Benson,' sir, is due
here in from twenty to thirty seconds!"

"What's that?" demanded the naval officer, sharply.  Then a queer look
came into his face as a suspicion of the truth flashed into his mind.
He was about to speak when his feminine companion pointed, crying:

"What can that commotion mean out there?"  There was a little flurry in
the waters, then a parting as something dull-colored loomed slowly up.

Barely a hundred feet away from the port rail of the gunboat the new
submarine boat, "Benson," rose into sight.

Eph Somers had left the craft, while still below surface, by means of
the clever trick worked out by Jack Benson and his comrades, as
described in "_The Submarine Boys' Trial Trip_."

Almost instantly the manhole cover was thrown open.  Jack Benson, natty
as a tailor's model, in his newest uniform, stepped out on deck, waving
his hand to the gunboat.

"You'll have to consider that we got you, won't you, sir?" shouted the
young submarine captain.

Then, both on shore and on the decks of many craft, a realization of
what had happened dawned in the minds of thousands of people at about
the same instant.  A great, combined cheer shot up--a cheer that was
a vocal cyclone!




CHAPTER II

TROUBLE IN THE MAKING STAGE


On the hurricane deck of the "Waverly" stood one man, mouth wide open
and eyes a-stare, who couldn't seem to get the meaning of it all.  That
man was the leader of the combined band from the winter hotels.

Turning, glancing upward, the lieutenant looked at the leader with a
glance of cool wonder.

"Play, man!  Why don't you play?  What are you there for?"

Then, all of a sudden, reddening, the band leader rapped his music stand
with his baton, next gave the signal, and the band crashed forth into
the exultant strains of:

"See!  The Conquering Hero comes!"

At the third measure the band was all but drowned out by renewed
cheering, that came more uproariously than ever.

Captain Jack Benson had surely chosen a dramatic manner of making his
appearance at Spruce Beach.  Ten thousand tongues were set wagging all
at once.  When there came a lull, a man's voice on a tug not far from
the gunboat could be heard, asserting loudly:

"Well, that's what submarines are for--to sneak in while you're wiping
a speck of dust from your eye!"

That remark, coming just as the band ceased its strains, was plainly
audible, and brought a laugh from everyone aboard the submarine,
including Eph, who was just climbing, in his bathing suit, up to the
platform deck.

Lieutenant Commander Kimball, hurrying from his cabin, had joined
Lieutenant Featherstone at the rail, the pretty girl slipping away to
join a group of civilians.

"What do you think of us?" called Jacob Farnum, a broad grin of delight
on his face.

"You'll do," admitted Kimball.

"Do you consider yourself sunk?" demanded David Pollard, laughingly.

"Theoretically, yes," assented Lieutenant Commander Kimball.  "I wonder
if you could do it as well in war time?"

"Couldn't possibly do anything like it in war time," called back Captain
Jack Benson.  "For, sir, you fly the Stars and, Stripes!"

That was a happy speech, delivered at just the right second.  It set all
within hearing to cheering again.  And then the thousands beyond caught
it up.

"I'll say this much," shouted back Lieutenant Commander Kimball, as soon
as he could make himself heard: "We'd rather have you with us, Mr.
Benson, than against us."

"You'll have your wish, sir, as long as I'm alive," Jack answered,
turning and lifting his hat in simple yet eloquent salute to the Flag
waving at the gunboat's stern.

All this time Hal Hastings stood by the deck wheel, one hand occasionally
straying to the engine room signal buttons, as he kept the "Benson" just
about a hundred feet from the gunboat and nearly abeam.

"Where shall I anchor, sir?" called Captain Jack, presently.

"Better take it about four points off our port bow and at least four
hundred feet away, Mr. Benson," called back the lieutenant commander.

"Four points off port and four hundred feet it is, sir," answered the
young submarine skipper, saluting.  Then he gave the order to Hal.

"As soon as you're anchored, I'll send you over a boat to be at your
disposal this afternoon," called Lieutenant Commander Kimball.

"We'll use the boat, sir, to pay you a visit, if you permit," Jack
shouted back.

"By all means come aboard.  Then we'll visit you.  We're anxious to
see the works of such a wonderful little craft."

Within ten minutes a man-o-war's cutter was alongside, rowed by six
alert-looking young sailors, while a coxswain held the tiller ropes.

Messrs. Farnum and Pollard, Jack and Hal made up the visiting party,
leaving Eph Somers aboard the submarine, with Williamson to help him
at need.

Cordial, indeed, was the reception of the submarine folks aboard the
gunboat.  There was a great amount of handshaking to be done.

In the meantime, Eph Somers was having something in the way of trouble
back on the platform deck of the "Benson."

Two small boats, manned by harbor boatmen, and each carrying a few
passengers, had put off from shore, and now ranged alongside.

"How do you do, Captain?" shouted a young man at the bow of one of the
boats.

"Louder!" begged Eph.

"How do you do, Captain?"

"Louder.  I'm afraid the captain can't hear you yet," grinned the
carroty-topped submarine boy.  "He's over on the gunboat."

"Then who are you?"

"Who?  Me?" demanded Eph, innocently.  "Oh, I'm only the Secretary
of the Navy."

"All right, Mr. Secretary," laughed the same young man.  "We are coming
aboard."

"Aboard of what?" inquired Eph.

"Why, you're submarine boat, of course," came the answer.

"Guess not!" responded Eph, briskly.

"Why, yes; we're newspaper men, and it's business, not fun with us."

The boat containing the speaker lay lightly alongside at this moment.
In another moment the young man in the bow would have clambered up
on deck, but Eph called down to him:

"Hold on!  Stay where you are.  My orders are to hit any fellow with a
boathook who tries to come up here in the captain's absence."

"But we've got to have a look at your boat, don't you see?" insisted
the newspaper man, though, as Eph carelessly picked up a boathook, the
would-be caller waited prudently in the bow of his boat.

Young Somers was surely in a state of uncertainty.  He had strict orders
to allow no one aboard unless he knew them to be United States naval
officers.  On the other hand, the auburn-haired boy knew how necessary
it was for the submarine folks to keep on good terms with newspaper
writers if the American people were to be favorably impressed with the
claims of the Pollard boat.

"Now, see here," said Eph, balancing the boathook, "I'm sorry to stand
here making a noise like a crank, but have you any idea at all what
orders mean on shipboard?  And I'm under the strictest orders not to
let anyone aboard."

"Get your orders changed, then," proposed another newspaper man,
cheerfully.

"If you'll wait, I'll see if I can," muttered Eph, hopefully.

"Oh, we'll wait."

Williamson's head had appeared in the manhole way.

"Come out on deck, and don't let anyone on board unless we get orders
to that effect," murmured Somers, passing the conning tower.  Then,
through a megaphone, the submarine boy hailed the gunboat, asking if it
would be possible for him to talk with Jack Benson.  Benson soon
afterward came forward on the "Waverly."  Eph explained the situation.
Jack shouted back to allow the visitors on the platform deck, but not
to let any of them into the conning tower, or below.

So Eph turned to the two boatloads of visitors, explaining:

"Perhaps you men can get that all changed if you come out to-morrow, when
the captain is here.  But the best I can do to-day is to let you up here
on the platform deck."

"Oh, well," returned the first newspaper man to get up there beside the
boy, "you can tell us, as well as anyone, about your trip down the coast
and the way you slipped in here."

"And also," chimed in another, "you're the young man who came straight
up through the water when she was beneath the surface?"

Eph admitted that he was.

"That's the thing _I_ want to know about," continued the second newspaper
man.  "I've heard before about that wonderful trick of leaving a
submerged submarine, and coming to the surface.  How is the thing done?"

Eph regarded this questioner with wondering patience, before he replied:

"You want to know so little that I'm sorry I'm deaf in my front teeth and
dumb in my right ear."

"That's on you, Paisley!" chuckled one of the newspaper men.

Then three or four began to ask questions at the same time, which caused
young Somers to wait, then remarked blandly:

"Now, if you'll all kindly talk at once, I'll give you, in a few words,
a straight account of the plain features of our trip down here, including
our run under water.  But, if there's any question I don't answer for
you, you'll understand, I hope, that it's because I know it would be
bad manners for me to tell you anything that only officers of the Navy
have a right to know."

"All right, Commodore," nodded one of the newspaper men, good-humoredly.
"You're all right.  Go ahead and spin your yarn in your own way."

Thereupon, without telling anything that he had no right to tell, Eph
managed none the less to give his hearers an entertaining account of
the "Benson's" long trip down the coast without stop or help.

"And, unless I'm in a big error, gentlemen, ours is the longest trip
that a submarine boat ever took by itself."

"You're right there, too," nodded one of the newspaper men, who made a
study of naval affairs and records.  "And the way this craft came in
this afternoon beat anything, so far as I'm aware, that was ever done
with a submarine."

"That's Captain Jack Benson's specialty," replied Eph Somers, his eyes
twinkling.

"What's his specialty!"

"Doing things with a submarine boat that have never been done before.
Captain Benson is the latest wonder in the submarine line."

"He has a very steady admirer in you, hasn't he?" inquired one of the
newspaper men, laughingly..

"Yes; and the same is true of anyone else who knows him well," declared
Eph, warmly.  "Jack Benson is about the best fellow on earth--and one
of the smartest, too, his comrades think."

Thereupon one of the newspaper correspondents began tactfully to draw
out young Somers about the history and past performances of the young
submarine captain.  On this subject Somers talked as freely as they
could want.

"It was Benson, too, who discovered the trick of leaving a submarine
boat on the bottom, and coming to the top by himself, wasn't it?"
slyly asked one of the visitors.

"That was his discovery," nodded Eph, promptly.

"What's the principle of the trick?"

Eph's jaws snapped with a slight noise.  He remained silent, for a few
moments, before he replied:

"So far, that trick is known only to the Pollard people and a few
officers of the Navy.  The fewer that know, the better the chance of
keeping it a secret.  Don't you believe me?"

"That's one way of looking at it, perhaps," nodded a reporter.  "But
there's another side to that, too, Somers.  The United States now own
some of your boats, and the money of the people paid for those boats.
Now, don't you think the people of this country have a right to know
some of the secrets for which they pay good money, and a lot of it?"

On hearing the question put that way Eph looked tremendously thoughtful
for a few seconds.

"Why, yes, undoubtedly," admitted the carroty-topped submarine boy.
"I never thought of it that way before."

"Then--"

"See here," interrupted Eph, "it was the Secretary of the Navy, who
on behalf of the people, bought our boats."

"Yes--"

"He acted as the agent of the people," Eph continued.

"Well--"

"Therefore," asserted Eph Somers, with a roguish twinkle in his eyes,
"the Secretary of the Navy is the proper official for you to go to in
search of that information.  And you may tell the Secretary--"

"Stop making fun of us," interposed a newspaper man.

"You may tell the Secretary," finished Eph, "that I said I had no
objection to his giving you the information you want."

The newspaper men after gazing briefly at the innocent-looking face of
the carroty-topped one, began to grin.

"Young Somers is all right," declared one of the visitors.  "He knows
when to talk, and also when to hold his tongue."

"I never was sized up so straight before," grinned Eph, "since I was
caught stealing grapes behind the Methodist church."

Before the newspaper men departed in their boats they had obtained some
amusing and interesting points for a news "story."  Yet not one of them
had gained any inside information as to the closely guarded secrets of
the submarine.  Eph, from his very disposition and temperament, made
undoubtedly the best press agent the Pollard Company could have had.
Hal Hastings, while wishing to be obliging, probably would have said
his whole "say" in twenty or thirty words.  Jack Benson would have sung
the praises of the Pollard boats readily enough.  But it was Eph, alone
of the three, who could give to such an interview the humor and wit that
American newspaper readers enjoy.

One "reporter" in the party that was rowed back to the beach was not
known to his associates.  Wherever several newspaper men are gathered
at a point on business it is generally easy for a stranger, not connected
with the press, to push himself into the group.  The stranger, in this
instance, had given the name of Norton, claiming to be from an Omaha
paper.

Arrived at the beach, however, "Norton" did not hasten to the telegraph
office.  Instead, he hurried to the Hotel Clayton, the largest and most
expensive of the hotels at Spruce Beach.

Entering one of the elevators, Norton stepped off at the third floor.
He stepped briskly down a corridor, stopping before a door and giving
an unusual style of knock.

"Come--in," sounded a drawling voice, and Norton entered.

From a seat by a table, in the center of the large room, rose a man
somewhat past middle age This man was tall, not very stout, with a
sallow face adorned by a mustache and goatee.  The man's eyes were
piercing and black.  His hair was also black, save where a slight gray
was visible at the temples.

As Norton entered, the man, who rose, threw a cigarette into the fire
place, then reached over, selected another cigarette and lighted it.
The room was thick with the odor of some foreign tobacco.

"Well, Norton?" challenged this stranger, in a low voice.

"I've been aboard the new submarine, Monsieur Lemaire," replied the
young man.  "I went with a party of newspaper writers, pretending to be
one of their calling."

"An excellent idea, Norton.  And you saw the very boyish officers of
the boat?"

"Only one of them.  The other two were paying a call on board the
gunboat.  I saw Somers."

"You gathered some idea of how to pump him for the information wanted,
of course?"

"No; I didn't," retorted Norton, scowling.  "I learned, very soon, that
Somers is one whom we want to leave out of our count in getting
information?"

"Why so?"

"Well, M. Lemaire, if you meet that young fellow, and try to draw him
out, you'll understand.  He can talk longer, and tell less, than any
young fellow I've met.  He seems to guess just what you want to know,
and then he carefully tells you something else."

"Ah, well, out of three young men, we shall find one who will tell us all
we need to know," laughed M. Lemaire, gayly.  "So it is only a question
of learning which of the three to make the first attempt upon."

"If you want a suggestion--" began Norton.

"By all means, my dear fellow."

"Then turn your batteries of inquisitiveness loose upon Jack Benson,
first of all.  He may be easy game.  As for the third, Hal Hastings, I
hear that he is a silent fellow, who says little, and generally waits
five minutes, to think his answer over, before he gives it."

"Benson it shall be, then," nodded M. Lemaire.  "I shall find it easy
to meet him.  And now, good-bye, Norton, until this evening.  You will
know what to do then."

After Norton had gone out, closing the door behind him, M. Lemaire
carefully flecked the ash from his cigarette as he murmured to himself:

"Then it shall be Captain Benson whom we first attack!  Nor do I believe
I can do better than to enlist the services of Mademoiselle Sara.  Ah,
yes!  Her eyes are fine--perfect.  One looks into her eyes, and trusts
her.  Captain Jack Benson, you shall have the pleasure of meeting a most
charming creature!"




CHAPTER III

ON THE EDGE OF THE SPIDER'S WEB


An hour after dinner the orchestra of the Hotel Clayton crashed out into
the first two-step.

The big ballroom was already two thirds as well filled as it could be
with comfort.  Potted green palms stood everywhere at the sides.  The
orchestra in the gallery was nearly concealed behind a fringe of green.
The air was sweetly odorous with the fragrance of southern blossoms.
Scores of young women in all varieties of handsome evening dress
enlivened the appearance of the scene.  Their gems cast glitter and
enchantment.  There were men enough, too, for partners in the dance,
the men behind expanses of white shirt-front and clad in the black of
evening dress.

Just a few of the men, however, lent additional color to the scene.
These were officers and midshipmen from the "Waverly," who came attired
in the handsome blue, gold-braided dress uniforms of the service.

Among the guests of the hotel who attended the dance were Jacob Farnum
and his two young submarine experts; Jack Benson and Hal Hastings.  The
shipbuilder had come ashore with his young friends, registering at the
Clayton and taking rooms there.

"It's time for you youngsters to get ashore and have a little gaiety,"
Farnum had declared.  "If you don't mix with lively people once in a
while, you'll rust even while you keep the 'Benson's' machinery bright."

Jack and Hal had agreed to this.  Eph, however, had expressed himself
decidedly as preferring to remain on board the submarine for the time.
Williamson, too, had elected to remain on board, and so had David
Pollard, who rarely cared for anything in the social line.

On the floor, even before the music struck up, was M. Lemaire.  He was
in the usual black evening dress, though on his wide shirt front
glistened the jeweled decoration of some order conferred upon him by a
European sovereign.

A handsome and distinguished figure did M. Lemaire present.  He nodded
affably to many of the ladies in passing, and the interest with which
his greetings were acknowledged proved that M. Lemaire was in a gathering
where he could boast many acquaintances.

Almost at the first, M. Lemaire had succeeded in having Captain Jack
Benson pointed out to him.  The tall, sallow man looked over the
submarine boys eagerly, though covertly.  He beheld them in handsome
dress uniforms, very much like those worn by the naval officers, for
Jacob Farnum had insisted that his young submarine officers, wherever
they went must be appropriately attired.

In the throng, as M. Lemaire passed, stood one handsomely dressed girl.
Her face, which was interestingly beautiful, had a slightly foreign look.
The jewels that she wore must have cost a fortune.  The girl herself was
a finished product in the arts of good breeding and grace.

As M. Lemaire approached her, this girl recognized him with a smile and
a half-quizzical look.

"Ah, good evening, Mademoiselle Nadiboff," murmured M. Lemaire, as he
bent low before the handsome young woman.  "I am charmed."

Then he murmured, in a low tone, swiftly:

"Yonder are, the two boys.  Jack Benson is the one you will interest.
You, Sara, know the arts of conversation well enough.  Make him your
slave, until he is willing to tell all that we want to know.  Invite him
to drive with you in your auto car to-morrow.  But, bah!  You will know
how to make him talk!"

All this was said swiftly, unheard by anyone else.  Then M. Lemaire,
having appeared hardly to pause, passed on.

A minute later Mademoiselle Nadiboff was chatting laughingly with
Lieutenant Featherstone.

"Who are those two young men over there?" questioned the young woman.
"Are they of the Navy?"

"No, though related to us in interest," replied the lieutenant.  "They
are the captain and chief engineer of the submarine that arrived this
afternoon.  Youthful, aren't they?"

"Very," agreed Mademoiselle Sara.  "But I like their faces.  You will
present me, will you not, Lieutenant?"

"Gladly."

So Jack and Hal found themselves bowing before the handsome young
foreigner.  Mlle. Sara had the appearance of being, equally interested
in both of them, though she soon managed, with her social arts, in
drawing somewhat aside with Jack Benson.

And then the music crashed out.  One of the young woman's feet began to
tap the floor, her eyes glistening.

"Entrancing music," she murmured.

"If you are not engaged for this dance--" murmured Jack, hesitatingly.
This beautiful creature seemed so superior to the usual run of the human
kind that the submarine boy felt he was too presuming.

"You are very kind," replied the young woman, with a swift smile.  "I
shall enjoy it greatly."

Jack took one of her hands in his, resting his other hand lightly at her
waist.  A moment later they glided over the polished floor.

"Benson is doing famously," laughed Lieutenant Featherstone,
half-enviously.  "But before I think of myself, Hastings, I must seek an
interesting partner for you, also."

"Kind of you," returned Hal, gratefully.  "But I fear I must remain a
wall-flower, or a human palm to-night.  I don't know how to dance."

"You don't?" murmured Featherstone, in amazement.  "Good heavens! I
thought even the bootblacks knew how to dance in these modern days!"

Jacob Farnum knew how to dance, but did not care for it this evening.
He was much in love with his young wife, and, as she was not here, the
ballroom floor had no attractions for him.  So he and Hal retired to
seats at the side of the ballroom.

"Jack is dancing with a famously pretty girl--the loveliest of many
that are here to-night," smiled the shipbuilder.  "I trust he won't have
his head turned."

"Don't worry, sir," Hal rejoined, briefly.

The second dance, also, Jack Benson enjoyed with Mlle. Nadiboff.  The
young woman herself arranged that gracefully.  At the end of the second
dance Jack led his partner to a seat.  Then she sent him for a glass of
water.

Her cobwebby lace handkerchief fell to the floor.  M. Lemaire, passing
at that instant, espied it, picked it up, and returned it to her with
the bow of a polished man of the world.

"Flatter the young fellow!  Make him dance attendance on you to the point
that he forgets all else," whispered the man.

"Trust me for that," murmured the girl.

"I do." And M. Lemaire was gone, swallowed up in the increasing throng.

As Jack Benson brought the glass of water Mlle. Nadiboff sipped at it
daintily.  Raising her eyes so that she could read the placard now
suspended from the balcony rail, she announced:

"The next number is a waltz, Captain Benson.  Truly, I am eager to know
how you waltz.  It is a sailor's measure."

"Then perhaps you will favor me with a waltz, later in the evening,"
returned Jack, courteously.  "But if I had the impudence to ask you
for this waltz, and if you were generous enough to grant it to me, I
know what would happen."

"What, my friend?"

The word "friend" was gently spoken, but Jack Benson replied bluntly:

"Some of the men here would lynch me, later in the night, Mlle.
Nadiboff."

The young woman laughed musically, though, as Jack glanced away for an
instant, a frown flashed briefly over her face.

"You will not disappoint me, I know, Captain," she murmured,
persuasively.  "Besides, you are too brave to fear lynching for an act
that grants pleasure."

This was so direct that Jack Benson could not well escape.  Nor, truth
to tell, did he want to.  He found Mlle. Nadiboff's bright, gentle smile
most alluring.  So, when the music for the waltz sounded the submarine
captain led her forth on to the floor.

At the finish, after Jack had led his partner to a seat, Lieutenant
Featherstone joined them.  One or two others approached, and Benson
slipped away, though just before he did so the young woman's eyes met
his with a flash of invitation to seek her again later.

"You've been extremely, attentive, but I, imagine some of the other men
are combining to thrash you, Jack," smiled Farnum, when Benson returned
to his friends.

"Mlle. Nadiboff is a very delightful young woman," Jack answered,
heartily.  "I'm sorry you don't dance, Hal."

"If I were very sorry, I'd learn," rejoined Hastings, simply.

During the waltz and the number that followed Jack remained with his
friends, looking on.

Then Lieutenant Featherstone, feeling that the Navy must look to the
enjoyment of these strangers, came over to them.

"How many of you dance?" inquired the lieutenant.

"Two of us," answered Hal.  "I don't."

"Mr. Farnum, I must introduce you to an agreeable partner," urged the
Navy officer.  "Who shall it be?  I know most of the ladies here."

"Don't think me a bear, Mr. Featherstone, but I don't believe I'll
dance to-night, though I thank you tremendously," replied the
shipbuilder.

"Then, Benson, you must uphold the honor of your party," laughed the
lieutenant, linking his arm in Jack's and drawing him forward.

Captain Benson's next dance was with a California girl; after that he
led out a jolly young woman from New York.  As he left the latter
partner, Mlle. Nadiboff, on the arm of a gentleman, passed close enough
to murmur:

"Captain, you are neglecting me--and I have saved the next, a waltz,
for you."

Not being engaged for that waltz, Jack could hardly do, otherwise than
claim it.  Indeed, he greatly enjoyed dancing with this gracious,
handsome young woman.  Yet, soon after he had taken Mlle. Nadiboff
to her seat, and another partner appeared to claim her favor, Benson
slipped away.

"Go after Captain Benson, I beg of you, and bring him back here for
a moment," requested the young woman of her new partner.  That gentleman
obeyed, even if with a poor grace.  Jack returned, bowing, while the
gentleman walked away a few feet.

"Captain, you are a stranger here at Spruce Beach?" murmured Mlle.
Nadiboff, directing the full gaze of her luminous eyes at Jack's.

"Yes, truly."

"I go motoring at eleven in the morning.  I shall expect you here, at
that hour, to drive with me."

Jack looked as regretful as he felt.

"I'm very, very sorry, Mademoiselle" he replied.  "But I am here on
duty, and--"

"Duty?" she interrupted, with a light laugh. "And pray what is duty,
Captain, but a something with which to flavor our pleasures in life?"

"With me, Mlle. Nadiboff," Jack Benson replied, earnestly, "duty is
everything, pleasure included."

"I am not accustomed to having my commands disregarded," exclaimed the
young woman, though in a low tone, while her eyes flashed some of her
displeasure.

"You are giving me pain, Mademoiselle," Jack responded, gravely.
"Perhaps, at another time--"

"Enough sir!" the young woman interposed.  "And now I behold my next
partner glancing this way appealingly.  I shall speak with you the next
time we meet, Captain."

Jack bowed, withdrawing.  Making his way around the ballroom, he dropped
into a seat beside Mr. Farnum.

Even before Mlle. Nadiboff's partner could rejoin her, M. Lemaire
appeared around a palm at Mlle. Nadiboff's back as naturally as though
he had not been playing the eavesdropper.

"Have a care, Sara," he whispered, mockingly, "or you will fail in
making a fool of that young fellow!"

Half way through the next dance Jack and his friends remained in their
seats.  Then Hal, stifling a yawn behind his hand, remarked:

"I've a notion that I shall be asleep in a few minutes.  Late hours,
except on duty, don't jibe with our line of work."

"They don't," admitted Captain Jack, rising.

"Good, boys!" nodded Mr. Farnum, approvingly, as he also rose.  "The
more rest you have the keener your wits will be for your work."

So they left the ballroom, observed by but few.

Five minutes later Mlle. Nadiboff sat surrounded by three men, with
whom she was chatting gayly.  M. Lemaire approached her.  She greeted
him so pointedly that the other three men soon fell away.

"I can hardly congratulate you, Sara," hissed M. Lemaire, speaking in
French.

"You think I have not made young Benson attentive enough to my whims?"
the young woman asked, plaintively.

"Attentive?" sneered M. Lemaire.  "Do you know where he is now?"

"No," admitted Mlle. Nadiboff.

"He has gone away upstairs with his friends, that they may all be
prepared for an early and full day's work."

"You are jesting with me," protested Mlle. Nadiboff, indignantly.

"Take my arm, then, if you will," requested M. Lemaire.  "We will stroll
about, and we shall see if your eyes are keen enough to discover your
young submarine captain."

The young woman defiantly accepted the challenge.  By the time that
they had strolled around the ballroom scarlet spots glowed in her cheeks.
In either eye a tear of anger glistened behind the lash.

"Are you satisfied?" murmured M. Lemaire, in a low voice.

"I fear that I shall have to teach the young cub a lesson or two in the
art of showing devotion to a woman's wishes," Mlle. Nadiboff answered,
tremulously.

"Shall we walk in the grounds?"

"I beg you to take me out into the air," replied the young woman.

"Yes, it will be better," whispered her companion, cruelly.  "Your face
is aflame.  You will attract too much attention here, and too much
curiosity.  The American naval officers have sharp eyes--sometimes!"

Procuring his companion's wrap at the coatroom, and throwing a light
topcoat about himself, M. Lemaire led the way to a distant settee from
which they could look out over the star lit waters beyond the beach.
The man had an especial reason for choosing this seat.  From that place
they could quickly catch sight of anyone who came near enough to
overhear.

"Sara," began M. Lemaire, less brutally than his companion had expected
him to speak, "for once I fear that you are going to fail utterly."

"Then you do, not know me," she replied, with spirit.  "I shall win!
I shall have Captain Jack Benson carrying my fan and craving my smile.
And that shall be quickly, too!"

"If you do not succeed, Sara," retorted the man, "then sterner measures
will have to be tried.  This youthful Benson may even have to lose his
life in the attempt that must be made, at all hazards, to wrest from him
a set of drawings of the boat he commands, and a description of all her
working parts, and all the secrets of managing the boat!"

"If he could hear you, he would be charmed with the outlook," muttered
the young woman, shrugging her shoulders.

"Sara, do you comprehend the situation altogether?  The Pollard type of
submarine boat is now the most formidable and dangerous in the
world--and only the United States Government can buy boats from the
makers!  Any country in the world that goes to war with the United
States must be beaten unless that country knows how to provide itself
with submarine boats equal to those of the Pollard make.  You may be
sure that, at this moment, Spruce Beach is overrun with spies
representing every great government in the world.  The first country to
buy, steal, coax or drag out the Pollard secrets wins!  You know the
master we serve, Sara, among the governments.  We must be the spies
who win--even though all the Pollard crew have to be destroyed!"




CHAPTER IV

KAMANAKO APPEARS ON THE SCENE


Had Jack Benson or Hal Hastings heard that strange talk, perhaps neither
of them would have slept as soundly that night.

As it was, both submarine boys slept more soundly and sweetly than any
other human being in that great hotel, unless, possibly, it were Jacob
Farnum.

At daylight all three were astir.

Wrapped in bathrobes that concealed their bathing suits the three made
their way down to the beach.  There, for ten minutes, they enjoyed
themselves in the surf.

"Seems mighty queer to be bathing in salt water in December, doesn't
it?" demanded Hal, gleefully, as, with both hands, he launched a column
of salt water that caught Jack neatly in the face.

"Anyway, I believe it's just what the family medical man ordered,"
chuckled Mr. Farnum, as he stepped shoreward, then ran briskly up and
down the beach before he went in again for a final plunge.

Over to the bath house, where an attendant had carried their clothing,
the three now hastened.  After a brisk rub-down and dressing, these
three from the "Benson" presented themselves in the hotel dining room,
where, at this very early hour, they were privileged to breakfast all
by themselves.

"The way my appetite feels," laughed Jack, enjoyably, "I pity the guests
who have to follow us at table."

"There won't be any breakfast left.  They can have lunch," declared Hal
Hastings, gravely.

Hardly had the food been placed before them when Mr. Farnum glanced up,
to find at his elbow a bowing, smiling little Japanese.

"Honorable sir, may I address you while you eat?" inquired the little
brown man.

"Why not?" asked Farnum, good-humoredly.  "Take a chair, won't you,
Mr.--"

"Kamanako is my name, honorable sir," replied the Japanese, with three
more bows.

"Take a seat, won't you, Mr. Kamanako?"  Mr. Farnum invited him again.

"It is much better, honorable sir, that I stand."

"Why?"

"Because I am servant."

"Not here, surely," replied the shipbuilder.  "All the waiters here
are negroes."

"Not all in kitchen, honorable sir," responded the Japanese, with an air
of great deference.  "Some in kitchen are Japanese."

"Are you employed in the kitchen, Mr. Kamanako?" asked the shipbuilder.

"Until to-day, honorable sir."

"Meaning you have left the employ of the hotel?"

"Yes, honorable sir."

"Then you're going away from here?"

"I hope to follow the sea, honorable sir.  I am a sailor.  All my
ancestors before me were sailors.  We love the salt water."

"There is something, then, that I can do for you, isn't there?" guessed
the shipbuilder.

"If you will be so good, honorable sir.  I seek to become steward aboard
your boat."

"Oh," replied M. Farnum, understanding, at last.  "You will have to
speak to Captain Benson about that."

He indicated Jack by a nod, so the little Japanese turned to Benson
with another bow.

Now, as it happened, a steward was just what Captain Benson wanted.
Such duties, formerly, had fallen upon Eph Somers.  But now cooking and
serving meals did not exactly jibe with Eph's present position aboard
the "Benson" Eph was really first officer or mate.

"Yes, we want a steward," Jack admitted.  "There's just one drawback,
though, Kamanako.  We can carry very few people aboard, so that everyone
who does ship with us has to count.  In other words, our steward must
also cook the meals in the galley."

"I think that will be all right, honorable Captain," replied the
Japanese, thoughtfully.  "How many have you on board?"

"Six," answered the young submarine commander.

Kamanako thoughtfully counted that number on his fingers.

"It is not too many," replied the Japanese.  "What do you pay, honorable
Captain?"

"Forty dollars, and found."

"I will accept, honorable Captain."

"Are you sure that you can cook well enough for hungry sailors?"

"I am satisfied that I can cook for anyone, honorable Captain," rejoined
the little brown man, rather proudly.

"That sounds well enough," smiled Jack.  "Have you had your breakfast,
Kamanako?"

"Oh, yes, honorable Captain."

"Then, if you'll wait for us, we'll take you aboard.  We shall be going
in a half an hour, or sooner."

"Would it not be as well, honorable Captain, if I go out before you?"
asked Kamanako, respectfully.

"No," smiled, Benson.  "Our first officer, Mr. Somers, does not take
kindly to strangers who are not introduced."

"Then, if I may suggest--if honorable Captain will write note for
me--then I might go out sooner."

"If you want to go aboard, Kamanako, we'll take you out when we go,"
Jack replied.  He was annoyed, though he could not have told why, by
the little brown man's insistence.

Smiling and bowing again, Kamanako left the dining room.  He was waiting,
though, when the others came out.  As all three carried dress suit cases
the Japanese quietly took those belonging to Mr. Farnum and Captain
Benson.

"Most sorry I have not three hands, honorable officer," Kamanako assured
Hal Hastings.

There were always plenty of shore boats at Spruce Beach.  Just now, on
account of the visit of the submarine, there appeared to be more of the
small craft than usual.  So the submarine party had no difficulty in
finding transportation at once.  Looking out into the harbor they beheld
the "Benson," surrounded by more than a score of rowboats containing
sight-seers.  Eph Somers, backed by Williamson, stood on the platform
deck, doggedly driving away people who wanted to come on board.  Yet
Eph kept wholly good-natured about it, for he could quite appreciate the
curiosity of the sight-seers.

As this last boat from shore made its way, through the concourse of
boats Jack heard a sudden, joyous hail in a woman's voice.

"Oh, here he is--my gallant young captain."

"Mlle. Nadiboff!" ejaculated Jack, under his breath.

Jacob Farnum turned his head away for an instant, but the young captain
heard the unmistakable sound of a chuckle from the shipbuilder.

Kamanako turned his mild eyes inquiringly in the direction of the
handsome young woman, as though he wondered who she might be.

"Good morning, Mademoiselle," was Jack's greeting, as he courteously
lifted his uniform cap.  Hal and Mr. Farnum also uncovered.  Then the
boat ran alongside, and all four clambered on the deck.

In another instant.  Mlle. Nadiboff's boat was also alongside.

"You are going to be kind, my Captain, and invite me aboard?" asked the
young woman.   Eph Somers, who was never intentionally rude to a woman,
found himself staring with all his eyes, whereat he colored hotly.

"I shall be very glad to invite you as far as I am permitted to invite
visitors," Benson replied.  Then, turning briefly to Eph, he muttered:

"The Japanese is to be cook and steward.  Take him below, and show
him the galley and the supplies."

Then Benson turned to reach down his hand to Mlle. Sara Nadiboff, who
trustingly extended her hand to him.  She slipped.  Jack was obliged
to throw his left arm lightly around her waist in order to draw her
in safety to the platform deck.  Mr. Farnum, after seeing her safely
aboard, vanished inside the conning tower, going below to smile quietly
to himself.

"As gallant as ever, my Captain!" murmured the handsome young woman
spy, gazing almost tenderly into Jack's face.  "What a very strange
craft!  And now, conduct me below, please.  I am much interested in
seeing how you all live aboard such a little and odd vessel of war."

"I am utterly sorry, Mademoiselle," Jack Benson replied.  "But my orders
are that no visitors except naval officers, or those brought aboard by
naval officers, may see the interior of the boat."

"Yet that Japanese has just gone below!" remonstrated Mlle. Nadiboff.

"The Japanese," replied the young captain, "is our cook and steward, and
belongs below."

A light glowed swiftly in Mlle. Nadiboff's eyes, but disappeared almost
instantly.

The handsome young woman opened her mouth as though to speak, then
compressed her lips tightly.




CHAPTER V

EPH LEARNS SOMETHING NEW


"You are not as gallant as you were last night," murmured Mlle. Sara, in
a low tone.

"Last night I was ashore, on social pleasures bent," replied Jack.
"To-day, I am on duty, and duty must go ahead of everything else."

"And I am hungry," continued the young woman, pathetically.  "In my
eagerness to see that boat that you command, my Captain, I came away
from the shore before going through the ceremony of breakfast.  Do you
mean to say, Captain Benson, that you cannot conduct me to your cabin,
there to have that--your Japanese--serve me with at least a sandwich?"

"Mademoiselle," cried Jack, apologetically, "you can't have the faintest
idea how sorry I am that my instructions are what they are I feel wicked
as I look at your distress, but it is simply wholly impossible for me to
ask you below.  I can have food served to you on deck, however."

"What?  Eat here before the eyes of all Spruce Beach?  And have it made
perfectly plain to every onlooker that I am not welcome here?" cried the
woman spy, reproachfully.

"Oh, but, indeed, you are welcome here," protested Jack.  "As welcome as
I am permitted to make anyone.  My orders, you know--I am a slave to
those orders."

"Yet there is some one aboard," urged Mlle. Nadiboff, in her most
pleading voice, while there was an almost tearful look in her pretty
eyes, "some one who can change the orders.  Your Mr. Farnum, I take it.
Go to him, won't you, and plead with him for me?  Go!"

One of her little, gloved hands rested on his arm, pushing gently.

But Jack Benson, though she made him feel inwardly at odds with himself,
thought more of his duty than of anything else.

"I am very sorry--awfully sorry, Mlle. Nadiboff.  But won't you
understand that what you ask is wholly impossible?"

"Good-bye, then!" she said, resentfully, though gently, half turning
from him.

"You'll shake hands, won't you?" asked Jack, holding out his own right
hand.

"Perhaps, after I have talked with you on shore--when we meet again,"
she replied, a bit distantly.  Then she turned to Williamson as her boat
came in close alongside.  "Your hand, please.  I am afraid I may slip."

Williamson helped that most attractive young woman down over the side,
lifting his cap after he had seen her safe aboard the rowboat.  As
the harbor craft veered off, Captain Jack Benson lifted his cap with
all courtesy.  Mlle. Sara Nadiboff bowed to him rather coldly.

"I suppose," sighed Jack, to himself, as he turned away, "a woman can't
begin to understand why we must be so secret aboard a submarine craft
that all the naval men in the world would like to know about.  If she
only could understand!"

Had Benson been able to guess just how well the handsome young spy did
understand, and how much she had hoped to learn through appealing to his
interest in her, he would have been furious at the thought of his own
great simplicity.

"Your charming partner of last night was rather disappointed," observed
Hal Hastings.

"Yes; she must feel that I have used her mighty shabbily," Jack
responded.  "I am afraid she won't forgive me."

"Oh, well, after a few days you'll never see her again," murmured Hal.
"Just because a girl is pleasant--and pretty--one can't forget all the
orders that he's working under."

Captain Jack Benson talked to himself in about the same strain, yet he
couldn't wholly get over the notion that he had been--though
helplessly--rude to a woman.

"You won't need me on deck any more, will you, sir?" asked Williamson,
saluting.

"No; I shall be on deck," Jack replied, returning the salute.  "Very
likely Mr. Hastings will be here with me, for that matter."

Soon after the machinist had gone below Eph Somers returned to the deck.

"I've been posting that Kimono," Eph explained.

"Kamanako," laughed Captain Jack.

"Oh, it's all the same to me," sighed Eph.  "To my untrained ear all
Japanese names sound alike."

"Whatever you do," warned Jack, "don't, hurt the poor fellow's feelings
by calling him Kimono."

"Why not?"

"Well, the Japanese are a proud and sensitive race.

"Suppose they are?"

"Do you know what 'Kimono' means, Eph?"

"Haven't even a guilty suspicion."

"It's the Japanese name for a woman's dress."

"Wow!" muttered Somers.  "I shall surely have to, forget 'Kimono,' then.
What do you call his truly name?"

"Kamanako," Jack responded, and spelled it.  Eph wrote the name down
on a slip of paper, saying:

"Thank you, Jack.  I'll try to commit this name to memory.  I don't want
to hurt the feelings of a sensitive little fellow.  It would be a shame
to have to punch him if he felt insulted and made a pass at me."

"Punch him, eh?" laughed Jack in genuine enjoyment.  "Eph!  Eph!  Don't
make any false start like that!"

"What are you talking about?" questioned Somers.

"Don't make the mistake, at any time, Of trying to punch that Japanese."

"Trying to?" gasped Somers.  "Say, if I made a swing at that light
colored little chocolate drop, do you think I'd make a false pass and
hit my own nose?"

"You might be lucky if nothing worse happened," grinned Jack.  "Eph,
did you never hear of the Japanese jiu-jitsu?"

"What's that?" demanded young Somers.  "Slang name for something else
in the Jap wardrobe?"

"No; it's the Jap way of fighting," Captain Benson explained.  "And you
want to remember, Eph, that's it's a mighty sudden system, too.  It hits
like lightning.  When the smoke clears away you see a little Japanese
bowing over you, and apologizing for having rudely tipped you over."

"And little Cabbage-Jacko could do that?" Eph grinned, incredulously.
"Say, it's wrong to tell me such funny things when I have a cracked lip."

"All right," sighed Jack.  "But at least you've been warned."

Truth to tell, the young submarine commander wasn't much worried about
Eph's deliberately provoking any fistic encounter with a fellow much
smaller than himself.  In the first place, the carroty-haired boy wasn't
quarrelsome, unless actually driven into a fight.  At all times Somers
was too manly to take out wrath on anyone merely up to his own shoulder
height.

Nearly an hour later Jack Benson stepped through into the conning tower;
then moved down the spiral staircase.

His rubber-soled deck shoes made no noise.  Thus it happened that the
young submarine commander came upon the new steward most un expectedly,
and without being seen by the little, brown man.

"Kamanako--you scoundrel!" shouted the young captain, beside himself
with sudden wrath.

For the Japanese, wholly absorbed in his present task, had deftly
removed the gauge from the midships submergence apparatus, and was now
dissecting the gauge itself, eyeing the parts with the knowing look of
an expert.

At sound of the captain's voice Kamanako wheeled calmly about, holding
up the gauge.  The smile on the face of the Japanese was childlike and
bland.

"This very queer thing," he murmured.  "What for you use
it--thermometer."

"No," retorted Jack Benson, frigidly, eyeing the detected one.  "It's a
barometer, and it shows which way a meddler blows in!"

"I don't understand," remarked the Japanese, looking perplexed.

"Then I'll help you to understand.  First of all, put that gauge down
on the table!"

Kamanako did so, then made a little bow.

"Now," continued Jack Benson, "take cap and go up on deck."

"What shall I do there, Captain?" asked Kamanako, politely.

"Well, you'll stand there until I see if you've done anything else on
board.  If you haven't, you can then take a boat to the shore--and stay
there."

"What this mean, honorable Captain?" demanded Kamanako, a look of
offense beginning to creep into his little, brown face.

"Well, if you must have it," returned Benson, coldly, "it means that
I've found you spying into our mechanisms here.  Now, a spy is a
creature no one cares to have about--least of all on a warship."

"You call me spy--call me ugly name like that?" cried Kamanako, showing
his teeth.

"Get your hat and go up on deck.  Do you hear me?" insisted Captain Jack.

"I hear you, but I please myself about when I do it," retorted the
Japanese, drawing himself up to his full though not very imposing height.

"Then you'll go without waiting for your hat," retorted Benson, his
patience rapidly oozing now.  He started toward the Japanese, just
as Eph, hearing the sound of talking, looked in and down the staircase.

"Gunpowder and smoke!" ejaculated the carroty-topped boy.  "It's little
chocolate drop!"

"Are you going up on deck quietly and in an orderly way?" demanded
Benson, a resolute glitter in his clear, blue eyes.

"I please myself," retorted Kamanako, defiantly.

At that Jack Benson promptly forgot the warning he had given Eph, and
sprang at the inquisitive steward.

"You'll go--" began Benson.

He was in error, though.  It was he himself who "went."  As he reached
out with his right hand to seize Kamanako something happened.  Exactly
what it was the young submarine captain never quite knew.  But he found
himself sprawling under the seat at the opposite side of the cabin.

"Hi, yi!  Wow!" exploded Eph, darting down the stairs.  "Save some of
that for me!"

It was ready and waiting.

The carroty-topped boy crouched low, resting his hands on his knees,
after the manner of a football player awaiting an assault.

Kamanako slid in close.  Ere Eph could seize him the Japanese let
himself fall lightly on one side.  One of his feet hooked itself behind
Eph's advanced left ankle, the other foot pressing against the knee of
the same leg.  Eph's ankle was yanked forward, his knee pressed back,
and Somers went toppling as a tree in the forest does.

Kamanako was so quickly on his feet again to suggest that he had fallen
and risen in the same movement.  There was a quiet, yet dangerous, smile
on the face of the Japanese.

The door of the engine room opened swiftly though noiselessly.
Williamson, the machinist, took in the whole scene instantly.  Hardly a
full step forward he took when his fist landed between the shoulders of
Kamanako, sending that young Japanese through the air, to land sprawling.

As Kamanako leaped to his feet he found himself blinking at the muzzle
of a revolver that the machinist held in his right hand.




CHAPTER VI

THE LITTLE RUSSIAN HAS HER WAY


"Don't get troublesome," advised the machinist, softly.  "I've never shot
a Jap, but I've always wanted to."

There was a flicker of a grin in Williamson's face that found a
reflection in Kamanako's own features.

By this time Jack Benson was on his feet, a bit ruffled though with all
his wits about him.  At the same time Hal Hastings peered down from the
top of the staircase.

"You've had all the fun so far, Kamanako," Jack admitted.  "But now
you've got to get off this boat mighty quick.  Do you choose to go
without any more fuss?"

"I go when I get ready," retorted the Japanese, sullenly.

"What's the matter, Jack?" asked Hal, slowly.

"I've caught a dirty spy at work overhauling our mechanisms," replied
the young submarine boat commander.

With something of a snarl Kamanako turned as though to spring at Benson
again.  The sight of Williamson, immovable as a piece of marble, yet
holding that revolver suggestively, cooled the Japanese ardor.

"How will it do, Captain," queried Hal, "if I pass the word to the
gunboat and, have a file of marines come over to take charge of this
spy?"

"First rate," clicked Benson, and Kamanako looked decidedly uneasy.  He
had his own reasons why he didn't care to be placed under arrest by
United States troops.

Eph, striking on his head, had been knocked senseless.  He was too
strong, however, too full of vitality, to remain knocked out for long.
Now, he half opened his eyes, as he murmured:

"How beautifully the birds are singing today!  And there's mother,
letting down the bars so the cows can go to the milking shed!"

Jack laughed, in spite of himself.  Then he turned to the Japanese.

"Kamanako, do you want to go quietly, or remain to see what the Navy
officers do with you?"

"I go now," replied the Japanese, with a shrug of his shoulders.

Turning, he started up the step, while Hal Hastings, regaining the deck
before him, hailed one of the harbor boats.

Jack darted to where Eph was trying to sit up, and raised him to one
of the cabin seats.

"What do you think, now, of jiu-jitsu?" asked the young captain.

"I don't know," confessed Somers, sheepishly.  "I didn't see any of it."

At this moment a stateroom door opened and Jacob Farnum thrust his
head out.

"Anything happening?" inquired the ship builder.

"No, sir," Jack answered.  "It's all over."

Mr. Farnum came out, to ask further particulars.  Williamson, as soon as
he had seen the Japanese disappear up aloft, dropped his revolver back
into his pocket, closing the engine room door.

Eph, however, had his own private idea of vengeance to execute.  Up the
stairs he went, holding hard to the spiral rail, for he was still a bit
dizzy.  Kamanako, having dropped into the stern of a shore boat, looked
unconcerned as he was pulled away.

"Yah!" grunted Eph, shaking his fist.  "You kimono!  Kimono!  Kimono!"

"What does that mean when it's translated?" inquired Hal, looking
interested.

"That's a Japanese insult," grinned young Somers.

"Do you think Kamanako understands it?" queried Hastings.

"If he doesn't then what good does it do him to be Japanese?" Eph
demanded.

Jacob Farnum listened with great interest to what his young captain had
to tell him.  David Pollard, being still asleep, had no notion, as yet,
of what had happened.

"I reckon," muttered the shipbuilder, "It won't be any use to have any
Japanese aboard here as steward, or as anything else."

"I shan't hire any more of them," Benson replied.  "I shall always
suspect a spy, after this, when I see any Japanese aboard any kind of a
war craft, or serving at any military post."

"I'm sorry I missed seeing Eph do the flying somersault act, though,"
laughed Mr. Farnum.

"I missed it as much as you did," admitted Jack Benson.  "At the moment
my face was buried in the carpet."

When the two ascended to the platform deck Captain Jack asked, soberly:

"Well, Eph, what is your present opinion about the ability of a Japanese
to look after himself?"

"Don't rub it in," muttered Somers, with another sheepish grin.

"Oh, that's all right," retorted Jack.  "I came in for pretty nearly as
much as you did.  I may meet Kamanako again, however.  If I do, I'll pay
him back."

"What?" gasped young Somers.  "Jack Benson, I thought you knew enough to
be sure when you've had plenty!"

"I'll pay that little fellow back, just the same, if I ever get a
half-way chance," insisted Benson.

"Please yourself," muttered Eph, grimly.  "As for me, I'm not looking
for any damages.  I've had plenty of 'em already."

Not much later the submarine people were favored by a visit from some
of the officers of the gunboat.

Plans were discussed for making some displays of the submarine's strong
points on another day.  When the officers had gone, Mr. Farnum turned to
the boys to propose:

"You've never seen any of the country around Spruce Beach.  Neither have
I.  What do you say if we go ashore?  I'll charter an auto, and we can
have quite a trip before it's luncheon time.  Then we'll come back and
eat at the hotel."

Right under the shadow of the gunboat, Williamson could be relied upon
as being sufficient guard.  But David Pollard declined to go ashore, on
the plea that he had some letters to write, which left a guard of two
on board.

It was eleven o'clock, just to the minute, as the automobile chartered
by Mr. Farnum came around the corner of the hotel veranda.  At that same
instant another and handsomer car came rolling into sight.  The door of
the ladies' parlor opened, and Mlle. Sara Nadiboff, arrayed with
unusually pleasing effect, came out.

As she caught sight of Jack she started, then came eagerly over to him,
holding out her hand.

"Here comes my car," she murmured.  "And I see, my Captain, that you have
changed your mind.  You will drive with me this morning."

"I'm sorry that I can't," Benson replied, and he meant it.  "But I am
engaged to go with Mr. Farnum and our party."

"You prefer to avoid me?" cried Mlle. Nadiboff, reproachfully, raising
her eyes swiftly to his.

"Now, please don't say that," begged Benson.  "I wish you could
understand, Mademoiselle, how far from the truth it is."

"Say but the word, and Mr. Farnum will pardon you," coaxed the charming
young Woman.

"I couldn't even think of that," replied Benson.  "It is business to go
with one's employer."

"Business?" repeated Mlle. Nadiboff, with an accent half of disdain.
"Surely, you are not sufficiently a petty shop-keeper or serf to think
always of that word, 'business!'"

"I fear I am," Jack nodded.

"Bah!  Then you will never be a success with the ladies," taunted
Mlle. Nadiboff, though her eyes were laughing, challenging.

"Of course, I'm only a green country boy," Jack replied, with admirable
coolness, and without any tone of offence.  "So my highest ambition is
to be a success in the submarine business."

The young woman had tact enough to perceive that she had not quite
scored by her contempt for business.  She was about to change subject
adroitly, when Mr. Farnum called, laughingly:

"Are you coming with us, captain?  Or, have you found pleasanter company
for a drive?"

Jack's hand started toward his uniform cap.  He was about to excuse
himself, when the young woman answered for him:

"He was just assuring me, Mr. Farnum, that he would gladly go with me,
but that you had the right of prior engagement."

"Oh, I'll release, him," volunteered Mr. Farnum, his eyes twinkling.

"Now, my Captain, you can no longer find excuse, unless you truly prefer
other company to mine."

Though Jack was interested in the vivacious manner of Mlle. Nadiboff, he
had not yet lost his head under any of her flatteries.  He was secretly
irritated against Mr. Farnum for letting him off so easily.  So Jack
swiftly determined upon his own plan of evening matters.

"The way the affair has turned out, Mademoiselle, I shall be delighted
to go in your cars.  Yet I am going to ask one every great favor."

"A thousand, if you wish!" cried the young woman spy, graciously.

"Will you permit me to invite my chum, Mr. Hastings?"

"Assuredly," she replied, with a very pretty pout, "if you feel that you
will find my company, alone, too dull."

"It isn't that," Jack replied, with ready gallantry.  "I am anxious to
have Hastings share my rare good fortune."

Then raising his voice he called:

"Hal, Mlle. Nadiboff desires me to invite you to come, too."

Young Hastings was quick-witted enough to understand that this was all
but a command from his chum.  So he hastily left Mr. Farnum, stepping
over to join the other party.  Mlle. Nadiboff's little booted right foot
tapped the flooring of the veranda impatiently, but that was the only
sign of displeasure she gave.  Her eyes were as laughing and as
gracious as ever.  She extended her hand to Hal, who bowed low over it
in knightly style--a trick he had caught from his observation of naval
officers.

Then, as though to punish Jack, Mlle. Nadiboff asked:

"You will hand me into the car, Mr. Hastings?"

Hal did so, taking the seat beside her in the tonneau.  Jack Benson,
suppressing a twinkle that struggled to his eyes, closed the tonneau
door, then stepped in on the front seat beside the chauffeur.

Despite her own cleverness, the young woman gave a slight gasp of
astonishment over this swift arrangement.

"Decidedly, my young captain is not wholly, a fool," she told herself.
"When I seek to snub him, he puts it past my power.  However, it may
be that this young engineer will be better suited to my purpose. I will
study him."

"Toot!  toot!" The Farnum auto, getting away first, went past them,
sounding its whistle while Mr. Farnum and Eph lifted their hats.

"Our gallant friend, the captain, must feel out of conceit with me,"
laughed Mlle. Nadiboff to Hal.  "He prefers the chauffeur's company to
mine.  So we must console ourselves."

Though he had not been able to hear any of the conversation, M. Lemaire,
looking out from behind the lace curtains of a parlor window, had seen
what had happened.

"Sara is doing better this morning," he muttered to himself.  "Though
why should she take two of the young men with her?  Ah, I see that she
has the engineer at her side, while young Benson rides on the front
seat.  Clever little woman!  She is going to make the young captain
jealous!  Well enough does she know how to do that!"

Not quite so well pleased was the young woman herself, as the drive
proceeded.  Though she did all in her power to charm Hal, and though she
did succeed in interesting him, she could not draw the boy out into much
conversation.  Hal usually had little to say.  Though he answered Mlle.
Nadiboff courteously from time to time, he did not utter many words.
Indeed, he appeared to be thinking of something far remote from the
present scene.

"Are you bored, Mr. Hastings?  Does the sound of my voice annoy you?"
asked Mlle. Nadiboff, as the auto flew over the quiet country roads
inland from Spruce Beach.

"Good gracious, no!" replied Hal.

"Then why do you say so little?"

"Because you say it so much better, Mademoiselle."

"But flattery will never take the place of interested conversation."

"Engineers don't talk much," protested Hal.

"So they think a great deal.  Of what were you thinking?"

"Oh?" murmured Hal.  "Oh, I was thinking of my engine, I guess."

Mlle. Nadiboff bit her lips in secret rage.  If she had felt that she
was doing poorly with Captain Jack Benson, evidently she was now seated
beside an absent-minded sphinx.

"What place is that over there?" inquired Hal, coming out of a brown
study as he felt some reproach in the stiffening attitude of his
companion.

Hal's eye had been caught by what looked like the ruins of an old castle.
Such sights are at least rare in the United States.

"That ruin, do you mean?" asked Mlle. Nadiboff.  "Oh, it is a quaint bit
of a castle, only some three hundred years old, though long past in
ruins.  I believe it was erected as a stronghold by some wealthy man,
in the old days when the pirates from Havana now and then swept along
the coast on their raids.  Would you like to see the place, Mr.
Hastings?"

"Very much indeed," Hal admitted, "if you have the time."

"The time?" Mlle. Nadiboff's laughter rippled out merrily.  "Why, I have
all the time in the world, Mr. Hastings.  I live only to enjoy myself."

"That must be rather a dull existence, then," thought Hal, while his
pretty companion leaned forward to give the order to the chauffeur, who
turned up a road leading to the ruined castle of the old piratical days.

Jack had heard the conversation, and so knew, without asking, for what
they were now heading.

As they drew closer they discovered other automobiles near the old
castle.

"The place has several visitors to-day?" hinted Hal.

"Oh, yes; it is one of the show spots of this section," replied Mlle.
Nadiboff.  "It does well enough to look about there for a few minutes.
But a ruin like that suggests death and decay, and I--I love life."

"Still, that castle is now a part of history," suggested Hal, "and
history, it seems to me, should always be interesting."

"This stupid young engineer!" fumed Mlle. Nadiboff, to herself.  "He
would drive me wild, if I saw much of him.  I think even my slow little
captain will prove more romantic."

Though neither of the submarine boys could yet suspect it, they were soon
to stumble into much more than relics of the past.

They were destined to find themselves exposed to one of the greatest
surprises of their already eventful lives.

"Here we are," cried Mlle. Nadiboff, as the auto stopped near the north
end of the castle.  "May you discover something to interest you!"

The submarine boys certainly did!




CHAPTER VII

A POINTER "JOLTS" THE SUBMARINE CAPTAIN


There was not much left of the old castle, save the walls, and some badly
crumbled ruins of inner buildings.

"The Florida climate doesn't seem to agree with castles," suggested Jack.
"I have, an idea that, in Europe, a castle only three hundred years old
would last much longer and keep much better."

"In Europe?" repeated Mlle. Nadiboff.  "Oh, yes; much better.  But then,
perhaps in Europe there would be a feeling of veneration for the old
that would lead the people to take much better care of their castles.
It would be so in my country, I know."

"May I ask what is your country, Mademoiselle?" asked Jack, looking up
and into her face.

"Guess, Mr. Yankee!"

"Why, I would guess that you are a Russian."

"You are worthy of the name of Yankee, then.  Yes; I am a Russian."

Another party of sight-seers passed them at that moment, and one man was
heard to remark:

"At the south end of the castle is a stairway leading down to an
underground dungeon.  Legend tells us that some forty Spanish pirates
were once confined there, for a month, before permission was received
from the governor to hang the Spaniards."

"Did you hear that?" murmured Jack, interestedly.  "A real, old dungeon,
with an interesting history."

"Such a history merely afflicts me with a shudder," replied Mlle.
Nadiboff, shrugging her shoulders.

"By Jove, I believe I'd like to have just a glimpse of that old dungeon,
Mademoiselle, if I am not tiring you or wasting your time."

"You will have to go alone, then," replied the young woman.  "I will
wait, my Captain."

"I will remain with Mlle. Nadiboff," volunteered Hal.

So Jack Benson, after raising his cap, stepped off rapidly toward the
southern end of the old ruin.

With much difficulty he found the entrance to the stairway leading below.
At the head of the stairs two youngish men were standing.  The face of
one of them looked familiar.

"How do you do, Captain?" nodded that one.  "You don't recall me, I
guess.  I saw you, yesterday, only for a moment at the rail of the
gunboat.  My name is Hennessy, one of the newspaper men who visited
your wonderful craft yesterday."

"I am glad to meet you again," Jack replied, "and sorry that we couldn't
show you more."

"This is my friend, Mr. Graham," continued the newspaper man.  "Graham
is the Washington correspondent for my paper, so of course he has heard
of your boats before."

"If you had been aboard," smiled Jack, "you might have seen something in
the way of a little news happening."

"What was that?"

"Why, we found a new Japanese steward, whom we had engaged, absorbed in
his study of some of our mechanisms.  So we had to induce him to quit
our service and go back to shore again."

"A spy, eh?" smiled Graham.  "There are many of them about.  Wherever
there is anything connected with our national defense the spies of
Europe are sure to flock, until they have learned all they want to know.
And I suspect that they rarely fail,  in the end.  You were fortunate
to catch your Japanese at his tricks at so early a stage in the game."

"I wish all these spies could be herded together and hanged!" muttered
Captain Jack, in honest indignation.

"Do you?" asked Graham, looking at the boy, with a queer smile.

"Can you doubt it?" challenged Jack.

Graham was silent for a few moments, puffing at his cigar.  Then,
speaking very slowly, he went on:

"Captain Benson, I wonder if you would be much offended if I offered you
some information that might prove of much value to you?"

"What makes you think, sir, I'm such a fool as that?" asked Jack, gazing
at the Washington correspondent in great astonishment.

"One sometimes has to use a good deal of caution, even in offering
well-intended information," replied the Washington correspondent,
"Benson, I've been stationed at the national capital for eight years,
now.  I meet all kinds of people, and I see a good many others whom I
don't get to know, and don't want to know, and yet I become familiar
with their histories."

"I don't doubt that, sir," Jack assented.  "The life of a Washington
correspondent must be full of interesting things and experiences."

"Washington itself is full of foreign spies," pursued Graham, studying
the ash on the end of his cigar.  "After a newspaper man has been in
Washington a while he begins to have people pointed out to him who are
either known or believed to be in the employ of foreign governments for
the purpose of getting information that our national authorities would
much rather conceal."

"That must be true," agreed Benson.  "And I suppose there are some very
clever men engaged in that peculiar line of business."

"Some of the smartest of them are not men, but women," continued Mr.
Graham.  "Men, perhaps, direct them, but the women spies, when they are
young and good-looking, can usually coax a lot of information."

"Oho!  I'd like to get a look, some time, at one of these clever women
spies," declared Jack, much interested.

"That's just what I'm coming to," pursued the Washington correspondent.
"I hope you won't be offended, Benson, but I understand you have
already paid some attention to one of the brightest women in this line."

"Mlle. Nadiboff?" cried Jack, guessing instantly what the other sought
to convey.

"Yes," nodded Graham.  "Though I believe, when I first saw her, eight
years ago, she was using some other name than Nadiboff."

"Eight years ago," smiled Jack, "she must have been about thirteen years
old.  Do they employ, spies at such a tender age?"

"Eight years ago," retorted Graham, "this young woman was, I should say,
about twenty-one years old.  I am aware that she looks hardly older
to-day.  When I saw you with her ten minutes ago it was the first hint
I had that she was in Florida."

"So she's a spy?" muttered Jack Benson, speaking more to himself.  "Then
I can understand why she seemed so anxious to interest me.  I was not
wrong about that."

"No," laughed Graham.  "Beyond a doubt the young woman is very anxious
to please you, and to keep your interest.  You happen to command a type
of submarine torpedo boat in which all the world is at present much
interested.  By the way, I wonder if Mlle. Nadiboff, as you call her,
works under the directions of the same chief?  He was a man--"

Here the Washington correspondent gave a description that caused Jack
Benson to exclaim:

"Why, that's M. Lemaire, to a dot!"

"I guess there's no doubt about it, then," laughed Mr. Graham.  "You've
fallen into the hands of a pair of the boldest, wickedest and cleverest
of foreign spies."

"I thank you heartily for informing me about them," breathed Jack Benson,
his eyes gleaming as he thought of the pair.  "But there's one thing
that puzzles me.  Mlle. Nadiboff is a Russian, and M. Lemaire must be a
Frenchman.  Then which country owns that precious pair?"

"Spies rarely have any country," smiled the washington correspondent.
"They work for whichever government will pay them best.  Today they will
sell out their employers of yesterday."

"They're a noble lot, then," grunted Jack, disgustedly.

Mr. Hennessy proposed that they go down to have a look at the dungeon
underground.  While they were examining that damp, slimy old cell, the
conversation continued.

"Has either of that pair seen you, Mr. Graham?" asked Jack.

"I don't believe it.  I'm not stopping at the Hotel Clayton."

"Then neither of them will suspect that I've been posted," muttered
Benson, with a short laugh.

"Why do you say that?"

"Because I rather think," smiled the young submarine captain, "that I
may attempt to pay that pair back in their own coin--somehow.  By the
way, do either of them know you well when they see you?"

"They might remember me as a newspaper writer," replied Graham.  "So
I'll keep out of the way."

"It won't be necessary for me to keep out of the way," added Hennessy.
"I don't know either Mlle. Nadiboff or her companion; and, besides,  I'm
here openly as a reporter interested in the submarine craft."

By this time the three had returned to the upper air.

"I'll vanish, now," proposed Mr. Graham.  "But you, Hennessy, if Captain
Benson doesn't mind, might as well go along with him.  You may get a
good look at the Nadiboff woman.  You, too, may think her very young.
She has a knack of keeping so.  Yet she's at least twenty-eight or
thirty.  Good-bye, for the present!"

Graham turned, losing himself from their sight amid the ruins.  Hennessy
walked with Jack back to where Hal and the woman awaited them.

Jack's mind was rapidly revolving plans for teaching some one a lesson
that would not be forgotten.




CHAPTER VIII

EVEN UP FOR MR. KAMANAKO


"This is Mr. Hennessy, one of the newspaper men who visited our boat
yesterday afternoon," said Jack, on rejoining his companions.  "Mr.
Hennessy has been returning good for evil.  While I am unable to tell
him any of the things he wants most to know about our boat, he, on the
other hand, has been telling me much of interest about these ruins."

"There are a lot of legends about this old wreck of a castle," laughed
Hennessy.  "Most of them are too silly to consider for a moment.  One
of the old stories has to do with a secret passage.  Some of the guides
hereabouts show what they solemnly explain was one of the outlets of
the secret passage in bygone days.  Do you care to devote five minutes
to looking at the ridiculous thing?"

Mlle. Nadiboff smilingly accepted the suggestion, so Hal and Jack also
agreed.  The reporter led the way across a field, pausing at last before
a fringe of weeds and low bushes.

"Now, just step through this wild hedge," Hennessy proposed, smilingly,
"and you'll see how little it takes to start a yarn.  Look out, though,
that you don't fall down."

As they stepped through the fringe cautiously the members of the party
found themselves peering down the shaft of what appeared to be a very
ordinary well.  It was circular, in shape, and had been laid, on the
inside, with a masonry of stones.

"There is water at the bottom, isn't there?" inquired the woman Spy.

"Yes," replied Hennessy.  "It was never anything more than a well.  Yet,
day before yesterday, one of the local guides brought me here and
insisted on telling me all about its having been an outlet of a famous
secret passage from the castle.  I had some fishing tackle in my
pocket, so I rigged up a line and weight, and let it down.  I satisfied
myself that there were about four feet of greenish, slimy water at
the bottom of a well.  I wish you could have seen the guide's face!"

"Here come some visitors, now," nudged Hal.

Two men and four women, led by a guide, approached the place.

"This shaft looks dark and mysterious enough," began the guide, reeling
off a well learned lesson, "to be as full of historic interest and
mystery as it really is.  This shaft is what is left of one of the
outlets of the famous secret passage to and from the castle."

While the new visitors crowded about, asking questions and offering
remarks, the party that Hennessy was guiding stepped into the background,
secretly enjoying the guide's buncombe.

"If people would only stop to use their good sense a bit," whispered
Hennessy, "they'd know, at once, that the shaft is only a long disused
well."

"Great Scott!" whispered Jack.  "Here come Mr. Farnum and Eph with a
guide.  Let's see if they will be buncoed."

Guide number two came up, with the shipbuilder and Somers in tow.
Greetings were exchanged.  Then the last arrived pair stepped forward
in the guide's wake.  Farnum listened with an amused smile.

"Oh, pshaw!" grunted Eph.  "Is this the best you can show us?  This is
nothing but an old well, with ten feet of malaria at the bottom.  Show
us, for a change, something that we can believe."

Hal began to laugh quietly.  Then all hands stepped forward for another
look down the shaft.  As they stepped outside again Benson happened to
turn just in time to see a familiar figure coming along a path near by.

It was Kamanako, better dressed than he had been earlier in the morning,
and carrying a bulging dress suitcase.

"Hullo!" muttered Jack Benson, in a tone loud enough to carry to the
ears of the newcomer.  "There's that infernal Jap spy--that scoundrelly
thief of other men's secrets!"

Kamanako halted as abruptly as though he had been challenged by a sentry.
As he saw the young captain a dark, red flush crept into the cheeks of
the little, brown man.

"You talk much," sneered the Japanese his anger rising.

"I say what I think about spies and fellows who would steal other men's
secrets," retorted the young submarine captain.

"You will hold tongue better, if you please," snapped Kamanako.

"I?  Hold my tongue for any scamp like you?" taunted Jack Benson.

The taunt had the effect for which Jack wished.  Kamanako, looking
furious, dropped his dress suit case and ran angrily forward.

Just in time, as the Japanese bounded through the fringe of weeds,
Captain Jack dodged adroitly to one side.

So Kamanako plunged past him--and, the next instant, there came a
smothered yell from the inside of the well shaft.

"Oh, that was a shame!" came indignantly, from one of the women in the
party of strangers.

But Jack, paying no heed to her, had stepped back to the edge of the
well shaft.  Dimly, down at the bottom, he could make out Kamanako,
standing in slimy water that reached nearly up to his arm-pits.

"Is the water fine, eh?" Jack called down, laughingly.

"I show you--some time!" came the answer, in smothered rage.

"You showed me Japanese jiu-jitsu," mocked Benson "so I had to do
something to return your courtesy.  What I have just shown you is
called--American strategy!"

By now Kamanako had succeeded in pulling himself part way out of the
water, using his hands and feet on projecting bits of the old masonry.

"You'll get out, in time, for you're a patient fellow," Jack called
down, in a tantalizing kind of encouragement.  "Don't forget the name
that I have just given you--American strategy.  And, the next time a
fellow tries to make you mad, don't let him do it until you've looked
the ground over.  American strategy--yes, that's the name."

Laughing, as he straightened up, Jack turned away from the shaft

"And aren't you going to throw him down a rope, or do something to help
the poor fellow out?" demanded the same indignant woman.

"Not in view of his line of offense, madame," Benson replied, raising
his cap.

"Offense?  What did he do?"

To the whole party Jack explained how Kamanako, that same morning, had
been caught spying upon the controlling mechanisms of the submarine boat.
All the young skipper's hearers were satisfied, then, to leave the
Japanese there to work his own way out, since no one feels any sorrow
over the punishment of a spy.

"Gunpowder and doughnuts!  But you did get square," chuckled Eph, as the
submarine party turned back to the automobiles.

"So that Japanese was a spy, you said?" murmured Mlle. Nadiboff, in a
low tone, as they walked along.

"Yes, beyond a doubt," Jack assured her.

"It must seem strange to be a spy," murmured the young woman.  "It must
give one a strange feeling."

"Yes, and a mighty mean feeling," agreed Jack, coolly.

As he spoke he raised his eyes carelessly to her face.  He did not make
the glance so significant as to betray his real thoughts.

Mlle. Nadiboff did not flinch nor change color under that brief scrutiny.
Instead, she appeared to be almost lost in thought as she walked along.

Suddenly she clutched at the young captain's arm.

"I wonder if you would do something very great, to please me?" she
murmured, questioningly.

"I'd certainly like to have you try me," responded Jack Benson, in an
equally low tone.  He spoke the truth, too, for he believed that this
charming but dangerous companion was scheming some sudden move in her
plans as, a spy.  He wanted to find out what that move would be.  Above
all, if it were possible, he wanted to get knowledge of which foreign
country she represented.

"Won't you contrive to drive alone with me in my car, when we reach
it?" she whispered, coaxingly.

"And leave your chauffeur behind, also?" asked Jack, smiling.

"That will not be necessary.  I do not mind him.  But I have much that
I wish to say to you, my Captain.  As for your friend--pardon me, but he
is dull, and--"

"Quiet, I think you mean, Mademoiselle," interposed Jack.  "Hal's
worst enemy, if he had one, would hardly call him dull."

"Anyway, my Captain," murmured the young woman, "he does not interest me,
and I do want a few words with you."

"This charming young spy," muttered Benson quickly, to himself, "is
beginning to feel that I'm not enough interested to be coaxed away from
my duty by flatteries.  I take it she means to show her real hand, and
try to play it in earnest.  If that's the case, I want to know what she
is going to say."

Aloud he replied:

"It will be easy enough to send my friend away with the others,
Mademoiselle.  When we reach the automobile all I shall have to do will
be to look straight at him."

"Ah!  You have a code of signals--you two?"  Mlle. Nadiboff laughed,
delightedly.

"A code?" repeated Jack.  "No; we have never needed one.  But my chum is
an unusually bright and quick young man."




CHAPTER IX

"DOG, WHO IS YOUR MASTER?"


Seeing Jack and the young Russian woman so interested in their talk, the
others had gradually strolled away from them.

Hennessy had already succeeded in securing an invitation to return to
Spruce Beach in Mr. Farnum's hired auto.

Hal Hastings presently turned, as though to step over to Mlle. Nadiboff's
car, but he caught a swift look from Jack, and turned back.  Hal had not
yet heard of the grave suspicion against the young woman, and could not
guess what this move of his chum's meant.  Hastings, however, was swift
to take the hint.

"You have not overstated your friend's intelligence," murmured the young
Russian gleefully.  "At a short look from you he retreats."

"Oh, Hal and I always understand each other," smiled Jack.

"That is very interesting.  And yet I do not like Mr. Hastings as I
like you," replied the young woman.

She looked at him with a friendly, little flash in her eyes.  Had Jack
been a few years older, and not warned, he might have been snared by
this experienced flirt.  As it was, he did not take the trouble to
answer her last little speech.

Just before they stepped into the car Mlle. Nadiboff uttered a few quick
words, in some foreign tongue, to her man at the steering wheel.  The
auto sped away.  Jack noted only, at first, that they were now going
further from Spruce Beach.  The road down which they drove, however,
was a beautiful one, and the submarine boy did not much mind where they
went, provided he could find out how Mlle. Nadiboff meant to make the
approach against his loyalty to the submarine company.

"Do you know, my Captain, that you are hardly a flattering escort?"
began Mlle. Nadiboff, after they had whirled along for a mile or more.

"Why not?" Jack inquired, bluntly.

"Have you noticed how I seem to please most men?"

"I saw that several were very anxious dance with you last evening, and
that, whenever you were seated, men flocked about your chair."

"Why do you suppose they did that?" challenged Mlle. Nadiboff.

"Because you are a very handsome woman, and the men admired you," Benson
answered, plainly.

"Ah!  Then you think I am handsome?"

"I haven't a doubt of it," Jack answered.

"Do you admire me?"

The challenge came plain and direct.  Mlle. Nadiboff now gazed
searchingly into the submarine boy's eyes.

"I--I think you a very handsome woman to look at," Captain Jack
admitted, readily.

"Is that all you have to say?"

"I--I am afraid I do not understand you, Mademoiselle."

"You have no desire to be especially gallant to me?  It would cause you
no jealousy if you, saw that I preferred the company of other men?"

Jack Benson returned her glance, almost in, bewilderment for a moment.
Then he leaned back, trying to stifle the impulse to laugh, but he did
not wholly succeed.

"You are amused?" cried the young Russian, half angry.

"Amused--yes, at the idea of my falling in love, if that was what you
meant to suggest," replied Jack, again speaking very candidly.

"And why should that amuse you, my Captain?"

"Why, do you know how old I am, Mlle. Nadiboff?  Or rather, how young?
I am only sixteen.  At my age, if I formed any notion of being in love,
it would be sensible to have me spanked and put on a short diet for a
few days."

He laughed merrily, now, and Mlle. Nadiboff turned away her head to
conceal the tears of vexation that started to her eyes.

"Bah!" she thought to herself.  "I have been wasting time--at Lemaire's
orders.  The only way to induce this boy to betray his trust will be
by offering him presents of marbles, tops, kites--bah!  _Bah!_"

Mlle. Nadiboff settled back in her seat, looking straight ahead, her
attitude as frigid as could be.  For some moments she did not attempt
to speak.  When she did open her lips she said, icily:

"I find that I have been wasting my time."

"Wasting your time, Mademoiselle?" echoed Jack Benson, coolly, for he
was much more fully alive to the situation, thanks to Mr Graham, than
she had any chance to know.  "May I ask what you have been trying to
do?"

The question made the young woman bite her lip.  Mlle. Nadiboff had been
a spy quite as long as Mr. Graham had stated.  As she looked back over
the years she was able to recall man after man whom she had flattered
and lured by the witchery of her eyes.  Secret after secret she had
coaxed from men entrusted with guarding such mysteries.  The rewards of
the work had kept M. Lemaire and herself both bountifully supplied with
money by the foreign governments that they had served as spies.  Most
men whom she had tried to win into her service the young Russian woman
had found easy enough victims.  But now, here was a sixteen-year-old
boy laughing at her attempts at "cleverness."

"I was wrong to think Jack Benson a fool," she said to herself, angrily.
"He is far more clever than the men I have met.  I can do nothing with
him.  I must turn him over to Lemaire--to see if that prince of spies,
as he has often been called, can find the flaw in this submarine boy's
armor."

With that Mlle. Nadiboff leaned forward, murmuring a few words to the
chauffeur, who nodded slightly.  Then the young woman leaned back,
turning a smiling, friendly but no longer coaxing face to Jack Benson.

"If I have amused you," she smiled, "I am glad.  We will say that much
and forget the rest, eh, Captain Benson."

"I am glad to agree to anything that will please you," responded the boy,
gravely.

Mlle. Nadiboff shot a covert look at his face, then decided to say
nothing.  She began to have a suspicion that this sixteen-year-old boy
was far more clever than she, despite all her years of strange
experiences.

A mile further along the automobile branched off the main road, running
down a shaded lane at much reduced speed.

"What is this--some short cut back to the beach?" asked Jack, trying
to conceal his astonishment.

"Yes," replied the young Russian, falsely.

Soon the big car stopped.  The chauffeur thrust a whistle between his
lips, blowing a trilling blast.

Jack Benson changed color somewhat.  This sounded suspicious--a signal
in the woods.  It was doubly suspicious after the hints that Mr. Graham
had given the young submarine captain.

"Do not jump--do not be afraid," laughed Mlle. Nadiboff, rather
maliciously.  "Nothing in the way of danger threatens."

Almost immediately the chug-chug of another auto was heard, just ahead
up the narrow road.  Then into sight glided a small runabout, which sat
M. Lemaire, all by himself.  That Frenchman stopped his car, next waving
one hand gayly to those in the larger car.

Then, lifting his hat most courteously to the young woman, M. Lemaire
stepped over to the other car.  The Russian woman spoke in some tongue,
the like of which Benson had never heard before.  It was Arabic, a
language that both of these spies understood perfectly.  What she
said was:

"The boy is yours.  Do what you can with him.  I admit that I have
failed.  I have no hope of being able to do anything with him."

M. Lemaire's eyebrows contracted briefly, in a slight frown.  Then,
forcing a pleasant look to his face, the Frenchman asked, in a tone
easy enough with courtesy:

"Captain Benson, will you step out and talk with me a few moments? I
have much to say."

"I can listen," nodded Jack, looking steadily, shrewdly into the eyes
of this male spy.  "At the same time, sir, this whole proceeding,
meeting, request and all are so unusual that I think you cannot do
better than to give me a frank explanation of what this all means."

"Means?" murmured the Frenchman, as though not comprehending.

"Yes," retorted Captain Jack Benson, disdaining to beat about the bush
for an instant.  "If you pretend that you do not understand me, sir, I
shall feel obliged to have a poor idea of either your honesty or your
intelligence."

"Are you trying to insult me?" asked the Frenchman, a warning flash in
his eyes.

"Not at all," Jack answered, unhesitatingly.  "I am asking you for a
direct statement.  Why am I brought here in this fashion?  What is
wanted of me?"

The young captain was now paying no attention to Mlle. Nadiboff.  She,
finding herself not needed in the talk, had slipped out at the other
side of the car, and was now strolling slowly some yards away.

"Won't you step out, Captain Benson, so we an walk and talk this matter
over?" again insisted the Frenchman.

"Then you have something to say that you don't think quite proper for
the chauffeur to hear?" demanded Benson, almost mockingly.

"Oh, our good Gaston is all right," laughed the Frenchman, nodding at
the chauffeur.

"The chauffeur, then, is one of the crowd--all spies," flashed through
Jack's vengeful mind.  "I might have guessed it.  And this crowd have
me a long way from my friends."

"You are not afraid to step down to the ground, Captain Benson?" asked
the male spy, half mockingly.

"Afraid?" flushed Jack, springing down to the ground and confronting
M. Lemaire.  "No; I am not afraid of a regiment like you!"

"I begin to imagine that you are a brave young man, Captain," assented
M. Lemaire, rather admiringly.

"Brave?" echoed Benson.  "There's nothing here that calls for bravery,
is there?"

"No-o-o," smiled the Frenchman slowly.  "Nothing, Captain, but the
courage to do and dare--and prosper."

"You speak like the puzzle page in a mail order magazine," laughed Jack
Benson, more easily.  "Now, Monsieur, won't you oblige me by becoming
more definite?"

"What can I say, then?"

"Why, M. Lemaire, I always like to deal with people who are direct and
right to the point.  You plainly have some kind of a scheme that you
are trying to put through with me.  Won't you oblige me by coming
straight to the very point?"

"I shall be as direct as you can wish, Captain Benson," replied the
Frenchman, regaining his smile.  "Let us stroll.  Walking often helps
the flow of language."

Out of the corner of his eye Jack noted that, though Mlle. Nadiboff
refrained from joining them, she none the less hovered at no great
distance from them.

"Now, my young friend," began the Frenchman, after a pause of a few
moments, "you command the submarine boat, and you know all her secrets.
You are a draughtsman, to, no doubt?"

"A fair draughtsman," nodded Jack.

"You could draw us a model of the boat you command.  You could make
drawings of all the important parts.  You could supply us with
explanations."

"Just what sort of explanations?" Jack asked, coolly.

M. Lemaire shot a swift, sidelong glance at the submarine boy.

"How?" demanded the Frenchman.  "You do not understand yet?"

"You promised, Monsieur, to be very exact and explicit.  What do you
want?"

"Why, then, such drawings and such explanations that any skilled
shipbuilder, from the plans you furnish us, could build another boat
just like, and just as effective, as the boat you now command?"

"What do you want to do with such plans?" asked Benson.

"Why, would you care about that, if I pay you well enough?"

"Perhaps not," muttered Jack Benson.  "Still, when I go into anything,
I like to know all about it."

"Well, then," cried M. Lemaire, gayly, "first of all, we will come to
the question of a fee to be paid you for your trouble.  Such drawings
and such papers you could prepare for us in two or three days, could
you not?"

"I think that very likely," Jack admitted.  He had thrust his hands
deep down into his trousers pockets, in order to restrain his very
natural impulse to spring at the Frenchman and rain blows in the latter's
face.

"Two or three days' work, let us say," continued M. Lemaire.  "And, for
that we will pay you handsomely--ten thousand dollars in the best
money of your land!"

They halted, gazing at each other.  For a few seconds Jack Benson did
not dare trust himself to utter a word.  When he did speak, it was to
ask, calmly:

"M. Lemaire, who is your master?"

"My master?" repeated the Frenchman.  "I do not understand you."

"Every dog, even a dirty one," thundered Captain Jack Benson, "has a
master!  Who's yours?"

M. Lemaire's face became livid in an instant.  His hands working
convulsively, he sprang at the young submarine captain.

Mlle. Nadiboff, snatching a riding whip from under her automobile coat,
turned and ran toward them.  The chauffeur snatched up a wrench, leaping
out of the automobile.




CHAPTER X

M. LEMAIRE PROVES HIS TRAINING


"You insult me!" screamed M. Lemaire, halting right under the face of
Captain Jack Benson, who looked at him undaunted.

"I didn't," denied Jack.  "I let you do that yourself.  My
congratulations, sir.  You certainly know how to insult your own
manhood as well as the most confirmed scoundrel could wish!"

"You insult again!" quivered M. Lemaire, his French accent asserting
itself.  "I s'all make you pay for zat!"

He struck wildly, badly, as a Frenchman does who has no knowledge of
boxing.  Benson merely warded off the blow, at the same time brushing
M. Lemaire back a couple of steps.

"Now, you keep away--Gaston, or whatever your name is!" warned Jack,
wheeling upon the chauffeur.  "If I lose my temper, some one is going
to be hurt."

But that defiance served only to draw the chauffeur on.  Raising the
wrench, he rushed swiftly at the young submarine captain, aiming a blow
at his head.

Just as might have been expected, Jack Benson wasn't there at that
instant.

Instead, he dodged nimbly to one side, at the same time driving in a
blow that landed under one of the chauffeur's ears.  The fellow went
to the ground.  Swift as a flash Jack bent over him, and snatched up
the wrench, hurling it off among the trees.

Then Jack wheeled around to face Mlle. Nadiboff, bowing.

"Don't you attempt to do anything, I beg of you, Mademoiselle," Jack
urged.  "It would come fearfully hard to have to make even the signs
of striking at a woman."

Though she did not fear physical violence from him, there was something
in Benson's eyes, at just that moment, which caused the Russian woman
to retreat three or four steps.

Now Jack drew himself up, for he was becoming master of himself.  He at
once resolved to play this game, if there was to be more of it, with
greater coolness.

"I think you see, Monsieur, that I am not be frightened by your childish
gymnastics," Benson uttered.

M. Lemaire, too, had forced himself to greater coolness.

"Why, Captain Benson, I might even kill, if I found it necessary,"
replied the Frenchman.

"Then don't get any notion that it's necessary," frowned the young
submarine captain.  "It would get you into a fearful lot of trouble,
and could do you no possible good."

"But you called me a 'dog,'" pursued M. Lemaire, plaintively.  "To a
Frenchman that is the gr-r-r-rand insult!"

"Let it go at that, then," proposed Benson, with a pretense at
amiability.

"Ah!  Then you will forget what has just happened, if I will?" cried the
Frenchman, eagerly.  "That is admir-r-r-rable!  Now, then, ten
thousand dollars I have said you shall be paid for what you will furnish
me.  Ah, even in this rich country, one can do much with ten dollars!"

"It wouldn't be much, I'm afraid, as compared with my prospects with the
Pollard Company," replied Captain Jack, with his most thoughtful air.

"Your prospects with the company?" echoed M. Lemaire.  "Why, my bright
young captain, your prospects with the company will continue just the
same.  They will never know that you have taken this little fortune
from me.  Ten thousand dollars!  Think of that!"

"And you'd turn around and sell what I'd, give you for a half a million,
very likely."

"Oh, no, no, no!" disclaimed the Frenchman, solemnly.  "There would be
nothing like that in it for me."

"Then no foreign government wants very badly to know about the Pollard
plans," inquired Jack.

"There is no government that would pay a really great fortune for such
information,".  M. Lemaire assured the submarine boy.

"There is one," retorted Captain Jack, with a cunning smile.

"Which one?" demanded the Frenchman, doubtingly.

"One that you don't happen to represent," laughed Jack, quietly.

"Ah, I much doubt it, though I beg you to pardon me for saying so,
Captain Benson."

"Why man alive," grumbled Jack, "are you running away with the notion that
you're the only one who ever approached me with a view to finding out
how the Pollard boat runs?  You claim, to be a spy for some other
government, M. Lemaire.  Are you such an infant as to think yourself
the only spy in the field?"

"You would have to tell me about the others.  Name them, or describe
them to me," urged the Frenchman.  "Then I would know, if they are real
agents of any foreign government."

"I would tell you nothing of the sort," muttered Captain Jack.  "I am
young, perhaps, yet I'm old enough to keep my own secrets."

"Then it is agreed, anyway," hastened on the Frenchman, "that, in three
days, you will have ready the plans and descriptions, and that I, after
I have looked them over and have found them satisfactory, will hand you
ten thousand dollars."

"If you've made any such agreement," laughed Benson, "then you've made
it with yourself only.  You certainly haven't made it with me."

"Don't you agree, then?" asked M. Lemaire.

"No," said Jack, shortly, turning on his heel.

"Where are you going, Captain?"

"Back to Spruce Beach."

"On foot?"

"Yes, for I know your kind too well to suppose that you'll offer me a
ride back."

"Wait!" cried M. Lemaire, persuasively, and Benson, halted, looking at
him.  "Of course I cannot offer you a lift back to town," continued
the Frenchman, smilingly, "for that would be ungallant.  But Mlle.
Nadiboff, who had the pleasure of your company out here will, I know,
be most delighted at having your company on the return."

"Assuredly," added the young Russian woman, with one of those charming
smiles that had failed so utterly with the submarine boy.  "I shall
feel most offended if Captain Benson does penance by walking all the
miles back to Spruce Beach."

"I'd be a fool, then, to take that long walk back, when I can ride,"
thought Captain Jack.

So he turned, retracing his steps and bowing to the young woman.

"Yet, before we start," proposed M. Lemaire, anxiously, "let us see,
Captain, if we cannot yet come to some arrangement."

"Well?" demanded Jack, for boyish curiosity tempted him to find how
far this Frenchman was willing to go.

"Captain Benson," proposed Lemaire, "let us say that the price for what
I ask shall be fifteen thousand dollars."

"You're not getting anywhere near my price, M. lemaire," laughed the
submarine boy, derisively.

"You are playing with me--laughing at me!" cried the Frenchman, yet he
spoke cheerily, for now he began to hope that this American boy might
yet be induced to sell himself, body, soul and honor.

"We may as well drop this line of talk," hinted Jack Benson.  "You were
good enough to offer me a ride back to town, I believe?"

"Yet the price?  Let us settle that first," begged the Frenchman.
"Captain Benson, I will make you one more offer--but it must be the
last.  Listen!"

Yet that word was followed by three or four utterly mysterious words,
uttered in a low voice in Arabic.

"Yes," nodded Mlle. Nadiboff, as Jack glanced from one to the other,
"but this must be the last offer."

"The last, the only, the highest offer," muttered Gaston, who had
recovered from the blow Captain Jack had given him.

"Well, then, Captain Benson, bring me your plans within three days, with
all the other data needed for the construction of one of your submarine
boats, and I will hand you, in exchange, the sum of twenty thousand
dollars.  There you are, my good friend!  Twenty thousand dollars.  Now
you are ours, are you not?"

Disgusted, yet crafty, Jack Benson pretended to hesitate.

"You must give me your answer at once," demanded M. Lemaire.  "I cannot
be played with any longer."

Captain Jack drew himself stiffly erect, looking the Frenchman full in
the eyes.

"M. Lemaire, you must have been a spy for a good many years.  You have
been engaged so long in dishonest transactions that you are unable to
understand such a thing as common honesty."

"Do you call it honesty," demanded the Frenchman, with a bitter smile,
"to demand more than twenty thousand dollars for such an easily performed
service?"

"You idiot!" broke forth Jack, in sudden contempt.  He was no longer
able even to play with this rascal.  "Your offer is just as good as one
of a million dollars would be.  I wouldn't take either!"

"What!  You have been trifling with me?" demanded M. Lemaire, starting
forward.

Now the meaning of those few words in Arabic became plain enough.  For
Mlle. Nadiboff, who had bent over, her hand toying with the sand,
suddenly clutched a handful of the fine grains and straightened up,
hurling the sand full in Benson's face.

In that same flashing instant Gaston darted behind the young American.
As the half-blinded young captain dodged back, the chauffeur caught him
around the neck, dragging him to the ground, while Lemaire sprang a-top
of the boy.

Jack fought desperately enough, but the two men rolled him over,
struggling to hold his hands.  Then--

Click!  Snap!

Jack Benson's wrists were handcuffed tightly together.

Now M. Lemaire leaped up, looking down gloatingly at the boy.

"Benson, you young fool," scoffed the Frenchman, "since you refuse to
be treated as a friend, you shall know what it is to have us for your
enemies.  You deem it easy to laugh at us--to call us names!  Bah!
You will soon be glad to beg from us!  Your hours of misery are now
before you--perhaps days of torment that shall end in madness.  Defy
us?  Balk our plans?  Pouf?  How little you know of the people with
whom you have now to dealt."

Then, at a sign from Lemaire, Gaston threw himself upon Benson's legs,
swiftly binding the ankles together.  This done, Lemaire himself added
a gag to Jack's mouth that shut off the last chance of making a sound.

This done, the two men bore Captain Jack to the larger auto, while
Mlle. Nadiboff, chuckling softly, covered him completely under robes.




CHAPTER XI

JACK'S FRIENDS DO SOME FAST GUESSING


"So that's the kind of people they are?" Jacob Farnum smiled softly as
Reporter Hennessy finished repeating the information volunteered by Mr.
Graham, the Washington correspondent.

To this Hal had contributed the little he was able to tell of Mlle.
Nadiboff's conduct.

"You will have to look to your young captain more closely after this,"
wound up Hennessy.

"Why?" questioned the shipbuilder.

"Even at this moment he is away in the company of that clever woman."

"Oh, he won't be cross with her," retorted Farnum, with an easy smile.
"Jack Benson is always courteous with women."

"But aren't you afraid your young captain will have his head turned by
her?" pressed the reporter.

"Who?  Jack?" laughed Mr. Farnum.  "Say, it's very plain you don't know
Jack Benson."

The shipbuilder, two of the submarine boys and the reporter were seated
by themselves at one end of the Hotel Clayton's big front veranda.

"Aren't you at all uneasy?" asked Hennessy.

"If I am," proposed the shipbuilder, "I'm going to cure my mental unrest
with luncheon.  Won't you join us, Mr. Hennessy?"

If appetite were any guide, none of the submarine people felt the
slightest uneasiness as to information that the sprightly Mlle. Nadiboff
might be able to coax from Captain Jack while on that auto drive.

By the time that the quartette came out again, however, Farnum began to
look bothered.

"After two," he declared, "and Jack not here.  Now, at three o'clock,
I've agreed to take out a party of naval officers from the gunboat.  We
want to show those Navy fellows some of our prettiest work in the
'Benson.'"

"It looks as though your young captain is finding his companion so
pleasant that he forgets to look frequently at his watch," suggested
the reporter, slyly.

"Jack Benson doesn't know anything about the three o'clock appointment,"
replied Mr. Farnum.

"If he isn't here in season," put in quiet Hal, "it won't cause us any
real trouble, anyway.  Those of us who will be on hand can manage the
boat through any ordinary trial or trip."

Eph was very silent--for him.  After fifteen more minutes had gone by
young Somers sauntered out into the road, where he could command a long
view in the direction in which he would naturally look for Jack's
approach in Mlle. Nadiboff's car.

After some ten minutes Eph Somers came running up the roadway.

"It's all right," he announced.  "The car is coming."

In hardly a minute more the car rolled up to the veranda, and stopped.
Mlle. Nadiboff, catching sight of the little party, smiled and nodded
graciously as she stepped to the veranda.

"Where's Captain Benson?" inquired Hal, starting toward her.

"Captain Benson?" repeated Mlle. Nadiboff, looking a trifle surprised.
"Hasn't he returned?"

"Not yet," Hal Hastings answered her, his gaze fixed steadily on the
young woman's face.  "How could he return ahead of your car,
Mademoiselle?"

"Why, he left me more than half an hour ago, and within two miles of
here," replied the young woman, easily.  "I proposed going to another
hotel, a few miles from here, for luncheon.  So he asked me to put
him down, saying he would walk in.  That was not more than two miles
from here, was it, Gaston?"

"Much less than two miles," replied the chauffeur.

"And he hasn't returned?" queried Mlle. Nadiboff, looking mildly curious.

"He has not yet come," Hal replied.

"Then he must be a slow walker, or--but will you take my car and go
back to look for him?  Will take you to the spot where your young
captain left us on foot?"

Hal Hastings's first impulse was to accept the offer of the car.  Yet
Mlle. Nadiboff's acting was so perfect, her air so unconcerned save for
mild curiosity, that any suspicion Hal may have felt for a second or two
was quickly banished.

"No, though I thank you, Mademoiselle," he replied.  "Captain Benson
will doubtless be here before we could make a fair start."

Nodding pleasantly, the Russian vanished through the ladies' entrance.
Hal went back to his companions.

"Say," broke in Eph, presently, "if she left Jack to go several miles
for her luncheon, she got it and returned mighty quick."

"Probably used a woman's privilege, and changed her mind about driving
to that other hotel," suggested Mr. Farnum.

For some minutes more the party waited, then went down into the road,
but there was no sign of Jack coming along.

"Mighty strange!" muttered Hal, uneasily.  "Well, we've got to aboard,
now," announced Jacob Farnum, after glancing at his watch.  "Sorry
we can't very well invite you to go with us, Mr. Hennessy."

"I shall see you, if you come ashore in the evening," replied the
reporter.  "In the meantime I shall be about the hotel.  If I see
Benson, I'll tell him where you all are."

Being well provided with cigars, Reporter Hennessy did not quit the
veranda after he had once taken his seat there.  So it happened that
he noted the arrival of M. Lemaire, alone in a runabout, just about an
hour after the time when Mlle. Nadiboff had returned.

Jack Benson, however, did not put in an appearance.

The submarine torpedo boat, with its naval party aboard, sailed out of
the harbor, returning just before dark.

Then, as soon as could be, Messrs. Farnum and Pollard and Hal and Eph
came ashore, heading straight for the hotel.

"Your young captain hasn't succeeded in walking the two miles' distance
to this hotel," announced Mr. Hennessy, who was waiting for them.

"Confound it, I don't like the looks of this," muttered Farnum, uneasily.
"It looks as though something had been done to Benson."

"Will you notify the police?" questioned the reporter.

"I don't believe that would be wise.  At any rate, not quite yet,"
interposed Hal.

"Then what would you do?" demanded Mr. Farnum, turning upon the young
engineer.

"If Jack has come to any misadventure through that pair of spies,"
uttered Hal, anxiously, "it seems to me it will be a heap more promising
if we keep a sharp, unseen watch over every move made by M. Lemaire
and Mlle. Nadiboff."

"Right-o, every time!" clicked Eph.  "If anything has happened to good
old Jack through that pair, then they're the only ones to be watched!"

Dinner, that evening, wasn't as confident a meal for the submarine
party as luncheon had been.  Both Mlle. Nadiboff and the Frenchman
were in the dining room, though they did not sit together.

Later, the young Russian woman appeared in the ballroom.  She was as
eagerly sought as a partner as she had been the night before.

Farnum and his friends did not enter the ballroom, not having brought
evening dress ashore with them.

Yet, some of the time, they remained near the entrance to the ballroom.
It was here that M. Lemaire, in evening clothes, saw them and bowed most
amiably.

"You do not care for the gaiety of the dance?" he inquired.

"No," replied Jacob Farnum, evasively.  "We are looking for Captain
Benson, and thought it just possible he had entered the ballroom."

"Did he not tell you, this afternoon, whether he would be at the dance?"
Lemaire inquired, in a tone of polite curiosity only.

"We didn't see him this afternoon," replied Mr. Farnum, rather curtly.

"You astonish me," cried the Frenchman.

"In fact we have not seen Captain Benson since we left him on an
automobile ride this morning."

"Ah!  I had not heard of that," murmured the Frenchman.  "I trust nothing
is wrong with the gallant young fellow."

"Oh, that's hardly likely," drawled Jacob Farnum, with an effort.
"Captain Jack Benson a lad with a pretty good idea of how to take care
of himself."

While speaking Farnum did not look particularly at the Frenchman, but
trusted to the boys to watch the man's face covertly.  M. Lemaire,
however, proved to be a good actor and a master of facial expression.

As soon as he could, without attracting attention, Jacob Farnum drew his
little force to one side.

"Something serious has happened to Jack," muttered the shipbuilder,
moodily.  "It may have been an accident, but I believe it's ten times
more likely that that infernal gang of spies have trapped the lad and
brought harm to him.  We've got to act, and act fast!"




CHAPTER XII

IN THE POWER OF THE SPIES


Something had, indeed, "happened" to Jack Benson, and much more was
likely to happen.

The young submarine captain lay on a pile of dried grass that had been
thrown on a board floor.  His hands were still manacled.  Worse, one of
his feet now had an ankle-ring fastened securely, and this was chained
to a stout staple driven in the floor.

It was a curious place in which young Benson lay, a place with a strange
history.

Years before a tunnel had been bored into the side of a hill.  After
the tunnel had been lined with a masonry of stone it was not more than
three feet in diameter.  This tunnel led into an artificial cave some
eighteen feet square and nine feet high.  This cave had been shored up
and boarded as to ceiling, floor and walls.

A great deal of labor had been expended in building this curious place
under a low hill.  Yet the original builders had figured that their time
so spent would yield large returns.  This part of the Florida coast lay
conveniently near to Cuba.  On moonless nights a small sailing craft
would put in along the coast, laden with smuggled Havana cigars.  There
being no safe place along the shore in which to store the cigars, this
place, hidden well in a forest, had been constructed as a safe
depository.  For some time the cigar smugglers had prospered.  Then, as
was to have been expected, Uncle Sam's sharp eyed customs men ran the
illegal business down, arresting the smugglers, all of whom were
subsequently imprisoned.

For a while afterwards this cave had been visited by the curious.  All
this smuggling, however, was now a thing of many years past, and
curiosity-seekers had come to leave the place alone.

M. Lemaire, however, in studying the surrounding country, had heard of
the artificial cave.  He visited it.  At need, he saw that it would suit
his purposes.  And now Jack Benson lay there, having been brought hither
in Mlle. Nadiboff's automobile.

The young submarine captain was now not gagged.  He had yelled for help
perhaps two hundred times in the long hours since his enemies had left
him there.  Yet there had been no response.  Benson was now willing to
believe that there was now no likelihood whatever of his being able to
summon help.

Unable to consult his watch, and lying there in complete darkness, the
submarine boy had lost track of time.  It was now nearly two in the
morning.  He had not eaten since early the morning before.  He was
famished, and, what was much worse, was parched for want of a drink
of water.

"I wonder if they intend to leave me here to die?" thought Jack Benson,
for perhaps the five-hundredth time.  "It would be fiendish.  Yet
looking for mercy in Lemaire would be like looking for a lake of pure
water in the Sahara."

Jack shifted, as much as the chain at ankle would permit.  He groaned
with the discomfort of it all.

As if in answer there came another groan, low, hollow, yet unmistakable.
Captain Jack raised himself on one elbow, listening keenly.  The groan
was repeated.

"Who's there?" he called.

By way of answer there came still another groan.  It was hollow,
gruesome, and suggested the grave itself.  But Jack Benson was a
healthy, intelligent boy, with sound digestion and well tuned nerves.

"If you're trying to work any ghostly trick on me," called Benson,
derisively, "try something else!"

Again the groan, a bit louder, but Jack's answer was a merry, ringing
laugh, in which there, was not a trace of dread.

"Thank you for the company, Mr. Groan," he called cheerily.  "I was
beginning to feel a bit lonely.  But say!  Can't you bring a light--even
a ghostly one?"

"I am the spirit of Paul Jones," breathed a low, wailing voice.

"Oh nonsense!" jeered Jack.  "Paul Jones never spoke with a cheap
French accent."

"I come to--to warn--you," sounded the same sepulchral accents.

"Bring the warning right in and let's have look at it," begged Jack,
heartily.  Some convulsive sobs sounded out by the passageway.

"Oh, say," chuckled Jack, "as a vender of blood curdling noises you're
in need of repairs.  Listen!  I'll sound a much better line for you!"

With that, and in a deep, blood curdling voice, Captain Benson started
in on the first verse of "Down among the dead men."

He was interrupted then by a more tangible sound.  Beyond, a match was
scratched.  Then a lantern was thrust in from the low tunnel, followed
by the appearance of the rather long body of Gaston, the chauffeur.

"I thought my singing would bring something," chuckled Jack.  "In a
large town it always brings the police.  Well, how are you?  I'm really
glad to see anything human, and I suppose you'll answer to that
description, eh?"

In silence the chauffeur stepped forward resting the lighted lantern on
the floor a few, feet from the boy.  Then the Frenchman seated himself
on the boards, next bringing out a paper package from one of his
pockets.  As he untied the string Jack watched with lively interest.

"Sandwiches, eh?" chuckled Jack.  "Thank you.  I'm ready."

"This is my supper," answered Gaston, taking a bite of one of the
sandwiches.  "You don't get any."

"Oh, I don't?" demanded Captain Jack, feeling the pangs of hunger worse
than ever.

Gaston's next move was to take a bottle from another pocket, uncorking
it.

"As you're a Frenchman, I suppose that's wine," muttered Jack.  "I don't
use that kind of stuff, but water--"

"This is water," replied the Frenchman, pouring a few drops onto the
floor before the submarine boy's eyes.

Jack's throat ached at sight of the water.  "I suppose you've come here
to eat and drink, in order to torment me?" asked Captain Benson.

"It must give you huge pleasure to watch me," suggested Gaston, taking a
swallow from the bottle.

"About the only pleasure I could get from watching you," retorted the
boy ironically, "would be if I could see you swinging from the end of
a rope that was tied in a tight noose around your neck!"

"Perhaps that will happen to you--yet," hinted Gaston, looking keenly
at the boy.

"Humph!" muttered Jack.  "How would that help your rascally crowd?"

It was plain that the chauffeur didn't really want to eat or drink, but
that he had been tormenting the captive.  Now Gaston carefully placed
the sandwiches and the bottle of water where young Benson couldn't
possibly reach them.

"You've been having too pleasant a time here," glared the Frenchman,
bending over the boy.  "You haven't yet suffered enough to be ready for
the plans that we have for you."

With that the chauffeur threw himself a-top of the boy, striking him
a blow in the face.

"You lean, long-legged coward!" sneered Jack, angrily.  "You know about
how much punk you'd have if I had my hands and legs free, and stood
before you on even terms.  How you'd beg, you wretched craven!"

For answer the chauffeur clutched with both hands at Jack's hair, giving
a hard pull.  Jack gritted his teeth, panting, until at last the
torment forced him to utter a pain-wrung "ouch!"

"Perhaps you will soon learn better than to insult me," leered Gaston.

"You wretched dog," shot back the submarine boy, "you're past insult
by any decent man!"

"Careful," warned the Frenchman, "or I will soon make you shriek your
apologies to me.  I can do what I please with you, and sometimes I have
an ugly temper.  But listen.  I come for one purpose only--to find out
what answer am to take to my master, M. Lemaire."

"Take him," retorted Jack, dryly, "the assurance of my undying contempt
for him and all of his kind."

"You will be left here another twenty-four hours, without food or drink,
if you do not give me a better answer to take," warned Gaston, leering
down savagely into the boy's face.  "Now, consider!  Will you send word
that you will be glad to see M. Lemaire in the morning?"

"Yes; if he's going to be in state prison," mocked Benson, "and locked
in a cell, as he should be."

"Will you see him here?"

"I can't help myself."

"If M. Lemaire comes, will you be sensible?  Will you tell him all that
he wants to know about your boat and your work?"

"Not if I'm in my right mind!"

"If you continue stubborn, Captain Benson, you will die here, of thirst
and hunger."

"Perhaps," admitted Jack, more soberly.  "But it will be a full-size
man's death, won't it?"

"Oh, you think, then, that you are not afraid to die of thirst and
hunger?"

"Since others have done it," retorted Jack, "I suppose I can, if I
have to."

"If you have to?" rasped the Frenchman.

"Do you doubt, then, that we would bring such a fate upon you?"

"I don't believe there's anything too low and cowardly for your crowd
to stoop to it," admitted Jack Benson, with spirit.

"Have a care, young man!"

"You asked me a question," growled back young Benson, "and I answered
you.  If it doesn't suit you, don't ask any more questions."

Gaston regarded the boy with a still more sinister look.

"I think, Captain," continued the chauffeur, "that a little pain--will
have a good effect in disciplining you."

Jack Benson did not reply.

"Come, now!  Let us see if any of your hair will stay in your scalp?"
proposed the Frenchman.  "Yet, first of all, boy, have you anything to
say that will stop me?"

"If I had, I'd say it," muttered the submarine boy, ruefully.

"Then you might give me that message I asked for."

"Is that all that will stop you?" demanded Jack.

"Yes.  All."

"Then go ahead with whatever you have in mind," retorted Jack.  "As long
as my sane mind stays by me I shall never betray the Pollard secrets to
any other government!"

"Let us see, then!"

Once more Gaston fastened the long, sinewy fingers of each hand in the
submarine boy's hair.  He began to tug, gently at first, but gradually
increasing the force of the yank.

Jack Benson stood it as long as he could, then at last let out a yell
that was dragged from the depths of agony.

"I'm in time, it seems!  Stop that!  Now, turn and fight like a man--you
contemptible hound!"

It was Hal Hastings's voice that rang through the little cave.  Hal had
just crawled in through the tunnel.  Now, the young engineer, his frame
shaking with indignation, stood up at nearly his full length, prepared
to spring upon Gaston, who, also, had leaped to his feet.

"I thought it would be worth while to watch and shadow you to-night,"
jeered Hal, angrily.  "It turns out I was right.  The bushes planted
before the mouth of the tunnel bothered me, a while, in finding the way
in here after you--_but now I'm here!_"

Of a sudden Hal leaped forward, intent upon pouncing on the chauffeur.
But Hal's foot caught in a break in the flooring.  He pitched and fell
forward.

With a snarl of glee Gaston burled himself upon the prostrate body of
the second submarine boy, pounding him furiously.




CHAPTER XIII

THE FELLOW WHO SHOWED THE WHITE FLAG


Hal lay face down, and subjected to all the brutal fury of the
Frenchman's assault.

For a few seconds young Hastings did all in his power to fight back.
He was rapidly losing consciousness, however, and poor Jack lay unable
to lend as much as a finger's weight to the defense of his chum.

Then, with an oath in a foreign tongue, Gaston forced Hal's hands back,
snapping handcuffs on the engineer's wrists.

"Now, then, you young pest!" snarled Gaston, springing to his feet.
"Instead of one of you, I have two.  But two shall give me no more
trouble than one.  So you thought you could subdue me--_me_, did you?"

"I'd have thrashed you all right," muttered Hal, his senses returning
under the storm of taunts, "if my foot hadn't caught and thrown me.
You wouldn't dare to free my hands and let me to my feet, just to see
what would happen to you!  You can't fight--unless all the advantage
is handed to you.  You're a coward--not a fighter!"

"Careful, my young firebrand, or I'll teach you to be more polite to
me," sneered the Frenchman.

"Polite to you?" jeered Hal.  "Polite to a spy--to a thief of nations!
Polite to a scoundrel who wants to steal the biggest secret of defense
that the United States Navy has!"

"Oh, we'll have your secret all right," announced the Frenchman, his
voice harsh with triumph.  "We now have the two boys who know all about
the secrets of the Pollard boats!"

"This sounds so good, I reckon we'd better go right on in, Jerry," broke
in another voice.

Gaston started, as did the two submarine boys.  Then the chauffeur
leaped to the mouth of the tunnel, only to draw back in dismay as a
big form emerged and loomed up before his startled vision.

The last comer wore the dress and insignia of a petty officer of the
United States Navy.

"Get back there!" warned this big apparition, waving a warning hand that
looked big enough to be a ham.  "Nobody can't go out until we look into
this cargo."

After the big sailor a smaller one crawled out of the tunnel, rising
to his feet.  Though he was smaller, this second sailor was not exactly
what could have been called a little man.

"Now, then," demanded the big sailor, "whose captain of this craft?"

Gaston, his eyes threatening to bulge from his head, had fallen back
against the wall opposite.  His mouth was wide open, but he ventured
no answer.

"Stow my sidelights, Jerry," muttered the big sailor to his mate,
"but this is a queer looking hold!  And two young men here who'd look
like officers of the service, if they wasn't so young."

"There never was anybody more delighted to you," broke fervently from
Jack Benson's.  "You belong to the 'Waverly'?"

"Aye, aye, shipmate."

"Then you know the submarine, of course?"

"Aye, shipmate."

"I am the captain, and my friend the engineer, of that craft."

The big sailor's reply was an explosive yell.

"Don't let that snake-in-the-grass Frenchman get away, mates," begged
Jack, earnestly.

"Jerry, I reckon you can hold the only gang way that opens in on this
place, can't ye?" demanded the big sailor, turning to his sturdy looking
shipmate.

"I reckon, Hickey," said the other.

"This Frenchman is one of a gang of foreign spies, who have taken this
means to force us to furnish plans, drawings and all information about
the Pollard submarine boats," Jack continued.  "You see how he has us
ironed down here."

"Got the keys to them irons, Frenchy?" demanded the big sailor, turning
upon Gaston.

"Yes," shivered the fellow, looking yellow with fright.

"Then turn our shipmates loose.  Not too much delay about it, either,"
ordered Hickey.

Gaston obeyed as meekly as a lamb.  There was a look in Hickey's steady
eyes which would lead one to suppose that the big sailor might be able
to use his strength in tearing a worthless human being apart.

"I hope you can understand all the thanks I feel like giving," remarked
the young submarine captain, as he rose to his feet, then offered his
hand to the big sailor.

"Oh, stow the thanks, anyway," laughed Hickey.  "But Jerry and me ain't
in for what we thought might be coming to us."

"What was that?" asked Jack, with interest, turning back as he held out
his hand to Jerry.

"Why, ye see," nodded Hickey, after glancing down at the Frenchman, who
was now unlocking Hal's handcuffs, "I've got a home, a little plantation
about two miles back here, that I'm going to settle on for good one of
these days.  The wife and kids live there.  I'd been telling Jerry about
the craft and crew, and, as soon as we got shore leave, I took Jerry
in tow.  We've seen up there two days, and to-night we started back
through the woods, 'cause our leave is up at six in the morning.

"Well, while we was coming through the woods we happened to stop a
minute.  Then we see this Frenchy sneaking through the woods.  We
wondered what was up.  Then he vanished.  We looked about, some
quiet-like, and on tiptoe, and then we saw this shipmate o' your'n
pry apart some bushes and head in this way.  It looked queer to us."

"What did you think was up?" asked Jack.

"Why, as near as we could figger, this was some smuggler's hidin' place,
and we was figgerin' that perhaps Jerry and me would have five 'hundred
or a thousand dollars' reward to divvy up on.  It wa'n't--but, anyway,
Jerry an' me are proper glad we stumbled in on this, just the same.
Now, mate, spin yer own yarn."

Hal was on his feet, by this time, and shaking hands with the two
rescuers.  Gaston, at the furthest end of the little room, again cowered
against the wall, frightened and surly.

Jack Benson told as much of the story as he thought wise, though he felt
it best to leave out the names of M. Lemaire and Mlle. Nadiboff.

Next Hal described how, at the hotel, he had set himself to watching
Gaston; how he had shadowed the fellow.

"Did he come out here in an auto?" asked Jack.

"No; if he had, I couldn't have followed," Hal responded.  "But this
place is barely four miles from the hotel.  We can get back in an hour."

"What ye goin' to do with this feller, anyway?" demanded Hickey, jerking
a thumb in the direction of the frightened Gaston.

"Turn him over to the police," spoke Jack, promptly.  "Even if we fail
to prove anything else Hal can help me fasten a charge of felonious
assault on the scoundrel.  That will be enough to keep him locked up
for a couple of years to come."

Gaston heard this with a falling jaw, though he did not venture to say
anything.

"Well, Jerry and me are ready whenever you are, mates," hinted big
Hickey.

Jack nodded, and they filed out, Jerry coming last of all to make sure
that the Frenchman did not lag behind.

"Now, stand up, me bucko," ordered Hickey, seizing the chauffeur's
collar as that worthy crawled through the bushes at the outer end of
the tunnel.  "Tryin' to steal submarine secrets, was ye?  So some
foreign nation'd have the trick of blowing our battleships to pieces,
and the sailors on 'em?  Jerry, wot d'ye reckon 'ud be about right
for Frenchy!"

"Pass him over to me and I'll see," grinned the smaller sailor.

Hickey grasped the frightened chauffeur in both hands, then fairly
hurled him at the smaller sailor.  Jerry struck him once, with each
lively fist, then sent the fellow spinning back to Hickey.  The latter
caught Gaston, tossing him up in the air, then striking him hard as the
fellow came down.  This done, the chauffeur was again hurled back at
Jerry.  For some time the two sailors kept this up.  It was rough,
heavy punishment.  Gaston bellowed like a sick bull under all the
strenuous handling.  He must have ached in every bone in his body
when Hickey finally caught him, on a rebound, and held him off at
arm's length.

"Had about enough, Frenchy?" demanded the big sailor.

"Oh, mercy, monsieur!" panted the fellow wailingly.  "I have had much
plenty to last me all my life."

"I wish I knew whether ye was lyin'," muttered Hickey, thoughtfully.
"I don't feel a bit tired, yet.  Do you, Jerry?"

"Me?  The exercise has warmed me up fine," grinned the smaller sailor.

"Mercy, messieurs, mercy!" wailed Gaston, sinking down to his shaking
knees, for he feared that these grim tormentors meant to kill him.

"I'd just as soon you'd let up on the scoundrel, if you don't mind,
mates," broke in Jack.  "You see what a cur he is when he isn't having
it all his own way.  I told him, back in the cave, that he'd be just
this sort of a fellow if the tables happened to be turned."

"Did ye say ye was going to turn him over to the officers?" asked
Hickey.

"Yes," spoke Jack Benson, decisively.  "A fellow plying the trade of
this one needs to be locked up as long as possible."

"Oh, no, no, no, my brave Captain!" implored Gaston, wobbling around
upon his knees so as to face the submarine boy.  "Not the jail!  Not
the prison!  Me!  I have always been as free as the birds of the air.
I would die in prison."

"I can't see where much loss will come in if you do," retorted Jack,
coldly.  "Hal, you brought the handcuffs out with you?"

He held up both pairs.

"No, no, no!" pleaded Gaston, almost tearfully.  "Not such disgrace
as that!"

"Let me have a pair of the bracelets," requested Hickey, holding out
one of his hands.  "Now, my tine bird, let me clip yer wings."

Gaston submitted meekly enough, then was dragged to his feet.

While Hal had brought out the lantern and the handcuffs, famished,
thirst-tormented Jack Benson had looked after the water bottle and the
sandwiches.  Now, as all hands trudged along toward the beach the
young skipper ate and drank to his full content.

Arrived in town, they roused a cottager.  From him they learned where
to find the police station.  Gaston was thrown into a cell, and Jack
entered formal complaint against the fellow.

Jacob Farnum still awake, was found at the hotel.  When Hickey and Jerry
returned aboard the gunboat neither felt so sorry about not having
located a smuggler's camp in full operation.  Jacob Farnum had taken
the sailor pair apart, presenting each with a hundred-dollar bill.




CHAPTER XIV

A REMEMBRANCE FROM SHORE


It was a drowsy looking submarine party that retired to a room in the
hotel to talk over the situation.

"Now, of course, first of all," declared Jacob Farnum, "we must take
word of this whole affair to the commanding officer of the gunboat.  As
the representative, here, of the United States Government, he can give
us some advice as to what to do.  I am wondering whether M. Lemaire
and Mlle. Nadiboff can be arrested."

"Hal," demanded Jack, turning to his chum, "when you were prowling about
at the cave, did you hear Gaston mention the name of M. Lemaire?"

"No," replied Hastings, shaking his head.

"Then there wouldn't be any witness to confirm my testimony," sighed
Captain Benson.  "Without such a witness to aid me, I don't see how we
could expect to prove anything legally against M. Lemaire."

"As for that pretty young Russian woman--" began Mr. Farnum.

"We haven't a single line of proof we could put out against her,"
interposed Benson.  "She will have to escape, I am afraid.  For that
matter, I'd hate to help in the prosecution of a woman."

"So would I," retorted Mr Farnum.  "Yet, if she is helping to undermine
the secrets of the United States Government, something will have to be
done to stop her."

"Perhaps," hinted Jack, "the best thing to do will be to see the
commander of the gunboat."

"Much the better course," observed David Pollard, who, during the last
few moments had seemed dreamily silent.  "As you yourself suggested,
Farnum, that officer should be consulted before a single step is taken
in the matter."

"Then we'll all go down to the shore," decided the shipbuilder.  "Even
at this hour we shall find a boat."

Ten minutes later the party had clambered up on the platform deck of
the "Benson."  Williamson, having been left to sleep there alone
through the night, had secured the entrance to the conning tower.
A few sound thumps on the deck, however, roused that machinist, who,
donning slippers and trousers, quickly ran up the spiral stairway,
admitting them.

"I'm mighty thankful to see you back, Captain," was the machinist's
greeting.

There being still nearly two hours of time to elapse before a call could
well be made aboard the gunboat, Jack and Hal threw themselves into the
berths of one of the staterooms.  That brief, sound nap proved the
saving of them when, finally, with Messrs. Farnum and Pollard, they went
on board the "Waverly."

Lieutenant Commander Kimball received them in his own cabin, hearing
Jack's story with utter amazement.

"What I advise you to do, gentlemen, is to go ahead and prosecute the
fellow Gaston on the charge of felonious assault.  I would, however,
try to avoid having any testimony brought out in court to-day.  I will
send one of my officers to see the public prosecutor, and ask that
official to have the case continued for one week.  I will also wire the
Navy Department at Washington, and await the reply of the Secretary
before taking any other steps or offering you any other advice.  But do
not needlessly alarm Lemaire or the young woman away from here."

So well did the lieutenant commander accomplish his purpose that, when
Jack and Hal went to the local court that forenoon, the public
prosecutor promptly asked to have the case against the chauffeur
continued for one week, and the court as promptly assented.

Gaston was taken back to jail.  Though the fellow was well supplied with
money, he did not have anywhere near enough to put up the five thousand
dollars cash bail demanded by Florida justice.

At the jail a watch was kept to see whether Gaston would have visitors,
but none came.  M. Lemaire and Mlle. Nadiboff were known to be still at
the hotel, but they did not go near their man in trouble.  Neither did
Lemaire or the Russian appear about the grounds of the hotel.

At noon a letter from Lieutenant Commander Kimball came aboard the
submarine, inquiring whether Captain Benson could make it convenient
to take him and several officers out to sea afternoon and give an
exhibition of the boat's diving powers.

"After we've taken the boat out ourselves, and tested her," was the
answer Captain Jack sent back.  "With so many spies about we want to be
sure that the boat is in safe running order before we risk the lives of
half a dozen naval officers."

A luncheon was eaten, after which, the young submarine captain hastily
climbed the stairs to the conning tower.

"Throw on the gasoline, Hal," he called back over his shoulder.  "And,
as soon as we get way, test all the electric connections, before we
attempt to do any diving.  Be sure of everything old fellow."

Forward in the engine room the gas motors were soon moving merrily.  By
the time that Eph had cast loose from moorings Jack signaled for slow
speed ahead, and the grim-looking little Benson moved on out of the
harbor.

Once out of the harbor Captain Jack rang, successively, for two higher
speeds.  The "Benson" answered both like a charm.

"The gasoline part of the craft is working all right," declared the
youthful skipper to Eph, who had come up into the tower.

Fifteen minutes later Hal shouted up:

"All electric connections appear safe, Captain.  And all the air
compressors are working."

"Are you ready to shut off the gasoline motors?"

"Yes, sir."

"Go ahead, then, and we'll take a dive."  Down they shot below the
surface, the boat going on a diving keel.  Then, for some minutes,
Captain Jack ran his submarine pride along at a depth of fifty feet
below surface.

"Might as well rise, Captain," called up Mr. Farnum, coming from his
stateroom.

So Eph, at the young commander's orders, stood by to let the compressed
air gradually into the water tanks.  As gracefully as ever the "Benson"
rose to the surface.  Gasoline power was turned on again.

"Everything is all safe, Captain," nodded Mr. Farnum.  "Run back and get
your naval party."

As they were to run, now, on the surface, Jack stepped out to stand
by the deck wheel Eph and Hal came out with him, David Pollard standing
further aft.

As the submarine rounded in under the gunboat's stern the voice of
Kimball called:

"As well done as ever, Mr. Benson!  When shall we come on board?"

"As soon as we're moored, sir," Jack shouted

As the "Benson" ran to her moorings the youthful captain espied a shore
boat that bore, as sole passenger, one of the uniformed, colored bell
boys from the hotel.

When Eph made the mooring cable fast, this shore boat ranged alongside.

"Box for Captain Benson, sah," called the negro.

"Right here," acknowledged Jack, going over to the rail.  The box
proved to be of pasteboard.

"Are you going to open it?" whispered Farnum.

"Why, yes, sir; of course," Jack answered.

"Better do it on deck, then," came the dry answer.  "It might contain
something explosive, you know."

Though he laughed, young Benson carefully untied the string that held
the lid on, also carefully removing the latter.  Inside he discovered
a handsome bouquet of roses, with a card attached.

"Well, of all the assurance in the world?" gasped Jack Benson.

"What's the matter!" queried Farnum.

"Read what's written on this card, sir."

The inscription ran:

"Mlle. Sara Nadiboff is delighted at learning that Captain Jack Benson
has returned in safety from his long walk."

"Any answer, sah?" demanded the darkey in the boat.

"None, thank you," replied Captain Jack, in an even tone.

The boat continued on its way to the shore.

"Say, what do you think of that?" demanded Eph, after he, too, had taken
a look at the card tied to the flowers.

"It is plain enough that our charming young Russian doesn't mean to drop
Captain Benson's acquaintance just yet, if she can help it,"  laughed
the shipbuilder.

"What are you going to do with the flowers, old man?" asked Hal.

"Flowers should be put in water, to make them keep, shouldn't they"
queried the young submarine skipper, innocently.

"Yep," nodded Eph Somers.

"I hope these will keep fresh a long time, then," murmured Benson.

Raising the bouquet he dropped it overboard the harbor--on the side of
the boat away from the hotel.




CHAPTER XV

CAPTAIN JACK BECOMES SUSPICIOUS


So successful and enjoyable a trip did the naval officers have that, as
the "Benson" was gliding back to the harbor, Lieutenant Commander
Kimball broached a subject that had begun to interest the society
people among the winter visitors to Spruce Beach.

"Mr. Farnum," inquired the naval officer, "I have a favor to ask of you."

"You know in advance, Mr. Kimball, that it is granted."

"I hope it is, if it's a wise favor to ask," smiled the naval officer.
"In brief, the idea is this: Naturally people in this neighborhood are
all agog over this submarine craft.  Some of the more daring of the
ladies have besought me to arrange for a few of them to have a trip
on board, even to running beneath the surface.  Will you do that, for a
party of our friends, to-morrow afternoon?"

"We've been a good deal beset by spies lately as you have means of
knowing," replied Mr. Farnum, slowly.  "You'll guarantee all of the
guests, of course."

"As a naval officer I wouldn't bring anyone aboard here whom I doubted,"
replied the lieutenant commander, flushing.

"I didn't mean to be offensive, Mr. Kimball.  But I have as great a
reason as Uncle Sam can have for wanting to preserve the secrets of
this boat from all but sworn officers and men of the Navy.  You and I
are one in that desire, Mr. Kimball, so we'll gladly take out any party,
ladies included, that you bring on board."

"Thank you," answered Kimball.  "And I can assure you that I shall be
very careful in making up my party.  Oh, but won't there be fluttering
hearts at Spruce Beach tonight And I'm more than half afraid that I
shall make an enemy of every lady of my acquaintance whom I have to
leave out of the affair.  How many, guests can you take, Mr. Farnum?"

"Not above fourteen, all told," replied the shipbuilder.

"Then I shall go ashore myself this evening, to deliver my invitations."

The shipbuilder also went ashore that evening, just to see whether he
could learn anything about M. Lemaire and Mlle. Nadiboff.  Almost the
first person Farnum encountered was reporter Hennessy.

"Oh, your people are still here," answered Hennessy, in response to the
shipbuilder's question.  "They're both keeping in the background,
though.  It looks as though they feared to run away, and were waiting
to see whether the lightning were going to strike them.  Now, that I've
told you so much, Mr. Farnum, can't you give me a little more of the
inside of this whole strange business?"

"If I did," smiled the shipbuilder, "you'd send it to your paper."

"Of course," admitted the reporter, honestly.

"I'll tell you the best I can do, Hennessy.  You keep your eyes and ears
open for us, and I'll give you this news story before I give it to any
other newspaper man."

"You surely will?" demanded the newspaper eagerly.

"I will."

"Then I'm here to help you"

As the lieutenant commander had predicted, the ladies at the hotels were
in a flutter of excitement that evening.  Every one who heard of the
projected trip on the submarine boat, it seemed, wanted to be invited.
By the time that Mr. Kimball's list was made up it consisted of three
men and nine women, these in addition to the lieutenant commander
himself and Mr Featherstone.

As Jack paced the far end of the veranda that evening a girlish figure,
only poorly concealed under a light wrap, stole after him.  As the
young woman reached him she threw back a light veil, revealing the very
pretty face of Mlle. Nadiboff.

"So, my Captain," she cried, "you would forget me when you are getting
up a party to take a cruise on your wonderful craft?"

If young Benson felt anything as he looked, he was staggered by this
amazing bit of effrontery.

"You do not answer me," cried Mlle. Nadiboff.  "You feel guilty indeed,
then?"

"Perhaps 'astonished' would be the more accurate word," Jack replied,
smiling now.

"My Captain, you were very pleasant with me, the first evening that we
met."

"That was before," nodded Captain Benson, still smiling.  He stood cap
in hand, his whole bearing respectful, for he did not intend to be
discourteous even to this known adventuress.  He would grant her at
least the courtesy due her sex.

"Before what?" she asked.

"Well, er--before that automobile ride the day."

"And why should that change your attitude toward me, my Captain?" asked
the young Russian.  Her tone was coaxing, almost cooing; her eyes
extremely moist, as though the tears would spring forth in another
instant.

"Why, you see, Mademoiselle," laughed Jack, coolly, "the finish of that
automobile ride was just a trifle too exciting for me.  I have plenty
of the strenuous side of life out at sea.  When on shore my tastes are
all for the quiet, peaceful life."

"But surely you do not reproach me with having made the automobile ride
unpleasant?"

"Only that, as I remember it, you dropped some dust--or something--into
my eyes, and right after that two men took me away in your car--and
then things happened to me."

"Why, that was all a joke," protested the handsome young woman, gazing
keenly into his eyes.

"Then I'll laugh now--ha!  ha!  But seriously, Mademoiselle, I haven't
a sense of humor that will appreciate carrying a joke quite as far as
that one was carried."

"It was all a joke," Mlle Nadiboff insisted.  "At least, M. Lemaire so
assured me.  What ever you may have thought, my Captain, I beg you will
not believe that I had any notion of helping to cause you real
discomfort."

Her tone was so sincere in its ring, her eyes looked so honestly and
appealingly into the boy's that Jack, for an instant, had to wonder
whether he were dreaming.

"My Captain," continued the Russian girl, in a voice that trembled
softly, "I see, now, that I have been fearfully--cruelly--misunderstood
by you.  That is more than I can bear.  Come, let us take a little walk
together in the grounds.  I want you to tell me just what part you
thought I had in some affair against you.  I insist; it is my right to
know this.  Your arm, my Captain!"

As she spoke, Mlle. Nadiboff slipped her soft little right hand inside
of Captain Jack's arm.

Captain Jack took hold of that hand to disengage it.  But Mlle. Nadiboff
merely held the tighter, while the boy was conscious that she was
gazing up at him appealingly.

"I don't wish to be rude, Mademoiselle; don't, force me to be," the
submarine boy urged.  "Will you kindly release my arm?"

Then, with a subdued though angry exclamation, the girl obeyed.

"You will not even hear me?" she cried, stamping one foot lightly
against the veranda boards, while now her eyes brimmed with tears.

"By jove, but she's a bully actor," thought Benson, with a sort of
admiration.

"I am sorry, Mademoiselle," he replied, "But I am wanted now.  I am
forced to say 'good evening.'"

With a bow he turned and left her, replacing his cap as he strode away.

"Oh, that fool, that unnatural young man!" she cried, angrily, to
herself.  "He prefers what he calls 'duty' to the friendly glance of a
pretty eye.  Bah!  Perhaps he is laughing at me at this moment.  If he
is, he is laughing much too soon, for I shall teach him a lesson or two.
You are not yet beyond my reach, my brave young Captain!"

The veil that Mlle. Nadiboff carefully wound so that two folds fell
across her face concealed a hard, sneering, almost barbaric look that
had crept quickly into that handsome young face.

But Jack joined his own party at once.  Through the rest of the evening
he did not encounter either the young woman or M. Lemaire.  The latter,
in fact, had made himself practically invisible of late.

The next afternoon, early, a launch from the gunboat brought off the
pleasure party that was to make the trip on the submarine boat.

Mr. Farnum and David Pollard were ashore at this time.  Captain Jack and
Eph Somers stood on the platform deck to receive and welcome the party.

The first young woman to whom Benson extended his hand to help her
aboard held up a camera for him to take first of all.

"Thank you," responded the young skipper, gravely.  "We will send this
camera to the engine room.  It will be returned to you at the end of
the trip."

As he spoke, he slipped the camera box back to Eph, who started for
the conning tower with it.

"But I wish to take some photographs with it," cried the young woman,
indignantly.  "Especially, a flashlight when we are below the surface
of the ocean."

"I am most sorry, madam," Captain Jack replied, politely, "but it is
wholly out of the question for any photographs to be made aboard the
boat."

"No cameras!  No photographs?" cried two other young women, in something
like consternation.  Then one of them added:

"But we want two or three photos as souvenirs--Mr.  Kimball, we appeal
to you."

"I am wholly powerless in the matter," replied the lieutenant commander,
gravely.  "Mr. Benson commands aboard this boat, and enforces the rules.
I may add, however, that am wholly in sympathy with his decision.  You
will understand, ladies, that there are many secrets in the handling
of a submarine craft like this, It would be absolutely out of the
question to allow anyone to carry away photographs of the interior or
the working parts of the 'Benson.'"

With that, two more cameras were passed up.  Eph as quickly handed them
through the conning tower to Hal, who took them down to the engine room.

Then Jack helped his visitors aboard, while Eph slipped forward to let
go the moorings at the order.

"Now, ladies and gentlemen," announced Captain Jack, "I think there will
be room for all on deck.  If it pleases you, therefore, I propose that
all remain on the platform deck while we make our run out to sea.  Then,
when it comes time to dive and run under the surface, we can go below."

This plan appeared to suit nearly everyone.

"But I believe I'll go below, now," proposed one tall, blond, strongly
built young woman who looked somewhat Swedish.  "I am afraid of too much
chill air on the sea."

"Then, if it please the rest, we will all go below," Jack answered
amiably.

There was instantly a chorus of dissent.  The tall, blond young woman
had already made her way to the conning tower, accompanied by a young
man of English appearance.  But Eph unconcernedly barred their way.

"Step aside, if you please, young man," urged the Englishman.  "The
lady wishes to go below."

"Captain's permission necessary, sir," replied Somers, quietly.

"You see, ladies and gentlemen," Jack explained, "it won't be quite
possible to let visitors roam at will over the boat.  It would be
against my instructions from the owner.  Either all must remain on deck,
or all must go below."

As he spoke the young skipper thought he saw a swift look pass between
the young Swedish woman and her English escort.

"Oh, well," replied the young woman, shrugging her shoulders, "I do not
intend to be disagreeable.  If the others wish to remain on deck, I will
do so, too."

"Very good, Miss Peddensen," murmured the young Englishman.

Jack Benson took his place at the deck wheel, and Eph, after Hal had
come to the conning tower opening, hurried forward once more to cast off
the moorings.  Then speed was called for, and the "Benson" made a
graceful sight as she swept out of the little harbor with such a
brilliant, interested company aboard.

The submarine continued until she was three miles out at sea.

"Now, if it pleases the company," Captain Jack called out, "we will
go below and dive.  Then you, will know what it feels like to be running
under the surface."

From the ladies came a few little gasps of excitement.  Some of them,
now that the moment had come, almost wished they had remained ashore.

"No one need be afraid," smiled Jack.  "This boat has been thoroughly
tested.  We shall go below the surface, true, but we shall come up
again the instant that the proper devices are applied to our machinery.
Let no one be afraid.  There is not even a particle of danger."

"Not a particle," repeated Lieutenant Commander Kimball.  "This is an
even safer sport than automobiling."

"Let the Navy officers go below first, please," urged Jack, as the
ladies began to crowd about the conning tower.  He wanted this done in,
order that both Mr. Kimball and Mr. Featherstone might be able to use
their eyes on the guests below.

At last all had passed down the iron staircase save Eph, who remained
by the wheel in the conning tower.

"Pass directly aft, everybody, please," called Jack, quietly.

"What's that for?" asked Miss Peddensen.

"We cannot allow anyone except naval officers to see how our diving
apparatus is worked", replied Jack.  "Some of you step into the
staterooms, on either side, please.  All of the visitors must be aft
of this curtain."

The extreme after end of the cabin had been rigged with a heavy curtain
that could be dropped into place.

"Why, I feel as if we were all being penned up here and held for the
slaughter," gasped one American girl, in a tone of fright.

"Yes, indeed!" protested Miss Peddensen.  "This is going too far."

"It strikes me as being a good deal like an outrage," blurted the
young Englishman.  "Mr. Kimball, can't you--won't you interfere in
this matter?"

"I am very sorry," replied the lieutenant commander, "but I cannot.
This step is necessary, in order to prevent anyone from having an
improper view of the working of the craft.  I am going behind the
curtain with you.  Mr. Featherstone will remain out in the cabin to
aid in the handling of the boat.  You need none of you feel any
uneasiness."

Both Miss Peddensen and the Englishman ceased their objections.  But
Jack, remembering the glance that had passed between the pair on deck,
remained behind the curtain, too, as he dropped it.

"Go ahead, Hal!"  he called.  "Fifty feet under the surface.  Dive
gently."

"O-o-o-oh!" came in little screams of alarm as the guests felt the floor
on which they stood inclining at a sloping angle.

"We're going below the surface now," young Benson informed them.  "We'll
soon be running on an even keel."

"All below," called Hal Hastings in a few moments.

"And all clear?" asked Jack.

"All clear, Captain."

"Jack Benson threw aside the heavy curtain, come forward, slowly ladies
and gentlemen, and take seats," was Jack's invitation.  "I am sorry I
shall have to ask you all to remain seated, but we cannot have any
serious shifting of weight while we are running under the water."

Though Eph was at the tower wheel Hal Hastings was now virtually in
command of the boat, by previous arrangement, for young Benson meant to
keep a sharp, though covert, eye on passengers.

The young skipper noted, swiftly, that Miss Peddensen had taken the seat
furthest aft in the cabin, while the young Englishman was seated at the
forward end of the party of guests.

"Oh, I say, Captain Benson," called the Englishman, "are you permitted
to show me how you know just how far below the surface you are?"

"The gauge tells that," replied Jack.  "But I will ask you to excuse
me from describing it, as I wish to keep my mind on the running of the
boat.  Mr. Hastings will oblige you; or, I don't doubt, one of the
naval officers will."

Even this momentary distraction, however, had given Miss Peddensen time
to slip something out of one of her wide sleeves into her lap.  And now
the young Swedish woman sat so that the object taken from her sleeve was
concealed behind the woman who sat next to her.

It wasn't many moments ere Jack noted some thing about the young Swedish
woman that caused the young skipper to turn, every now and then, for a
swift though hidden glance in her direction.

"What on earth is Miss Peddensen doing?" wondered the submarine boy.
"Hang it, I believe she's up to something that she ought not to be
doing!"

Through he did not turn and walk in her direction, Jack, thereafter,
kept the young Swedish woman much more under secret observation.

"By Jove, I know what she's doing, now," muttered the young skipper.
"That movement of her elbow betrays her, and her eyes are fixed, much of
the time on her lap.  If she isn't sketching something, on the sly, then
my eyesight isn't as good as it used to be!"

Captain Jack Benson found himself quickly aquiver with suspicion and
indignation.

"Yet I can't afford to make any mistakes," he told himself, uneasily.
"I've got to be absolutely sure before I can take the risk of starting
a human cyclone about my ears!"




CHAPTER XVI

THE GOVERNMENT TAKES A HAND


Yet, for a brief interval more, Jack Benson hesitated.

"Is the young woman sketching, or is she merely writing?" he wondered,
anxiously.  He watched her a little while longer.

"No; she's sketching.  Those are drawing strokes she's making."

Then, looking wholly blank, Jack Benson turned on his heel.  He looked
first at one mechanism, then at another.  Yet, presently, stood close
to Lieutenant Commander Kimball's ear.

Only a few words were said, but the naval officer understood instantly.

As Captain Jack turned and went back, Kimball also sauntered along,
although he did not appear interested in the submarine boy's movements.
Yet it was not long when both appeared before the young Swedish woman.

"Miss Peddensen," murmured the lieutenant commander, "may I see what
you are writing?"

The woman looked up, her face composed, her eyes dancing with mirth.

"Why, surely, Mr. Kimball," she replied, laughing.  "And very silly stuff
you'll find it, too.  I have been jotting down my impressions upon
finding myself riding under the surface of the sea.  I do not handle
your English language very well, as you will see."

Mr. Kimball glanced hastily through the three or four pages of rather
closely written note paper.  It was, as the young woman had stated,
a very amateurish composition, in very stilted English.

The naval officer felt a sense of mortification and his face reddened
slightly.  He had been led to expect that he would find something crime
on these sheets of paper.  Instead, he scanned a stupid piece of
composition.

"I would die of humiliation, to have that read before all these people,"
murmured the young woman.

Lieutenant Commander Kimball gave Jack Benson a covert elbow-dig in the
ribs, a move said, as plainly as words:

"The joke is on you."

Jack, however, through half open eyes, had been watching on his own
account.  Suddenly he made a dive forward, shooting his hands down close
to Miss Peddensen's well-booted feet.

"That same old ship-rat!" exclaimed the submarine boy.  "I'll catch the
beast before he goes under your skirts, Miss Peddensen."

At the mention of a rat so dangerously close young woman almost shot out
of her seat in anxiety to get away.

As she bounded something dropped down out of the wide right sleeve of
her coat.  It was a small memorandum book.

This was just what Jack Benson caught, in place of the pretended rat.
Moreover, the young skipper was clever enough to catch the book so that
it fell into his hands open.

"It wasn't a rat, after all, Miss Peddensen," smiled Jack, straightening
up and holding the open memorandum book so that both he and Kimball
could see what was traced on the two pages that lay exposed.

There were sketches of the compressors, sketches of the mechanism by
which the compressed air was forced into the tanks to drive the water
out--in fact, sketches of many vital features in the control of the
boat.  Nor was more than a glance needed to make it plain that this
young woman artist possessed expert knowledge of machinery.

At the cry of "rat" three or four women jumped from their seats.  The
one nearest Miss Peddensen moved hastily to the forward end of the cabin.

"My dear young woman," murmured the lieutenant commander, dropping into
the vacated seat beside the Swedish girl, "you won't mind, will you,
if I keep these little matters to look over at my convenience!"

There was something so compelling in the look that flashed briefly in
the naval officer's eyes that Miss Peddensen lost color, and stammered:

"No-o-o, certainly not; if such silly things interest you."

"They interest me very much indeed," murmured Kimball, thrusting
"composition" and sketches inside his blouse.

As the naval officer plainly intended to remain where he was, Jack Benson
turned, sauntering forward.

"Another spy nailed, beyond a single doubt," muttered the young submarine
commander.  "Will there never be an end to them."

As Captain Jack glanced at the young Englishman, Drummond by name, he saw
an unmistakable flash of hostility in the Englishman's eyes.

"So you're a spy, too?" quivered Benson, inwardly, turning on his heel.
After that, howsoever, the submarine boy took good care to keep Drummond
under covert watch.

In time the "Benson" returned to the surface, being now much nearer land
then when the aft had made its dive.  A few minutes later the boat ran
into the harbor and made fast at its moorings.

"What are you going to do about the young woman?"  Jack found a chance
to whisper, as all hands gathered on the platform deck.

"I don't believe I have actual authority to do anything," Kimball
returned, also in a whisper.  "But we have the drawings, and that
writing, which may be a clever cipher.  With that I'm afraid we'll have
to remain content."

A launch from the gunboat was in waiting.  In this the shore guests were
taken back to land.  Hardly had the launch left the side of the
submarine, when a cutter, also from the gunboat, put in alongside.  Two
men in ordinary citizen's dress clambered aboard.

"Lieutenant Commander Kimball?" inquired one of the pair.

"Yes," acknowledged the naval officer.  "May we see you below, in the
cabin of this boat."

"No!" replied Kimball, sternly.

"Oh, as you please, of course," smiled the one of the pair who had first
spoken.  "Probably I am at fault, though, in not introducing my
companion and myself.  My friend is Mr. Packwood; my name is Trotter.
We are Secret Service men sent down here by the Secretary of the Navy,
in answer to your dispatch."

As Trotter spoke he threw back the lapel of his coat, displaying a badge.

"I have also some papers to show you, Mr. Kimball," continued the
Secret Service man.

"Oh, of course you may come below," smiled the naval officer.  "And,
Benson; I guess this business belongs to you, too."

So Jack descended with the party, while the other submarine boys and
Williamson remained on deck.

"You have, been bothered with spies, Captain?" asked Trotter, turning
to young Benson, when they had reached the cabin table.

"Haven't we, though!" muttered Jack.

"And even took one out with you on this last trip of yours," laughed Mr.
Trotter, producing from an inner pocket a book bound in black.

"Miss Peddensen, the Swedish young woman?" demanded Captain Jack.

"Here's the one I mean," replied Trotter, opening the book, which proved
to be an album, and turning the pages over rapidly.  He pointed to a
photograph.

"That's Miss Peddensen," cried Jack, looking up at Lieutenant Commander
Kimball for confirmation.

"Well, Peddensen is one of the names she has used," smiled Trotter.

"What foreign government does she serve?" demanded Benson.

Trotter shrugged his shoulders.

"Well, the Department has pretty good information that she has served
England, France, Germany, Austria, Russia--oh, these spies have no
country!  They serve the fattest international purse!"

"Here is what we took from Miss Peddensen," said Kimball, gravely, laying
down on the table the sketchbook and the "composition."

Taking up the latter, Mr. Trotter, after a glance declared:

"This is written in a secret cipher, most likely.  Packwood, this comes
in your peculiar line of work.  The sketches are easy enough to
understand.  They are of the mechanisms displayed in this cabin."

"Yes, this is a cipher," declared Packwood, thoughtfully, after scanning
the sheets a few moments.  "With some study I can make it out."

"Who's the young Englishman who escorted Miss Peddensen?" demanded
Captain Jack.

"Never saw him until I glanced at him in the launch just now," replied
Trotter.  "He may be another spy, unknown to us, or he may be merely a
good-natured and wholly innocent young chap whom the Swedish girl has
lured into her service."

"What are these other pictures?" inquired Mr. Kimball, beginning to
turn the leaves.

"All of 'em photos of people known to be engaged in stealing naval
secrets for foreign powers," replied Trotter.  "Captain Benson may
keep this album for future use.  I've another copy for you, Mr. Kimball."

"Why, here's a good likeness of Mlle. Nadiboff," cried Jack Benson,
pausing in turning the leaves and glancing down at the picture of a face
he had good cause to remember.  "And here, opposite her, is M. Lemaire!"

"Oh, yes; they're both old offenders," nodded Trotter.  "Turn along, and
see if you remember any more faces."

"Here's Gaston, who is now in jail here," nodded Jack.

"Is he, though?" asked Trotter, with interest.

"What charge?"

"Felonious assault upon Hastings and myself."

"Good," chuckled Trotter.  "I shall have to see the judge privately, and
ask him to make sure that Gaston Goubet gets the longest sentence
possible.  Nothing like prison bars to stop the work of these
international spies!"

"Why, here's even little Kamanako," smiled as he turned over another
page.

"Yes, and a very smooth and slippery little spy that Jap is," declared
Mr. Trotter.  "He steals all kinds of secrets, from the details of
sixteen inch guns down to the method of dyeing a blanket in a mill."

"Are you going to do anything with the Peddensen woman?" inquired
Lieutenant Commander Kimball.

"Ain't I, though--just!" answered Mr. Trotter.  "You caught her
red-handed, with drawings, cipher and all."

"Will she be imprisoned?" inquired Captain Jack.

"Well, that isn't the usual way," replied Trotter.  "The young woman is
more likely to be taken to New York, given a passage ticket across the
ocean, and notified that, if she tries to return to this country, she
will find that her photograph is on file at every port of entry.  It
will spoil her games, without making much of a fuss."

The cutter waiting alongside conveyed Kimball and his brother officer,
Featherstone, back to the gunboat.  Then it ran into shore; putting Mr.
Trotter and his silent companion once more on land.

For some minutes after that Jack, Hal and Eph remained absorbed in the
pictures in this album of known naval spies.  There were more than two
dozen of these photographs, some of men, some of women.  On the same
page with each picture was given the subject's true name, if known,
also the spy's aliases, and other information.

"Sara Nadiboff, twenty-nine, yet looks like twenty," muttered Hal,
studying the information under the young Russian woman's photograph.

"And Kamanako is really Lieutenant Osuri," muttered Jack.  "Yet the
fellow was working in the hotel kitchen until he could get a chance
to apply for a job on this craft."

"I don't recognize any other spies among these pictures," muttered
Hal.  "The only ones here that we know we had already guessed."

"Look at that time," muttered Jack, jumping up.  "I must get on shore
and see what Mr. Farnum's orders are.  And--" thrusting the album
in his coat pocket and buttoning it up,  "I'll take this picture gallery
along.  Our employer will be highly interested in it."

It was dusk by the time that Benson reached the platform deck.  After
a few moments he succeeded in hailing a harbor boat.  Yet it was quite
dark by the time that Captain Jack stepped on shore.

Instead of going around by the road Jack decided to cross the grounds.
As he was walking briskly toward the hotel, an athletic-looking young
man stepped out suddenly, from behind of the big trees, blocking the
submarine boy's path.

"Good evening, Mr. Drummond," Jack hailed, quietly.

"Now, you halt and stand right where you are," retorted the Englishman,
nervously handling a heavy walking stick that he carried.  "I don't know
whether it's going to be a good evening for you, or not, young man.  Do
you know that your cursed meddling has resulted in the arrest of a most
estimable young woman?"

"Who?" asked Jack, coolly.

"Miss Peddensen," replied Drummond, angrily.

"Oh, I guess the secret service men know what they're about," said Jack
somewhat sarcastically.

"And I know what I'm about, too!" roared the enraged Drummond, raising
his cane, wrathfully.  "Benson, you young sneak, I'm going to brain you!"




CHAPTER XVII

DRUMMOND'S LITTLE SURPRISE--FOR HIMSELF


It didn't happen just that way.

As Drummond swung his cane and brought it down with crushing force, aimed
at the submarine boy's head, Jack wasn't there.

Instead, Benson sprang about two feet to one, side.  It would have been
a fearful blow had Jack's head been in the way.  As it was, the cane
hit the ground with such force as to be thrown from the Englishman's
hand.

With a growl, the fellow leaped forward and snatched up his stick.  Jack
Benson stood leaning carelessly against a tree, in a way that enraged
Drummond all the more.

"I'll show you!" snarled the Englishman.  With that he aimed a blow,
sideways, at Benson's head Jack ducked, then dodged out.  The cane hit
the tree with a force that jarred the assailant and all but dislocated
his wrist.  Again he dropped the stick.

Benson gave a hearty ringing laugh and this enraged the Englishman past
endurance.  Then Jack added, "Is that the best you can do?"

"I'll show you!" roared the other, making a leap forward.  He charged
straight at the submarine boy, who wheeled and darted on toward hotel.

"Don't run, you coward!" came the flying taunt.

Just then Jack Benson fell, though he did it on purpose.  Straight in
the path of the irate Englishman the submarine boy dropped, curling
himself up.

It was too late for Drummond to halt, or to change his course.  He
tripped over prostrate young Benson, then lurched forward landing on
his face.

Up sprang Jak Benson, planting two sterling good kicks.

"You beast!  Wait until I get up!" roared the victim, in a voice like
a bull's bellow.

"What's the matter here?" demanded an astonished voice, and Mr. Trotter,
after a short dash, bounded through the darkness, arriving on the scene
just as Drummond was getting up.

"This fellow--" began Jack.

"'Fellow'?" broke in Drummond, angrily.

"This fellow," Jack continued, calmly, "accused me of causing Miss
Peddensen's arrest, and promised to brain me."

"Too bad you've allied yourself with that young woman," muttered Mr.
Trotter looking keenly into the Englishman's face.

"What d'ye mean?" demanded Drummond.

"Miss Peddensen turns out to be a well-known military and naval spy,
though she hasn't operated in this country before in five years,"
replied Mr. Trotter, coolly.  "However, she has been caught trying to
steal the secrets of the submarine boat, and she's under arrest.  My
side partner, Packwood, is now engaged in unraveling a cipher that was
taken from her."

"That's an impudent lie," asserted the Englishman, hotly.

"No it isn't," laughed Mr. Trotter.  "It's a Secret Service fact."

"I'm going to go to Miss Peddensen, now, then," asserted Drummond.

"Right-o," drawled Trotter, so significantly that Drummond shot a quick
look at the officer, demanding:

"What d'ye mean by that?"

"I'm going to take you to Miss Peddensen," returned the Secret Service
man.

"I'll go all the way to Washington, by tonight's express, to see the
young lady freed from this outrageous mistake," stormed the Englishman.

"I don't know about your going to Washington--to-night," replied
Trotter, yawning.

"What have you to do with that?" demanded Drummond, harshly.

"Why, I reckon, Mr. Drummond, you're my prisoner.  You won't very easily
go anywhere to-night, without my consent."

"Your prisoner?" demanded the Englishman angrily.

"Yes."

"By what right do you arrest me!  What have I done?"

"Well, for one thing, you've tried to injure the captain of the submarine
boat, all because he caught your woman friend at strange tricks on board
the 'Benson.' For another reason, because we suspect anyone who defends
or upholds the spy.  Be good enough to step along with me, Mr. Drummond."

"I'll do nothing of the sort," blurted the astounded Englishman

"You'll go all the same," warned Mr. Trotter, first of all displaying
his Secret Service badge, next running a hand back briefly to a revolver
that rested in a hip pocket.  "I don't much care, Drummond, whether you
walk with me, or whether I have to send for an ambulance to bring you
along.  But you'll go just where I want you to."

The Englishman was too much terrified to reply.  Two or three times he
opened his mouth as though to speak, but, instead, merely swallowed.

"Come, now--forward march" advised Mr. Trotter.  Drummond, without
allowing himself to hesitate, went away at the side of the Secret
Service man.

"Don't you want your cane?" called Jack Benson.  Drummond did not
condescend to answer, so the submarine boy slipped back to the tree,
where he found the stick.  It was a handsome piece of polished partridge
wood, surmounted by a handsomely wrought head of gold.

"This will make an interesting souvenir to keep aboard the boat," mused
Benson, swinging the stick as he continued his walk.

At the veranda Jack came face to face with Mlle. Nadiboff, just returning
from an unaccompanied stroll down by the water front.  To the submarine
boy's astonishment the handsome Russian greeted him most amiably.

"You have not forgotten old friends, I hope, my Captain?" she added,
smiling and with a pretty little coaxing way.

"There are some old friends," replied Captain Jack, lifting his cap,
"whom it is impossible to forget."

"I hope you will continue to regard me as a friend," responded Mlle.
Nadiboff, more seriously, looking him fully in the eyes.

"Why?" queried Jack.

"I may need a friend," she replied, dropping her glance for a moment.

"You in need of anything--even a friend?" cried Captain Jack,
incredulously.

"I may need a friend who can speak a good word for me; who can forget
things, or explain them." went on Mlle. Nadiboff, resting a hand
pleadingly on his sleeve "My Captain, if need be, I shall send for you.
Do not fail me!  You won't?"

It looked as though the tears lay just behind her eyes.  The submarine
boy felt that the situation was becoming too interesting, so he lifted
his cap once more as he turned on his heel.

"Mlle. Nadiboff," he sent back to her, "I trust you will never want for
the most reliable friends."

He turned down the veranda to go toward the office door, when he
encountered another surprise.

Leaning against one of the posts stood Kamanako, as natty and trim as
though he had come from the tailor's.

Looking up with a most friendly smile, the little Japanese saluted.

"Why, how do you do?" Jack greeted him, halting.  "I had an idea you
had left Spruce Beach."

"I should have done so, but I started too late," replied Kamanako,
still smiling.  Nothing ever daunts that Japanese smile.  One of these
little men, being led away to have his head chopped off, goes with
a smile on his little brown face.

"Started too late?" asked Jack.  "How was that?"

"Now, you laugh at me," replied the Japanese.

"Laughing at you?  Not a bit!"

"You have told some one that I am a spy," replied Kamanako, without
a trace of grudge in his voice.  "So now, I cannot leave Spruce Beach.
Ticket agent, he will not sell me.  If I try to go on foot, the roads
are watched.  If I take to woods, even, I shall be found."

"Sorry," nodded Jack Benson, and passed on.  "So the Secret Service net
is around the place, and no suspected person can get away?" muttered
the submarine boy.  "Well, that's it should be.  I wonder if there
are any more of this strange crew--men or women spies that don't
happen to have suspected so far?  If there are, I don't believe they'll
wriggle through the meshes of old Uncle Sam's Secret Service net,
anyway."

His mind full of the doings of the day, Captain Jack Benson found Messrs.
Farnum and to whom he surely had much to tell.




CHAPTER XVIII

"REMEMBER WHAT HAPPENED TO THE 'MAINE'!"


"We'll have no more trouble, I imagine," nodded Jacob Farnum, with a
satisfied air, when Jack, at a table in the corner of the dining room,
had told, in low tones, all that had happened.

"The spies are all on the defensive, now, beyond a doubt," added David
Pollard.  "They'll be too busy keeping their wrists out of handcuffs to
devote any of their time to trying to get at the secrets of the 'Benson.'"

"I hope you're both right," said Captain Jack, gravely.

"Why, what leads you to think that we may not be?" asked Farnum,
curiously.

"Nothing in the way of facts," Jack admitted.  "Yet there may be others
of this infernal spy gang who have not yet shown their hands, of whose
existence the Secret Service knows nothing."

"Well, what can they do, if you don't allow any strangers on board the
boat?" asked Mr. Farnum, point blank.

"Nothing much," muttered Benson, "unless--"

"Well, unless what?"

"See here," asked the submarine boy, "what is usually done to such spies
by the United States Government?"

"Why, the law provides that, in war time, such spies can be shot in
mighty quick order," replied Mr. Farnum.  "In peace times the law doesn't
allow anything but sending spies to prison."

"But what does the Government usually do?" pursued Captain Jack.  "It
seems to me I've read of suspected spies being caught around American
fortifications, trying to make notes, or take photographs."

"Yes," nodded the shipbuilder.

"And I think I've read, also, that such spies are generally warned and
then let go."

"That's the usual procedure, I believe," admitted Farnum.

"Then, after the spies who have been bothering us have all been rounded
up and scolded, they'll be given railroad tickets and allowed go on
their way?" asked Jack.

"Frankly, I'm afraid that's just what will be in the present case,"
admitted Jacob Farnum.

"Then," grumbled Captain Jack, making a rather wry face, "it would seem
that being a foreign spy, in this country, provides one with a calling
that is a good deal safer than being just a lightning rod peddler or a
bill collector."

"Yes; it's really so," admitted the shipbuilder, thoughtfully.

"If that is the case," muttered Captain Jack, "the spies here at Spruce
Beach will probably keep a bit quiet until they see how things are going
to turn out.  As soon as their minds are made easy by our generous
government, then they'll plot their next moves.  If they can't accomplish
anything more, they may content themselves with a general revenge of
some sort on the whole lot of us."

"You're not afraid of their vengeance, are you?" asked Mr. Farnum,
looking up, and into the eyes of his young captain.

"I'm not afraid, of anything, sir," retorted Jack.  "The master of a
submarine boat has no right to be afraid of things.  Even if these
scoundrels should get me, in the end, all I can to is to smile, and
say: 'So be it.'"

Then, in the next breath, Benson added, earnestly:

"It doesn't matter so much if these rascals get me, but I don't want them
to work any mischief to the submarine."

"Bravo!" nodded David Pollard, looking on with a smile.

It is a fact that life in a constant atmosphere of danger renders the
average man all but indifferent to fear.  Those who meet perils daily
grow to consider danger as all a part of the day's work.  Perils which,
a year before, would have kept Jack Benson awake with dread for a week
now appeared to him as not worth thinking about until they happened.

Jack remained ashore until half-past nine.  He hoped to hear some word
of what the Secret Service men might have learned, or of what these
representatives of Uncle Sam were doing.  But no word came, so the
submarine boy went down to the beach.  There was but one harbor boat
in sight.

"Ah done thought yo'd be gwine back to do little ship, sah, so Ah
done waited fo' you'," explained the negro in the boat.  "Any mo'
ob yo' pahty to go abo'd to-night, sah?"

"No," Jack answered.  "I'll be the last one to put off to-night."

Nor did he forget to reward the darkey's enterprise by handing him
rather more than the usual boat hire.

As he stepped aboard Jack found Hal pacing the platform deck.

"Keeping deck watch, old fellow?  I'm glad see that," Captain Jack
said, commendingly.

"Yes; I'm on until midnight.  Then Williamson stands watch until
three-thirty in the morning.  After that Eph comes up and takes the
trick until it's time to call us all."

"When do I come on watch?" asked Jack.

"I never heard the captain of a craft had to stand watch in port,"
laughed Hal Hastings "Besides, old fellow, we couldn't be sure you'd
be aboard to-night.  So the watches are all arranged.  Anyway, you'd
better turn in and get a full night's sleep, for you've more on your
mind than the rest of us."

"Then tell Williamson, and have him pass the word on to Eph, that watch
ought to be very strictly kept," answered the young captain.

A few minutes Benson remained on deck, chatting with his chum.  When he
at last went below the submarine captain lost little time getting into
his berth.

When Machinist Williamson came on deck at midnight a light wind was
blowing, but the air was not really chilly.  In his heavy reefer the
machinist felt wholly comfortable after he had lighted his pipe and
started his slow walk back and forth along the deck.

There did not appear to be overmuch sense in keeping this deck watch.
Only a short distance away lay the United States gunboat "Waverly,"
with her alert marine guard.  Though there was no moon, the starlight
was bright enough to enable a marine on the gunboat to see anything that
might skim over the water toward the "Benson."

Yet Williamson was on watch, under instructions, and he was a faithful
fellow who meant to do his full duty.

"Seems kinder tough, of course, to be so long out of one's bunk in the
middle of the night," the machinist admitted to himself.

Yet, had his vision been keen enough to know what was happening on shore,
almost directly opposite the "Benson," Williamson would have been
tenfold more alert.

Over there on the shore, in a clump of flowering, semi-tropical bushes,
crouched two men.  On the ground with them lay a metal cylinder some two
feet long and seven inches in diameter.  There was also a coil of wire
and a boxed magneto battery.

One of the pair held to his eyes a pair of night marine glasses.
Incessantly this watcher kept his gaze focused on Williamson.

About two o'clock in the morning Williamson found it necessary to go
below for a few moments.  After reaching the conning tower he paused,
for a few moments, to look keenly all about him.

Yet, look as he would through the night, the machinist's vision could
not see that the bush hidden pair on shore, guessing his intention
from his stop by the conning tower, had silently taken to the water.
With them they towed the metal cylinder, which floated.  To the cylinder
was attached one end of the light wire.

Some distance out from the shore the pair halted, treading water, only
their eyes above the surface.  But Williamson could not make out such
small objects at the distance.  Then he went below.

"Now, for it," breathed one of the swimming pair, tensely.

Both swimmers struck out strongly, yet silently, making fast progress
through the water by means of some of the best strokes known to swimmers.

When they reached the port side of the submarine Williamson was still
below.  Nor had the attention of the marine guard on the "Waverly"
been attracted.

In just another swift instant the swimmers made a dive that carried them
and their cylinder below the surface.

Straight up against the bottom of the hull the pair went.

When they returned to the surface the metal cylinder was in place below.

Glancing backward only once, to make sure that Williamson was not yet
on deck, and that the gunboat's marine guard had not detected their
stealthy work, the swimming pair struck out lustily for shore.

Back into the same clump of bushes they made their way.  In the first
few moments neither of the recent swimmers appeared to dare a glance
into the face of his comrade.  In silence they fitted the shore end of
the wire to the battery.

Then one of the pair seized the handle to pomp the fatal electric spark
along the wire to the hidden mine under the "Benson's" hull.

"Remember what happened to the 'Maine'!" this wretch chuckled hideously.




CHAPTER XIX

A JOKE ON THE SECRET SERVICE!


"What's that noise?" wondered Williamson.

He stopped, listening intently, for he was still below.

Against the bottom of the "Benson's" hull he heard a steady, slow,
monotonous bumping.  As he listened, his face took on an anxious look.

"We're in a friendly port," muttered the machinist.  "It can't be
anything very wrong, and yet--"

That slow steady bumping continued.

"Anything bumping against the bull of a boat at anchor, in that fashion
may be wrong," concluded the man, swiftly.

His mind made up to this much, the rest was not difficult to decide.  The
cause of that bumping required instant investigation.  Williamson caught
up the tool that came quickest to hand, a pair of nippers, thrust them
into his jumper and raced up to the deck.

"If it's any real mischief," he muttered, "I hope I won't be too
slow--too late!"

With that he dived overboard, at the starboard rail, the side nearest
the gunboat.  There was a splash--then the waters closed over the
machinist.

He came up at about the point he had planned, where he had heard the
bumping.

Held below water as he was by the under-hull of the submarine, he could
move with certainty, though but slowly.

Groping, the machinist encountered the metal cylinder.  Quickly he felt
for its connections which, like a flash, he knew must exist.  He found
the wire, but reached for another.  It all had to be done swiftly, for
his reserve "wind" was fast giving out.  Not finding a second wire, he
fastened his nippers against the first wire--then cut.  Now, steering
the metal cylinder, he pushed it out from under the hull.  Cylinder and
man rose together.

Whew!  What a powerful breath the man took!  Then he steered the cylinder
carefully against the hull, and managed to hold it there until he could
reach a piece of cordage and make the cylinder fast.

This done, he dashed below, thumping hard on the door of the stateroom
occupied by Captain Jack Benson and Hal Hastings.

"Eh?  What is it?" called Jack, almost instantly.

"You're wanted on deck, Captain--instantly," replied the dripping
machinist.

"Oh, all right, Williamson," and Benson's feet hit the stateroom floor.

A minute later he was above, Hal following only some twenty seconds
behind his young chief.

Williamson swiftly told how he had heard the bumping against the hull,
and how he had found the cylinder, with a wire connection.

"Gunboat, ahoy!" roared Captain Jack, snatching up a megaphone and
holding it to his lips.

The response was prompt.  In less than three minutes a cutter, containing
an officer, a corporal and four marines, was alongside.

"The first thing for us to do is to take that cylinder aboard the
'Waverly' and investigate it," decided Ensign Foss.  "I'll leave the
marines here until I get further instructions from the commanding
officer."

"Anything happening?" demanded Eph, reaching deck just after the cutter
had put off.  He eyed the marine squad curiously.

"Just what we're trying to find out," replied Jack.

"It must seem to you that I acted amiss in leaving the deck," put in
Williamson.

"But you didn't," retorted Jack.  "Had you been on deck you wouldn't
have heard that infernal machine bumping against the hull."

"Infernal?" echoed Eph Somers, rubbing his eyes.  "Say, have I been
missing a whole lot by being asleep?"

The other three told him quickly all they knew of what had happened.

Within five minutes the cutter came back, bringing two more marines
and a young second lieutenant of that corps.

"Lieutenant Commander Kimball's compliments, sir," reported the second
lieutenant.  "He will put in an appearance as soon as that cylinder has
been investigated.  He has sent me with instructions to see what had best
be done."

"I don't believe there's much doubt as to what had best be done,"
replied Captain Jack, quickly.  "Williamson reports having cut a wire
that was attached to that cylinder.  I think we can find that wire again,
and, if we do, we can easily follow it to its other end."

"By jove, that's good enough," muttered the lieutenant.

"Williamson is already wet," proposed Jack.  "He can dive again, and see
whether he can pick up that wire.  If he needs any help, I'll go
overboard with him."

"Wait until I see what I can do," proposed the machinist.

This time he dived over the port side of the craft.  Three or four times
he came up for air, next going, below again.  At last, however,
Williamson came up, calling:

"I have a part of the wire in my hands."

Lieutenant Foster ordered his marines into the cutter, inviting Jack
and Hal also to go with him.  They rowed out alongside of Williamson,
picking up the machinist and his wire.

"We'd better put your man back on the boat, hadn't we, Mr. Benson?"
inquired the marine lieutenant.

"I'm not such weak stuff as that, sir," almost grumbled the machinist.
"I can stand a few minutes more in wet clothes, and I want to go along to
see where this wire leads."

"Good enough," nodded Lieutenant Foster, he gave the order to row along
slowly, while two marines in the bow of the cutter slowly gathered
in the wire, at the same time signaling back the direction in which it
lay.

Only a few minutes were needed thus to follow the trail straight to the
clump of bushes on shore.

"Nobody leave the boat until we have a lantern ready," directed
Lieutenant Foster.  "We don't want to tramp out the trail of the rascals
who laid that mine."

The marine lieutenant himself was the first to step ashore, and Jack
Benson was with him.

"Here are the footprints of the rascals," announced Foster, as the two
stepped cautiously into the bushes.

"Yes; there were just two of them here, apparently," replied Jack, after
studying the prints, and discovering the marks of only two different
sizes or kinds of shoes.

"Here's the imprint of a box," added Foster.  "Good heavens, the
scoundrels had a regular magneto battery, insulated wire and all, for
firing that mine from the shore.  Mr. Benson, they meant to blow your
boat into Kingdom Come!"

"It looks that way," replied Jack Benson, composedly.

On hearing that voice, so even and unaffected in its utterance,
Lieutenant Foster looked at the submarine boy keenly.

"By Jove, Benson, you're cool enough to be an admiral," muttered the
marine officer, admiringly.

"Why, this doesn't seem to be a joke on me," replied Captain, Jack,
smiling back at the lieutenant.

"A joke!"

"It's one on the Secret Service," laughed Jack, quietly.  "They are the
ones who are supposed to have the job of keeping off spies and all of
their kind."

"Yes; this certainly came from the spies, or their friends," muttered
Lieutenant Foster.  "Jove, but we have a desperate crowd to deal with
when they'll go to such a length as this in time of peace!"

"Oh, it may all turn out to be a joke," put Hal, quietly.  "Some one
may have been doing this to try us out.  That metal cylinder may prove
to have been loaded with ginger-bread or peanuts.  If anyone has been
trying a joke on us, then I'm mighty glad we didn't get rattled."

"I reckon we shall soon know just what that cylinder did contain,"
muttered Lieutenant Foster.  "Here's another cutter coming from the
'Waverly,' and I think I make out Lieutenant Commander Kimball in the
stern-sheets."

It was, indeed, the lieutenant commander.  As he stepped ashore, his
face coming into the circle of light cast by the lantern, his features
were seen to be white with anxiety.

"We have just looked into the cylinder," he announced, in a low voice.
"We found there enough gun-cotton to blow the 'Benson' into inch pieces.
It was a fearful crime to plan."

Jack Benson and Hal Hastings heard, but did not change color.  There was
no sense in losing nerve over a disaster that had been averted in time.

"The first thing to do, of course," continued Lieutenant Commander
Kimball, "is to send instant word to Messrs. Trotter and Packwood.
They have a heap of work ahead of them."

"As to our own boat's crew," replied Jack, "I fancy the best thing we
can do is to go back on board, since we can't do anything here.  One of
us will keep watch, and the rest of us can get some of a night's sleep
yet."

"Why, yes, if you youngsters can sleep, after such happenings," laughed
Kimball.

By this time Lieutenant Foster and two of his marines had followed the
trail of footprints as far as the hard road.  Here all trace was lost.

"What you want to do, Williamson," declared Jack, as soon as the
submarine people were back on their own craft, "is to get into some
dry clothes and make yourself a pot of hot coffee.  Then get in between
blankets for a sleep.  I'll finish out your watch."

Nor was Benson alone in his watch, for a cutter from the gunboat,
containing a corporal and two marines, beside sailors to row the boat,
moved slowly around the submarine at a distance of fifteen or twenty
yards.

After the rest had gone below, Captain Jack, hanging over the rail of
the platform deck, saw other lanterns gleaming in and around the clump
of bushes.

"That must be the Secret Service people, pulled out of their comfortable
beds," mused Benson, smiling.  "Won't they feel upset at any such
thing happening hours after they've arrived on the spot?"

After Eph Somers had reported on deck to take his watch, Jack went
below, once more dropping into sound slumber.  The smell of coffee and
bacon was wafted in from the galley when the young submarine captain
next awoke.

"Well," announced Eph, as Jack and Hal came forward for their breakfast,
"Trotter and Packwood haven't caught the fellows that laid the mine."

"It doesn't look strongly probable that they'll catch them, either,"
Jack replied.  "I don't believe that the fellows who did that trick are
any of the regular spies.  For that matter, we now of only three spies
here who are men.  Drummond is under arrest, and so is Gaston.  Neither
of them could have had a hand in it.  And there were two, so, if M.
Lemaire was in it, he had an unknown accomplice.  But I don't believe
M. Lemaire had any personal hand in laying that mine.  I've a notion
that he considers himself entirely too high class to go into any mere
blasting operations."

"'Mere blasting operations' is good," smiled Hal Hastings, "when we
stop to think what those 'blasting operations' might have done for us
if it hadn't been for Williamson."

"Anyone taking my name in vain?" demanded the machinist, smiling as he
put in an appearance at that moment.

"We're trying to see," Eph explained, "whether we can do any better
guessing than the Secret Service men as to the fellows who were kind
enough to lay that mine under us last night."

"Got it figured out?" asked the machinist, as he transferred, a generous
helping of bacon, eggs and fried potatoes, to his plate.

"For myself," put in Hal, "I'd suspect that fellow Gaston, in an instant,
if he had only been at liberty.  That fellow has an eye that looks like
all the letters in the word 'r-e-v-e-n-g-e.'"

"That's so," nodded Jack, thoughtfully, as he ate.  "But we happen to
know that Gaston is very safe under lock and key.  By the way, fellows,
I don't suppose Mr. Farnum and Mr. Pollard have heard the news yet, or
they'd be out here on the double quick."

After breakfast Jack went ashore alone, to carry the exciting news to
his employers.  He found Messrs. Farnum and Pollard in the breakfast
room at the Clayton.  Both were astounded when they heard the news of
the night's doings.

"Who on earth could have put up such a job against the submarine?"
gasped David Pollard.

"I don't know, sir," Captain Jack replied.  "But I've left Hal on
board, in command, and I mean to find out something about this business,
if there is any way to do it."

With that he excused himself, rising and leaving the table at which his
employers were seated.

Jacob Farnum gazed after his young submarine captain, then whispered to
the inventor:

"That youngster has some notion in his head of where to look for the
infernal criminals.  And, ten to one, his idea is a good one that will
bear fruit!"




CHAPTER XX

A BRIGHT LOOK AND A DEADLY WARNING


Jack's employer gave him rather too much credit in supposing that the
boy had already worked out the problem of finding those who had made
the attack on the "Benson."

As the submarine boy left the breakfast room he felt as much in the dark
as ever.  The only known spies who were still at large, for some reason
known only to the Secret Service men, were M. Lemaire, Mlle. Nadiboff
and Kamanako.

"This is rather earlier than either of that pair in the habit of showing
themselves," muttered Benson, as the first two names crossed his
thoughts.  "I wonder whether I could get the least bit of an inkling by
going to the jail and talking with Gaston?  If I could bluff him into
telling me anything, it might be so much gained.  I might catch him off
his guard, if I could get him angry enough."

Full of this interesting idea, the submarine boy strolled slowly along
to the little jail, forming his plans as he went.

Arrived at the jail, Captain Jack found the keeper, as yet, in ignorance
of the dastardly attempt that had been made on the submarine boat the
night before.  He listened, aghast, as Benson told him the whole story.

"Now, I've got a notion that Gaston's crowd are very likely at the
bottom of this whole deal," continued the submarine boy, in a low tone.
"For one thing, while perhaps nothing much can be done to the other
spies, this fellow, Gaston, is in here for a crime which, under the
Florida laws, will go hard with him.  It means that he'll be locked up
for a few years.  That may make both him and Lemaire ugly enough to put
them up to almost any mischief.  Was M. Lemaire here to see the fellow
yesterday?"

"Lemaire has not been hero at all," replied the jailer.

"Was Mlle. Nadiboff here to see him yesterday?"

"No; she has been holding aloof.  With the exception of his lawyer,
the only people who ye been here to see Gaston were two fellows who
came yesterday, about noon."

"Oho!" muttered Benson.  "Who were they?"

The jailer turned to reach for a memorandum book.

"I keep the names given by all who come here to see prisoners, so I
shall be able to answer you."

"Ah, here are the names.  One fellow called himself Leroux, the other
Stephanoulis."

"One name French, and the other Greek," muttered the submarine boy,
thinking hard.  "What did they look like?"

The jailer quickly and carefully described the pair.  Jack listened
attentively.  Then rose, briskly.

"Did you hear any of the conversation they had with Gaston?"

"No."

"If they come again to-day can you lock them up and hold them?"

"If I have proper authority."

"If you get a telephone message from Mr. Trotter, would that be good
enough authority?"

"Yes; on that I could hold them long enough to give Trotter a chance to
come here and take them or else to get them committed on a regular
warrant."

"If you keep within sound of your telephone bell, then, I think you'll
have authority within a few minutes," replied Jack, briskly.

"That's a live, hustling boy," muttered the jailer, looking after
young Benson through a window, as the submarine boy hurried away.

Before he had gone far, Jack encountered one of the nondescript surreys,
hauled by an antiquated nag and driven by a battered darkey, that often
do duty as cab in Florida.  Poor as the rig was, it offered a chance of
greater speed than Captain Benson could make at a walk, so he quickly
engaged the rig and was driven to the place where the Secret Service
men were stopping.

"You've brought us the only thing like a real clue that we have,"
declared Mr. Trotter, very frankly, after he had heard Jack's story.
"Wait a moment, and I'll have Packwood get busy over the telephone."

Within the next twenty minutes not only had the jail been telephoned
to; Packwood also talked with all the nearby railway stations in that
section of the country.

"If those rascals can be found," declared Trotter, "I think we shall
have gone a long way in clearing up the matter.  As you say, the fellow
Gaston has more reason than any of the rest of the crowd to want a
complete revenge against you."

Then Mr Packwood left to walk through the little town around Spruce
Beach, to see whether he could encounter any two worthies who answered
to the description of Leroux and Stephanoulis.

Before half-past nine, however, word came that local constables at a
little railway town a dozen miles away had arrested a couple of suspects
and were bringing them to Spruce Beach.  The prisoners had been taken
while waiting for a north bound train, and had tickets all the way
through to New York.

Then Jack hastened back to Messrs. Farnum and Pollard to report what was
in the air.

"By Jupiter, Jack, I knew you had some thing strong in your mind when
you left us," gasped the shipbuilder.  "But I didn't imagine you'd run
down the wretches as swiftly as that."

"We don't yet know that we've got the right hair," replied Captain Jack.

"I'm willing to wager money on it, if it comes to that," retorted Mr.
Farnum.

Before noon the two prisoners were brought into Spruce Beach.  Trotter
and Packwood stopped, in a 'bus with the prisoners, to show them to Jack
at the hotel.

"That pair look rascally enough to do any dirty trick," declared Jacob
Farnum, in high disgust, as he looked over Leroux and Stephanoulis.

The prisoners were, indeed, "hard hooking."  Both were men below average
size, with sullen, defiant eyes.  Both were dressed roughly, like
laborers.  Yet, when taken, each had been found to have a considerable
sum of money about him.

"We can't make either of the fellows talk, but maybe they will later,
when we begin to employ some of the third degree on them," whispered
Mr. Trotter to Jack.  "My boy, I think you've put us on the real trail.
If the jailer identifies them as Gaston's callers of yesterday, we'll
know where we stand."

Fifteen minutes later the Secret Service men returned.  The jailer had
pronounced the pair to be Gaston's callers of the day before.  Moreover,
the jailer had obligingly locked up the pair until Trotter and Packwood
could obtain proper authority for him to hold them.  Leroux and
Stephanoulis had been placed in cells from which they could not possibly
communicate with Gaston, whose cell lay in another wing of the jail.

"As soon as that pair found that, for some reason, their mine failed to
explode under you last night," Trotter hinted, "they knew that their
game was up.  They hurried away and lay concealed in the distance.  Then
they saw the party from the 'Waverly' hunting on shore, with lantern's,
and they took to the woods.  That pair of rascals knew how risky it would
be for them to try to leave at the local railway station today, so they
struck off through the woods on foot making for another town at a
distance.  The constables who brought them down here say that Leroux
and Stephanoulis were a surely astonished pair when they found
themselves nabbed.  We are getting into a bigger nest of trouble down
here than we expected when we left Washington."

After, the Secret Service men had gone, Jacob Farnum turned as though to
go inside the hotel.

"I'm wondering whether there are any letters for me," he said.

"I'll go to the office and inquire," proposed Jack Benson.  At the desk
he received two letters for his employer, and turned away with them in
one hand when his steps were arrested by the sound of a sweet feminine
voice at the further end of the desk.

The speaker was Mlle. Nadiboff.

"She looks as sweet and as contented as ever," thought the submarine
boy, with some wonder.  "Really, she doesn't look as though a care had
crossed her path."

"Can you furnish me with a chauffeur, and order my car up?" Mlle.
Nadiboff was inquiring.

"I am very sorry, Mademoiselle, but we haven't a single chauffeur that
we can spare," replied the clerk, respectfully.

"Then may I rent one of your own cars, with a man to drive it?"

"Again, I am very sorry, Mademoiselle, but all the hotel cars are
engaged."

The pretty Russian stamped her foot impatiently.

"Oh, no matter, then," she cried.  "I will go to the garage and take
out my own car.  I know how to manage it."

"I regret very much to have to report, Mademoiselle," replied the clerk,
speaking as respectfully as ever, "that one of the hind wheels has been
removed from your car."

Mlle. Nadiboff stared at the clerk in amazement.

"Who has dared do such a thing?" she demanded, angrily.

"I am sorry, but I do not know," answered the clerk.

"Then I suppose it would be impossible, even, for me to hire one of your
livery rigs?" she continued icily.

"You have guessed right, Mademoiselle."

"Oh, but this is insupportable!" cried the pretty Russian, turning away.

As she did so, she caught sight of Jack Benson for the first time.

"Oh, I would like just a word with you, my Captain," she called softly,
moving after the boy, who had started toward the door.

She overtook Jack, resting a gloved hand on his sleeve.

"Do not stop," she urged, softly.  "I will keep on with you, out onto
the veranda."

In silence Jack stepped outside with her.  Mr. Farnum had vanished for
the moment, so Benson was alone with his pretty companion.

"Now, tell me, my Captain," she begged, "why it is that I cannot get
either my own car, or any other conveyance, for a little drive?"

"I could only guess, Mlle. Nadiboff, and you can do that as well as
I," Jack replied, gravely.

"But I desire you should guess for me, my Captain.  What do you say?"
she insisted, her eyes scanning his grave face.

"At the risk of seeming rude, Mademoiselle, I am not going to be prying
enough to make any guesses about your affairs," Captain Benson answered,
quickly.

He thought he had gotten out of the matter as cleverly as it could be
done.

"Some one is taking altogether too great an interest in my affairs, my
Captain.  I trust you have no hand in it, for it is possible that
interference with my comfort will prove dangerous to the offenders.
Yet, pardon me, for I am sure that you, my Captain, would not cause
me any uneasiness.  Let those who do beware!"

As she let go of his arm and turned to go inside, Mlle. Nadiboff's
smile was bright, almost friendly.  Yet back of that smile, in her
expressive eyes, lurked a look that made the boy start.

It was a look that spoke of deadly, things, and Captain Jack Benson had
come quite to believe that Mlle. Nadiboff could be not only quite deadly
at need, but also equally reckless.




CHAPTER XXI

A FRENCH RAT IN THE CORNER


As Mr. Farnum came around a bend in the veranda Jack hurried to him,
handing over the letters.  Then he related the little scene he had just
witnessed in the office, and described how Mlle. Nadiboff had walked
out with him.

"So the little minx was hinting at more mischief to come, was she?"
demanded the shipbuilder.  "Jack, I believe she's equal to it.  Her
crowd are anyway, if it's true that Gaston, from his cell in jail, could
plan the attempt to blow the 'Benson' last night."

Hal, too, soon came up and heard.  He turned anxious gaze upon his chum.

"Jack, old fellow," he pleaded, "I know you're not much given to being
afraid of things.  But, at least, look out for yourself a bit.  Be more
prudent than you usually are about yourself.  That crowd of foreign
spies, having failed and having brought themselves into trouble, mean
to have revenge.  Any of us are liable, but you'll be the shining
mark of all to be picked out."

"There can't be many more of that crowd left at large," laughed Jack,
lightly.

"I wonder why the Secret Service men don't arrest Lemaire and the
Nadiboff young woman?" asked Mr. Pollard, the last to rejoin the little
group.

"Trotter and Packwood must have some good reasons of their own," Jack
replied, thoughtfully.  "For one thing, they hardly have any evidence
that they could use against the pair."

"They could at least drive them from Spruce Beach," retorted the inventor.

"Perhaps the Secret Service man are giving the pair enough rope for their
hanging," proposed Jack.

At that moment the two detectives were espied going past in a buggy.
They waved their hands to the party.  Jack replied by a signal to halt.
He and Hal ran down to the road to speak to the detectives.

"If it's a fair question to ask," demanded Hal, "what are you going to
do with Lemaire and Mlle. Nadiboff?"

"To tell you the truth, we don't know," Trotter answered.  "We haven't
anything we could very well fasten on them.  But of this you may be
sure; our various moves are known to them, and they're on the
tenterhooks of anxiety wondering what's going to break loose next.  More
than that, both are sharp enough to have guessed that it would be
impossible for either of them to get away from Spruce Beach, now, without
our leave.  But we'll have to leave you, now, boys.  You've been of so
much help to us that I don't mind telling you what we're up to at this
moment.  We're driving back to jail, and we're going to try to put the
screws on Leroux and his Greek companion.  If we can make 'em think
we've gained new evidence against 'em, they may get scared and begin
to talk.  If they talk fast enough, they'll begin to tell some truth."

The buggy rolled along again.

"You didn't tell them a word about Mlle. Nadiboff's threats to you,"
muttered Hal.

"I didn't mean to," Jack replied, simply.

"Why not?"

"Well, for one thing, I couldn't swear that she did threaten me.  She
may have meant it all for nonsense."

"Yes," mocked Hal Hastings.  "That, would be just like her!"

The submarine not being due to go out that day, the chums decided to
remain on shore, in order to keep in touch with the march of events.
The day was so balmy that Mr. Farnum dropped into a chair on the porch,
Pollard occupying the chair next to him.  Hal, buying a magazine at
the hotel news stand, sat on the edge of the porch, his feet touching
the ground.  Jack, his mind too full of problems to permit him to
read, paced up and down the grounds.  Finally he strolled, out past
the gate, crossed the road and began to stroll along the shingle of
bench.

Jacob Farnum removed his cigar from between his lips long enough to
remark:

"As long as the lad keeps in sight, Pollard, it will be worth our while
to keep an occasional eye on him."

"And when he goes out of sight--? asked the inventor, slowly.

"It will be high time to call him back.  Somehow, Dave, I'm growing
uneasy over the boy.  I can't help the feeling that he's running into
a good deal of danger that's likely to explode under him at any moment,
just as that mine was intended to last night."

"It makes one feel uncanny to be at Spruce Beach," growled the inventor,
savagely.

"Well, we can't run away," retorted Jacob Farnum, blandly.

"Why not, if we feel like it?"

The shipbuilder laughed.

"Why, Dave, a spirited lad like Jack Benson would be furious over
anything that looked like a retreat.  He'd be savage.  Now, Dave, we
can hardly afford to put such a slight on the boy who has had so much
to do with our success."

"I suppose not," grunted Mr. Pollard, settling back in his chair.

"The odd part of it," said Farnum, presently, "is, that while we're the
center of an international cyclone, so to speak, the rest of the folks
at Spruce Beach don't know a word about it.  Look at the crowds of
folks around us who haven't even a breath of an idea of what has
happened, or is, likely to happen.  Not a soul around here, except our
own few, have any idea that an attempt was made, last night, to blow up
that mysterious-looking little submarine craft riding at her moorings
out yonder."

"I wonder what the crowd would do, if it did know?" asked Pollard,
gazing out curiously over the throngs of pleasure-seekers.  "That shows
what a dreamer you are, Dave, and how little you know of your own fellow
citizens.  What would the crowd do?  Why, it would change itself into
a mob.  Mlle. Nadiboff would be hustled off out of town, Lemaire would
be lynched, or mighty close to it, and it would be strange if the mob
didn't march on the jail itself."

"Then it would never do to let the crowd know all that's happening,
would it?" asked Pollard.

Jack, from thinking over the problems that had come up in connection
with the spies, had at last let his attention wander to the crowds.
Down at the beach hundreds were taking an afternoon dip.  Other hundreds
were strolling up and down the sands.  Children were building sand
castles or houses.  A good many small boats were out with pleasure
parties.  Yet many, both grown-ups and children, looked positively
bored.  They needed excitement.

"How near this crowd came to having something to talk about," muttered
young Benson to himself, with a smile.  "If that mine had gone off
last night, no one at Spruce Beach would have felt dull to-day."

Finding that the afternoon air was making him dull and inclined to gape,
Captain Jack turned back from the beach.  He sauntered along the road,
and was about to cross it, when he heard a sharp snap.  It was like a
subdued shot.

In the same instant a hissing sound went _pseu_! in front of his face.
A distinct breeze, small though it was, fanned his eyes.  Then chug!
Something landed in the trunk of the tree he was passing.

"That was a shot!" guessed the submarine boy, like a flash, and in the
next breath he muttered: "Aimed at me, too!"

Jack pitched forward, falling upon his face.  If one shot had been
fired, another might be as soon as the unknown marksman realized that
he had missed.

Several people, near by, fancied they had heard a shot, and turned,
curiously.  Then, as soon as Benson was espied lying on the ground a
rush was made in his direction.

At that moment Hal Hastings happened to be looking over toward the beach.
Like a flash he was up and away, his magazine falling from his lap to
the ground.

"Now, what on earth has taken Hastings off like that?" demanded Mr.
Farnum, looking around in surprise.  "There are other people running,
too.  Come along, Dave!"

Hal shot his way through the rapidly gathering crowd.  He reached Jack
Benson just as the latter leaped up, laughing.

"Why all this excitement, just because I stubbed my toe against a
dew-drop and fell?" demanded Benson, laughing.

"Weren't you shot?" gasped Hal.

"If I was, I'll make the rascal prove it," asked back Captain Jack.
"But, now you mention it, I think the tree _was_ hit."

Jack turned and looked the tree trunk over at about the height of his
own head from the ground.

"See here," he remarked, laying a finger on a small perforation in the
bark, "I think a bullet, or something of the sort, went in here."

"We'll soon find out then," proposed Hal, whipping out his jack-knife,
opening a blade and beginning to dig.  The crowd grew in size.  Messrs.
Farnum and Pollard had great difficulty in forcing their way through.

After some time spent in patient work Hal dug out a steel-jacketed
bullet, short and of small calibre.

"You want to find the man with a weapon that bullet fits, and then make
it warm for him," advised one man in the front rank of the crowd.

"Why?" queried Captain Jack, coolly, examining the missile, then dropping
it carelessly into his pocket.  "Some fellow fired an accidental shot,
very likely, and is at this moment the most scared man at Spruce Beach.
What's the use of jumping on anyone just because he had a moment of
carelessness?"

"That's right, young level-head!" nodded another man, approvingly.

Messrs. Farnum and Pollard hung back somewhat.  They were near enough
to hear and see, and they had their instant suspicions.  But the crowd
knew nothing of the spy outrages, and it was not necessary to inform
strangers.

So, within a few minutes the crowd broke up, straying off in quest of
something more interesting.  The submarine party kept on up to the hotel
porch.

"That was a revengeful move, pure and simple," declared Jacob Farnum, in
a low voice.

"Of course," assented Jack.  "It's going to be something of a task
though, to find out, for certain, just who fired that shot."

Even as the four stood there on the veranda a door opened, and M.
Lemaire, faultlessly attired for an afternoon stroll, stepped out.

"Ah, good afternoon, gentlemen," was his unconcerned greeting, as he
recognized the quartette.

This French spy had evidently dressed himself with a good deal of care.
He carried himself with much precision and lightly twirled a natty cane.

"Pardon me, monsieur," spoke Jack, stepping forward, and looking past
the Frenchman; "is that one of your friends down the road?"

As the Frenchman turned to look, young Benson swiftly and adroitly took
his cane from him.

Like a flash, his eyes full of fire, Lemaire heeled about, then leaped
at the young submarine captain.

But Hal Hastings stepped between them so neatly that the Frenchman
collided with him instead.

"Hold this fellow a moment, please," requested Captain Jack.  "I've found
something interesting."

Hal Hastings grabbed Lemaire's right arm.  Jacob Farnum instantly
possessed himself of the other.  David Pollard sprang forward so that
he could take a hand, if need be.

Captain Jack stood holding the spy's walking stick, ferule end upward.
It was a rather long, slender-looking ferrule of steel.  But what
interested young Benson most was that he had found that the ferrule
was hollow.

Quickly the submarine boy examined the rest of the cane.

"Release me!  Hand that stick back to me!" hissed the Frenchman.  "Oh,
some one shall pay for this unpardonable outrage!"

But Hal and Mr. Farnum only gripped the spy the more tightly.

"I believe I've found out something," announced Jack, in a low voice.
"Wait a second or two."

He had come upon a concealed spring near the head of the cane.  Stepping
to the edge of the porch, the submarine boy pointed the ferrule end at
the ground, then pressed upon the spring.

A sharp, though not loud report followed, and a bullet plowed into the
ground.  There was a flash at the end of the ferrule, though but a
barely perceptible amount of smoke.

"So, M. Lemaire, you carry a pistol cane, that uses smokeless powder
and shoots steel-jacketed bullets?" inquired Jack, turning to the
prisoner, who, white-faced, stood gnashing hi's teeth in helpless rage.
"I wonder if the bullet Hastings dug out of the tree trunk will be found
to fit this weapon?"

"You miser-r-r-rable dog!" screamed Lemaire.  "Thief!  Liar!"

"Oh, keep cool about it, do," urged Jack, smilingly.

"What's this?" demanded Trotter, suddenly appearing on the scene.
Packwood was just behind him.

Jack swiftly told what had happened, and what he had just discovered,
at the same time passing the cane to the Secret Service man.

"Lemaire, I guess you'd better come with us, for safe-keeping," advised
Trotter, dryly.

"You ar-r-rest me?" snarled the Frenchman.

"Oh, yes; if you insist upon a name for it."

M. Lemaire's face looked uglier than Jack had ever dreamed it possible
for a man's face to look.  As Hal and Farnum let go his arms the spy
took a quick step toward Jack Benson.

"Stop that!" commanded Trotter, sharply, leaping to grab the spy.

"I only want to say one word to this young scamp!" hissed Lemaire.
"I will not hurt him."

"You can wager he won't," added Captain Jack, clenching his fists and
watching the other alertly.  "Let him speak to me, if he wants."

Trotter thereupon halted, though he watched the Frenchman with lynx-like
wakefulness.

Lemaire, however, merely leaned forward until he had placed his lips
close to one of the young submarine captain's ears.

"See here," hissed the spy, "hold your tongue about everything, and
make sure Gaston and myself are released.  Else, no corner of the earth
will be a safe place for you.  You can find no place in the world where
you will be safe from destruction--unless you get us out of this one
bad fix!"




CHAPTER XXII

GALLANT, EVEN TO THE FOE!


"You may have him now," announced Captain Jack, ironically.  "I reckon
he has spoken his piece."

Trotter's answer was to leap upon the Frenchman, pinioning his arms
behind him.  Packwood snapped handcuffs over the prisoner's wrists.

"Here is the bullet that Hastings dug out of the tree--the one that
was probably fired at me," added Captain Jack.  "And here is M. Lemaire's
cane-pistol.  You can see whether the bullet fits the cane."

Trotter took them, with a swift, admiring look at Benson's cool, handsome
face.

Then, guiding their prisoner, the Secret Service men moved off hastily,
for two or three hundred beach walkers had just discovered that something
exciting had happened, and were hurrying forward.

Lemaire was forced into the buggy and driven rapidly away.  Once out
of sight the Secret Service men turned, driving straight for the local
jail.

Before anyone in the excited crowd could ask what had happened the
submarine people had vanished.

These four hurried to a room that Mr. Farnum had reserved while they
remained at Spruce Beach.

"What was it that rascally Frenchman whispered to you?" demanded the
shipbuilder.

Jack promptly repeated the threat, whereat Mr. Farnum's face grew
decidedly grave.

"The worst of it is, Jack, I think the fellow not only meant the threat,
but has the connections necessary to carry it out," said the ship
builder, slowly.  "I am quite prepared to believe that these spies
work in large groups, when necessary.  I am beginning to think that
it will be wise move to get you way from here--in time."

"That would give Gaston a fine chance to go clear," retorted young
Benson.  "I am a very important witness when his case comes up."

"You are also a very important young man for our submarine company,"
replied Jacob Farnum, "so important, in fact, that I don't want to
have you put out of this world through any of their plots for revenge."

"But don't you see, sir, that, if I run away from here, the fellow
Gaston is very likely to be liberated?"

"Let him go, then," urged Mr. Farnum, though it was plain that he spoke
reluctantly.

"It's just what I won't do, sir.  I wouldn't be a good citizen if I
should allow a criminal to escape justice just because I was, afraid
to stay and testify against him," argued Captain Jack.

"I admit the force of all you say," assented Mr. Farnum, slowly.  "Yet,
if I should find, after thinking it all over, that it will be best to
instruct you to leave here quietly, you won't refuse to obey, will you?"

"Yes," declared Jack Benson.

"What?  It would be the first time you ever balked at orders, then."

"But this is different, Mr. Farnum.  I refuse to obey any order that will
tend to defeat the ends of justice."

Jacob Farnum winced at that statement of the matter.  He had been
anxious only to save Jack from the attempts of a dangerous crowd.

"Jack is right," broke in David Pollard, decisively.

"When he puts the case in that way, I don't dare say that he isn't,"
admitted the shipbuilder.  "At the same time, I can't bear the thought
of the lad being butchered to gratify the grudge of any of the rascally
crew that we've offended here at Spruce Beach."

A slight, rustling sound at the door caused them all to wheel about.
Jacob Farnum's eyes beheld a slip of white paper lying on the floor,
just inside the door.  Jack Benson saw it, also, but he sprang past
the paper, pulling the door open.

Around a turn in the corridor the submarine boy heard the sound of
fleet footsteps.

Jack pursued, but could find no one, and the sound of moving feet had
also ceased.  As soon as he was satisfied that he could not catch the
prowler, the submarine boy returned to the room.

"Do you see this?" asked the shipbuilder, holding out the slip of paper.

"Another warning, I suppose?" Benson ventured.

"Yes; and it shows that you are being followed and watched.  Something
worse is almost certain yet to happen."

Jack took the slip of paper, reading these printed words:

"You have been fairly warned.  Are you going to be a fool?  Obey,
or--"

That was all.  The meaning of the words was plain enough, but Jack, with
as cool a smile as ever, folded the slip, dropping it in one of his
pockets.

"This will interest Trotter," he remarked.

"There is no use whatever in advising you, suppose?" asked the
shipbuilder.

"If these threats were directed against you, would you cringe from
them?" demanded the young submarine captain.

"Of course I wouldn't," replied Farnum, a sudden flash lighting his eyes
as he spoke.

"Then why should you expect to see me turn coward?"

"I won't say another word about it, Jack!" replied the shipbuilder,
gripping his captain's hand.  "I have dreaded to see you go down under
the mysterious assaults of these scoundrels.  I have hated to see a boy
come to that harm while serving me.  But  I realize, now, that it would
hurt you worse to run away than it would to stay and face any kind of
punishment or even death itself."

"That's the talk, sir," nodded Hal.  "And no one is going to harm him,
either.  There are too many of us--if we keep our eyes open."

That "if" covered a wide field of possibilities.  Not one of them could
foresee all that the ingenuity of the enemy would provide in the way of
danger.

To quiet his own agitation Jacob Farnum had recourse to a cigar.  He
lighted it, smoking with a very solemn look on his face.

"What's all the excitement, I wonder?" muttered Hal, presently.

The distant sound of running feet, then cries came to their ears,
though none in the little party could distinguish the words.

"There's some big excitement on.  Come along," urged Jack, reaching
for his cap.

"Humph!  We've had excitement enough to last reasonable people for a long
time," grumbled the shipbuilder, but he, too, sprang for his hat.

Ere they had run far through the corridor they encountered other guests
fleeing.

"What's the matter?" called Jack.

"Fire in the south wing," called back one man.  "We don't know, yet,
whether the hotel is doomed."

Just then the fire alarm bell of the hotel began to sound loudly in all
the corridors.

That brought the remaining guests on the run, some appearing not
completely dressed.

As the rushing throng began to thicken at a door on the ground floor
the sound of a whistled of clanging gongs was heard without.  The
Spruce Beach fire department was responding to the alarm.

Captain Jack bounded out.  Hal kept close at his chum's heels while
Messrs. Farnum and Pollard came along less fleetly.

Through half a dozen windows on the second floor of the south wing
flames now leaped, while the smoke curled up in dense clouds.  This
wing was built wholly of wood, and was doomed, even though the rest of
the hotel could be saved.

Jack halted, at last, Hal bumping into him.

Some of the firemen were hauling hose from a cart, while others were
attaching an end of one length to a fireplug.  A hook and ladder truck
was hauled to the scene, its crew standing by ready at need.

Whish!  Two four-inch streams struck the flames, yet seemed only to
feed them to greater fury.

"We can't put that blaze out, men!" roared the local fire chief.  "Turn
the streams against the main building and stop the blaze from spreading.
Let the axe crew follow me!"

Swiftly a couple of long ladders were unlimbered and placed close to
the main building.  The fire chief and his men scaled these with
agility and tried to fight their way into the rear of the blaze.

Jack stood scanning the windows on the third floor, just above the
present belt of fire.  Then, through one of the windows on the upper
floor he saw a sudden red glow thrust its way.

"The fire is eating through to the top," he turned to explain to Messrs.
Farnum and Pollard, who had just reached the boys.

"I think they'll save the main building, however," returned Mr. Farnum,
as the ringing sound of ax-blows reached them and the heavy streams of
water were carried after the wielders of the axes.

"I hope everybody is out, up there in the wing," uttered Hal, glancing
in that direction.

As if in answer a window was suddenly raised with frantic haste.

A face, a figure appeared there, framed by the sill and sides.  Then
a red tongue of flame shot up in the background, illumining the face
of a terrified woman.

"Why, it's Mlle. Nadiboff!" gasped Jack Benson.

The pretty Russian shouted down appealingly, though her words were
drowned by the crackling of the blaze and the lusty strokes of the
fire fighters.

"Quick!  We must get a ladder up there!" shouted Jack, turning back to
the truck.  "We can't let a human being be burned before our eyes."

But there were no firemen at hand.  They had followed their chief.
Hundreds of citizens stood about, but they needed a leader.

"Come on, men!" roared Jack.  "Help me off with this longest ladder."

A dozen pair of hands reached for it at once.  Off came the ladder with
a bound, while other men pressed up to aid.

"Right up to the sill of the window where that woman is!" shouted young
Captain Benson.  Up went the ladder, exactly in place, while a score
of voices shouted:

"Get out on the ladder and come down, young lady!  Can you?"

As if in answer, Mlle. Nadiboff was seen suddenly to reel backward as
though overcome by the smoke that poured up at her from the floor below.

"Where are you going?" shouted Jacob Farnum, hoarsely, as the submarine
captain threw off his jacket like a flash.

"Up there--of course--to help her!" Jack shouted back at him, as he
leaped at the rungs.

"It's the only thing a man can do," admitted Farnum, hoarsely.  "Good
luck to you, Jack!"




CHAPTER XXIII

"GOOD-BYE, MY CAPTAIN!"


The first part of the climb was easy.

Unmindful of the cheers that followed the submarine boy raced up the
ladder.

Then he struck the belt of heavy smoke.  Flames, too, leaped out at him.
He went through that zone of red with all possible speed, yet swift as
he was, he felt as though he were being roasted.

Then, at a greater height, the boy was forced to close his mouth, barely
breathing, for the smoke surrounded him.  He felt as though he were
stifling, but he kept on.

Up on the sill the watching crowd below saw him.  Then Jack Benson leaped
inside.

Ah!  He could breathe, here, just a bit more, though the smoke had
followed him.

At the further end of the room, by the door that opened upon the
corridor, the flames were eating their way up through from the floor
below.  There was a red barrier there that shut off any hope of retreat
by the corridor.

Yet these things Jack Benson saw only as his gaze swiftly swept the
room.

Mlle. Nadiboff lay in an unmoving, unconscious heap on the floor, some
ten feet back from the window.  She was in evening dress, as though
prepared to descend to dinner.

"She can't go through the line of fire in that rig," muttered Jack, even
while his head reeled from the weight of smoke on his lungs.

Furiously he sprang at the bed, snatching off the blankets.  These he
threw on the floor, rolling the Russian woman up in them.

Then he bent over to lift her.  Ordinarily he could have performed the
task with ease, for his young arms were strong.  But now, three-quarters
strangled by the smoke he had inhaled, Jack fairly tottered, with the
insensible human form in his arms, back to the window:

As he stepped out upon the ladder Jack vaguely heard the cheers that
volleyed up at him.

To most of those below it looked as though he were moving easily.  But
Hal, waiting on the rungs of the ladder, just below the fearful belt
of smoke and flames, saw differently at a glance.

Holding firmly to his burden, Jack started down carefully, but as swiftly
as his quaking knees would permit.

"Come along!  Steady with you!" bellowed up Hal Hastings, as he fought
his way up to his chum.

An instant later Hal growled out

"Let her go.  I have her--safe!"

Hal was just above the smoke belt, and his own head was reeling, now.
Tongues of flame leaped out at them all.  Speed alone could save them
from one of the most painful of deaths.

Down through the belt they moved.  As they neared the ground willing
hands reached out to catch them.

"Pull those blankets off the girl!  They're afire," shouted one man,
and was obeyed.  Mlle. Nadiboff, after the blankets had been stripped
away, was carried off, still unconscious though safe as far as fire was
concerned.

The clothing of both the submarine boys had caught and was smouldering.
Both Jack and Hal submitted to being thrown on the ground and rolled
until the last spark had been extinguished.

"Bring milk--a lot of it, for these young men," ordered a physician who
stood in the crowd.  For Jack and Hal, on their feet again, leaned
almost helplessly against Farnum and Pollard.  Their lungs were so
filled with smoke that both boys felt as though they could never breathe
again.

When the milk was brought, however, and forced down their throats under
the doctor's orders, they found that this somewhat oily fluid brought
back a good deal of the missing power to breathe.  After a while both
boys began to move about again.  Yet both felt a strange feeling of
oppression and weakness.

"For the rest, your feelings will simply have to wear off," the
physician told them.  "You'll be all right in time.  And it was a fine,
manly piece of work that you both did."

After nearly an hour of stubborn work the firemen saved the main
building, though that southern wing was practically destroyed.

When the danger was over hotel discipline asserted itself once more.
News was passed that the belated dinner was ready, and the lately
excited guests filed in for their meal, though many complained of a
loss of appetite.

Neither Jack nor Hal felt like eating then.  They sat by Messrs. Farnum
and Pollard, though the submarine boys contented themselves with sipping
more milk.

"That was one way of answering the enemy's threats," laughed the
shipbuilder, in an undertone.

"We don't know that Mlle. Nadiboff was in any way connected with the
threats," replied Jack, in an equally low tone.

"She belongs in the enemy's ranks," observed David Pollard, dryly.

As the quartette were leaving the table one of the negro waiters stepped
up to them.

"De lady dat was brought down outah de fiah done wanter see Marse Benson
in de parlor," announced the waiter.

"Mlle. Nadiboff?" inquired Mr. Farnum.  "Then I guess we had all better
go in Jack, I'm going to keep you in my sight."

As they entered the parlor the submarine people saw three or four women
standing about a sofa on which lay the pretty Russian.

At sight of the newcomers the Russian signed to the attendants of her
own sex to raise her, and then to withdraw.  Jack went forward to the
sofa, his friends taking seats on the opposite side of the room.

"Pardon my not rising, my Captain," begged Mlle. Nadiboff, as Jack
Benson left his friends to go forward and greet her.  "I find I have
not my full strength yet."

Since she offered her hand, Jack, under the circumstances, took it
simply, then released it.  He stood before her in the uniform that had
suffered in the fire.

"I am told that you, my Captain, nearly lost your own life in saving
my less than worthless one," continued the Russian woman.  "It was a
strange thing for you to--considering.  Will you believe me when I
tell you that I greatly respect your courage and your manhood?"

"Yes," bowed Jack.  "Though it was nothing but a sailor's easy trick."

"You would make little of it, would you, my Captain?" smiled Mlle.
Nadiboff, plaintively.  "True, you risked much for a life that has
been worth but little.  Still, I sent for you to do more than assure
you of my appreciation of your generosity."

As she spoke, the young woman thrust one hand into the bosom of her
dress.  She drew out a little envelope which she held in her hand for
a few moments.

"You have been threatened, my Captain?" she whispered, looking up at
him.

"Oh, ye-es," assented Captain Jack Benson, shrugging his shoulders.

"And by very desperate people."

"So far," smiled the boy, "they have injured only themselves."

"Yet you do not know how far their vengeance can reach."

"Nor shall I lose any sleep thinking over it," Captain Jack replied,
looking down at her with his baffling smile.

"Your enemies had one trick prepared for you," whispered the Russian,
"that you might have found it hard to meet."

"Yes?"

"Of course you do not suspect it, but we have even one of the waiters
here--a worthless, reckless black--in our pay."

"It may have been he who thrust the paper under our door before--before
the fire?" ventured Jack.

"It was," nodded Mlle. Nadiboff, seriously.  "And it was the same
waiter who, on receiving this envelope from me, would have mixed the
contents with the next cup of coffee served you in the dining room of
this hotel.  But I am overcome by your generosity, my Captain.  Take
this envelope--and do not place what it contains in your coffee."

Though Jack Benson may have started inwardly, his hand did not tremble
in the least as he reached out and took the envelope, which he dropped
into one of his pockets.

"Thank you, Mademoiselle," he said, simply.

"There is nothing about me, my Captain, that you can admire," spoke the
Russian woman, sadly.  "I have not led the right kind of life.  But I
have just that grain of good in me that enables me to admire one as
fine and manly as I have found you to be.  You have given me my
life--a worthless one, at best.  So I give you your life--and may you
make as splendid use of it as you have started out to do.  And now,
good-bye, my Captain.  You cannot continue to know such as I."

Despite what he knew of this dangerous woman, Jack Benson felt himself
touched.

"What is going to become of you, Mademoiselle?" he asked.  "Will you
be dragged down in the snares that have entrapped your confederates!"

"I do not know.  How could I know?" she asked, looking quickly up at
him.  "Yet, if my accomplices escape, and find that I have served you,
my Captain, do you know the forfeit they will exact?"

"Your life?" whispered Benson.

"Yes!"

"Then, if I can, I am going to help you to escape them," promised the
submarine boy.  "Yet that can happen only on your most solemn
word--given, pardon me, in a moment of absolute honesty--that you will
never again play the spy, for the secrets of the United States
Government."

"Oh, I will promise that," replied Mlle. Nadiboff, quickly.  "Yet I
hardly need to.  After what I have done, just now, no one in my
peculiar line of work would ever trust me again.  I shall be shunned,
hereafter, if not destroyed, by those who have worked with me."

"I shall do my best to get you safely away from Spruce Beach," promised
Jack Benson.  "Have you more to say to me, Mademoiselle?"

"Nothing, but good-bye, my Captain."

She held out her hand.  Once more Jack took it, bending low over it.
Tears shone in her eyes, but Jack did not see them, for he turned,
going back to his friends.

Not until they were well away from the parlor did Jack Benson offer any
account of the interview that had just taken place.

"Let me have that envelope, then," requested Jacob Farnum, gravely.

"What are you going to do with it, sir?" Jack asked, as he passed it
over.

"Do with it?" repeated his employer.  "I'm going to take it to the
nearest druggist, and find out what the stuff is."

"We'd better take this latest news to our friend Trotter," suggested
David Pollard.

"By all means," nodded Farnum.  "And I'll meet the rest of you there."

The little house wherein the Secret Service, men had taken up their
headquarters was not far away.  When the inventor and the submarine boys
rang the bell Mr. Packwood admitted them.

"Step right into the next room," advised Mr. Packwood.  "You'll find some
one there you know."

A the submarine folks entered the room they saw Trotter seated at a
table on which were writing materials.  At the other side of the table
standing very erect, and in a very respectful pose, was the Japanese,
Kamanako.




CHAPTER XXIV

CONCLUSION


"Good evening, honorable gentlemen," said the Japanese, turning when he
heard the new arrivals entering.

"Mr. Kamanako is going to leave us," announced Trotter, with a smile.
"He goes north to-night.  Here is the slip of paper, my boy, that will
take you past any meddlesome inquiry.  But it is good only until
midnight, so I advise you to be sure to catch to-night's express."

"I shall, and thank you, honorable sir," replied the Japanese, bowing.

"Then I won't detain you any longer, or you may miss your train."

Once more the Japanese bowed, then turned to Captain Jack Benson.

"Honorable Captain," he said, "I had pleasure to show you something
about jiu-jitsu.  You did me honor to show me most excellent thing
you called American strategy.  I shall not forget it."

With bows to the others Kamanako quickly took his leave.

"We had nothing very strong on which we could hold that fellow, so we
had to let him go," declared Mr. Trotter, after the outer door had
closed.  Then he added, with a sigh: "That's the worst of catching spies,
under such laws as we have in this country.  Rarely are we able to
punish them as they deserve."

"He won't come back, will he?" asked Jack.

"Not for a while, anyway.  We have made the fellow nervous, and he will
give us a wide berth for a considerable time."

"Why don't you hit all these people the hardest kind of a blow?" demanded
young Benson.

"I wish I knew how to," sighed Trotter.

"Then spoil them with too much publicity," proposed the submarine
captain.  "Let the whole country know all about them and their records,
and just how they look."

"If I could!  But how am I to do it?"

"Why, there's a writer here at Spruce Beach," Jack continued; "a man
named Hennessy.  Let him write all the facts of this whole story, or
such of the facts as you want made public.  Let Hennessy have the
photographs of this spy crew.  He can print the yarn in his newspaper
and in some magazine, and can use all the photos.  Then these people
will find themselves so well known that about all of them value as spies
will be gone."

"By Jove, but that's a clear-headed idea," muttered Trotter, rising from
his chair.  "It will do the trick, too.  Where is this man, Hennessy?"

"Stopping at the Clayton, sir."

"Packwood, will you go over and get that reporter?" asked Mr. Trotter,
turning to his associate.

In the next minute Jack was telling Trotter of the fire-incident and the
envelope that Mlle. Nadiboff had given him.  By the time the submarine
boy had finished his recital Jacob Farnum hurried in.

"That stuff," he reported, "is morphine sulphate, and the druggist says
there was enough of it to take you clear out of this world and into the
next."

"Hm!  That Nadiboff woman!" muttered Trotter.  "She has been as dangerous
as any of them, and yet it is hard to be rough with her after her one
act of gratitude to you, Benson.  I could see that she went north on
the train, of course, but she'd be liable to suspicion and punishment
by some of the members of the gang of that infernal Gaston.  He has yet
other men, I suspect, who may be watching the trains further on, and
Mlle. Nadiboff, after saving you, Benson, from their latest death trap,
might run right into their vengeance.  She ought to be gotten away from
here by some other means."

"She can be--by ship," hinted Jack, quietly.

"Let me see," mused Trotter.  "Yes; that can be done, if you want to
take some trouble.  At about eleven to-night the Savannah freight
steamer, bound for Havana, will pass by about a dozen miles out.  You
could pick her up by watching for her searchlight.  Do you feel like
sending Nadiboff to Cuba, in that fashion?"

"If it suits her, we'll do it," Jack replied quickly enough.

"It may be very bad for her if it doesn't suit her," replied Trotter,
grimly.  "Well, hurry along and see if you can do it.  Drummond and
Miss Peddensen are going north to-night, also."

As the submarine party left the house they met Packwood and Hennessy
coming along.

"I think you'll get as good a news story as you can want to-night," said
Jack to the reporter.  "You remember, Mr. Farnum promised you one before
the tip was given to any other reporter."

Hennessy expressed his, thanks warmly, and the quartette hastened on to
the hotel.  Captain Jack had little difficulty in seeing Mlle. Nadiboff
in the parlor.  When he explained to her the plan, she gladly accepted.

"You will not believe me, my Captain," she smiled, wearily, "but I am
wholly through with spying.  I shall never again disgrace my womanhood
in that way."

Owing to the fire Mlle. Nadiboff was not burdened with baggage.  She
carried her evening dress in a new dress suit case bought by Hal at one
of the stores.  In going away she wore a plain gray dress and dark
brown jacket purchased from one of the maids at the hotel.  Mlle.
Nadiboff's jewelry and money, with which she was well supplied, had been
in the hotel safe, so that she left with the means of pursuing her
journey in comfort.

"It is a whim of mine, my Captain," cried the Russian, gayly, as they
left the hotel, "but will you give me your arm down to the shore?"

"Gladly," Jack agreed.

They took a shore boat and went out to the "Benson."  While Captain
Jack helped the pretty visitor aboard Hal hastened below to bring her
up a chair.

"You have your wish, at last, Mademoiselle, to visit this craft," Jack
laughed, then added, gravely: "I am sorry, indeed, that I cannot invite
you below."

"I have lost my desire to see the interior of the boat," she replied,
with equal gravity.

A start was made in plenty of time.  Gayly the "Benson" bounded out over
the waves, as though even that grim little steel craft of war could
appreciate the fact that its dangers were over.

In time Captain Jack picked up the Havana bound freighter by the rays of
her searchlight, and moved on out to intercept her.  He signaled that
he had a passenger to put aboard.  The steamship lay to, lowering a
side gangway, and the "Benson" ran neatly in.  The transfer was made.

Just as she was helped over the side Mlle. Nadiboff placed her hand in
Jack's.

"Good-bye, my Captain," she said, sadly.

"Good-bye, Mademoiselle," answered the submarine boy.  "And remember that
you are done with the spies."

"Forever!  Again, good-bye, my Captain."

As both craft moved off on their respective courses Captain Benson saw a
little white handkerchief fluttering at the freighter's stern rail.  As
long as it could be visible over the waters that handkerchief fluttered.
"I guess the little Russian must have tied her handkerchief there,"
observed Eph, dryly, and Captain Jack smiled; while Jacob Farnum turned
to whisper to the inventor:

"Dave, our youthful captain has the greatest respect in the world for
a woman, but he'll never be made a fool of by one of the wrong kind."

Henceforth, as long as she remained at Spruce Beach, the submarine
craft was wholly unmolested and avoided by spies.  Gaston, who turned
out to be the real leader of one party, instead of M. Lemaire, was
sentenced to prison for assault.  Leroux and his Greek accomplice
confessed to the attempt to explode the mine under the "Benson," and
were sent to the penitentiary.  There, also, journeyed M. Lemaire,
for a long term, on account of his all but successful shot at Jack
Benson.

With the exception of those sent to prison none of the spies have as
yet been heard from.

For a considerable time the "Benson" remained at, or near, Spruce Beach.
Hennessy's articles attracted great attention to the craft.  The Navy
people were charmed by the new capabilities shown by this latest of the
Pollard submarine boats.

Later the submarine boys were destined to turn their attention to new
and thrilling work with submarine craft And now came most stirring
times that put their grit, intelligence and resource to the hardest
kind of tests.

These newest happenings will be related in full in the next volume
of this series, which will appear under the title: "_The Submarine
Boys' Lightning Cruise; Or, The Young Kings of the Deep._"  The reader
of this new volume will find a rare treat in store for him!



***END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE SUBMARINE BOYS AND THE SPIES***


******* This file should be named 17057.txt or 17057.zip *******


This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
http://www.gutenberg.org/dirs/1/7/0/5/17057



Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.gutenberg.net/fundraising/pglaf.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://www.gutenberg.net/about/contact

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://www.gutenberg.net/fundraising/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit:
http://www.gutenberg.net/fundraising/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
